
This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 
to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 
to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 
are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other marginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 
publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing this resource, we have taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 

We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain from automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attribution The Google "watermark" you see on each file is essential for informing people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liability can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at http : //books . google . com/| 



Digitized by 



Google 



^ 



of tbc 
aniversitig of Mieconsin 










oogle 



Hi 



fijrf :::i^:',' '■ 



j^v--^" -' -H ^' 



Digitized by 



/Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



THE CONCEPT OF NATURE 



Digitized by 



Google 



CAMBRIDGE UNIVERSITY PRESS 

C. F. CLAY, Manager 

LONDON : FETTER LANE, E.C. 4 






NEW YORK : THE MACMILLAN CO. 

BOMBAY ) 

CALCUTTA VmACMILLAN AND CO., Ltd. 

MADRAS j 

TORONTO : THE MACMILLAN CO. OF 

CANADA, Ltd. 
TOKYO : MARUZEN-KABUSHIKLKAISHA 

ALL RIGHTS RBSBRVBD 



Digitized by 



Google 



THE CONCEPT OF NATURE 

TARNER LECTURES DELIVERED IN TRINITY COLLEGE 
NOVEMBER 19 19 



BY 



A. N. WHITEHEAD, Sc.D., F.R.S. 

FELLOW OF TRINITY COLLEGE, CAMBRIDGE, AND 

PROFESSOR OF APPLIED MATHEMATICS IN 

THE IMPERIAL COLLEGE OF SCIENCE 

AND TECHNOLOGY 



CAMBRIDGE 

AT THE UNIVERSITY PRESS 

1920 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



ju;j -G :92i 
UH 

C PREFACE 

The contents of this book were originally delivered at 
Trinity College in the autumn of 1919 as the inauguial 
course of Tamer lectures. The Tamer lectureship is 
an occasional office founded by the libeiiUity of 
Mr Edward Tamer. The duty of each of the successive 
holders of the post will be to deliver a course on *the 
Philosophy of the Sciences and the Relations or Want 
of Relations between the diflFerent Departments of 
Knowledge.' The present book embodies the endeavour 
of the first lecturer of the series to fulfil his task. 

The chapters retain their original lecture form and 
O^main as delivered with the exception of minor 
changes designed to remove obscurities of expression. 
The lecture form has the advantage of suggesting an 
audience with a definite mental background which it is 
the purpose of the lecture to modify in a specific way. 
In the presentation of a novel outlook with wide rami- 
fications a single line of communications from premises 
to conclusions is not sufficient for intelligibility. Your 
audience will construe whatever you say into conformity 
with their pre-existing outlook. For this reason the first 
two chapters and the last two chapters are essential 
for intelligibility though they hardly add to the formal 
completeness of the exposition. Their function is to 
prevent the reader from bolting up side tracks in pursuit 
of misunderstandings. The same reason dictates my 
avoidance of the existing technical terminology of 



'4k 

Digitized by VjOOQIC 



VI 



PREFACE 



philosophy. The modem natural philosophy is shot 
' through and through with the fallacy of bifurcation 
which is discussed in the second chapter of this work. 
Accordingly all its technical terms in some subtle way 
presuppose a misunderstanding of my thesis. It is 
perhaps as well to state explicitly that if the reader 
indulges in the facile vice of bifurcation not a word of 
what I have here written will be intelligible. 

The last two chapters do not properly belong to the 
special course. Chapter VIII is a lecture delivered in 
the spring of 1920 before the Chemical Society of 
the students of the Imperial College of Science and 
Technology. It has been appended here as conveniently 
summing up and applying the doctrine of the book 
for an audience with one definite type of outlook. 

This volume on *the Concept of Nature' forms a 
companion book to my previous work An Enquiry con- 
^ cerning the Principles of Natural Knowle^e. Either 
book can be read independently, but they supplement 
each other. In part the present book supplies points 
of view which were omitted from its predecessor; in 
part it traverses the same ground with an alternative 
exposition^ For one thing, mathematical notation has 
been carefully avoided, and the results of mathematical 
deductions are assumed. Some of the explanations have 
been improved and others have been set in a new light. 
On the other hand important points of the previous 
work have been omitted where I have had nothing fresh 
to say about them. On the whole, whereas the former 
work based itself chiefly on ideas directly drawn from 



Digitized by 



Google 



PREFACE vii 

mathematical physics, the present book keeps closer 
to certain fields of philosophy and physics to the ex- 
clusion of mathematics. The two works meet in their 
discussions of some details of space and time. 

I am not conscious that I have in any way altered my 
views. Some developments have been made. Those 
that are capable of a non-mathematical exposition have 
been incorporated in the text. The mathematical de- 
velopments are alluded to in the last two chapters. They 
concern the adaptation of the principles of mathematical 
physics to the form of the relativity principle which is 
here maintained. Einstein's method of using the theory 
of tensors is adopted, but the application is worked ^ 
out on different lines and from different assumptions. 
Those of his results which have been verified by 
experience are obtained also by my methods. The 
divergence chiefly arises from the fact that I do not 
accept his theory of non-imiform space or his assump- ^ 
tion as to the peculiar fundamental character of light- 
signals. I would not however be misunderstood to be 
lacking in appreciation of the value of his recent work 
on general relativity which has the high merit of first 
disclosing the way in which mathematical physics 
should proceed in the light of the principle ot relativity . 
But in my judgment he has cramped the development 
of his brilliant mathematical method in the narrow v^ 
boimds of a very doubtful philosophy. 

The object of the present volume and of its pre- 
decessor is to lay the basis of a natural philosophy which 
is the necessary presupposition of a reorganised specu- 



Digitized by 



Google 



vin PREFACE 

lative physics. The general assimilation of space and 
time which dominates the constructive thought can 
claim the independent support of Minkowski from the 
side of science and also of succeeding relativists, while on 
the side of philosophers it was, I believe, one theme of 
Prof. Alexander's GiflFord lectures delivered some few 
years ago but not yet published. He also summarised 
his conclusions on this question in a lectiu-e to the 
Aristotelian Society in the July of 1918. Since the 
publication of An Enquiry concerning the Principles of 
Natural Knofjoledge I have had the advantage of reading 
Mr C. D. Broad's Perception^ Physics ^ and Reality 
[Camb. Univ. Press, 19 14]. This valuable book has 
assisted me in my discussion in Chapter II, though I 
am unaware as to how far Mr Broad would assent to 
any of my arguments as there stated. 

It remains for me to thank the staff of the University 
Press, its compositors, its proof-readers, its clerks, and 
its managing officials, not only for the technical ex- 
cellence of their work, but for the way they have 
co-operated so as to secure my convenience. 



^ 



A. N. W. 



IMPERIAL COLLEGE OF SCIENCE 
AND TECHNOLOGY. 

Aprily 1920. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CONTENTS 

CHAP. PAGE 

I NATURE AND THOUGHT i 

-7II THEORIES OF THE BIFURCATIOJ^ OF NATURE . 26 

III TIME 49 

IV THE METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION . 74 

V SPACE AND MOTION 99 

.^Vl CONGRUENCE 120 

VII OBJECTS 143 

^\\\ SUMMARY . . .164 

IX THE ULTIMATE PHYSICAL CONCEPTS . .185 

NOTE : On the Greek Concept of a Point . . .197 

NOTE: On Significance AND Infinite Events . -197 

INDEX 199 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



THE CONCEPT OF NATURE 

CHAPTER I 

NATURE AND THOUGHT 

The subject-matter of the Tamer lectures is defined by 
the founder to be * the Philosophy of the Sciences and 
the Relations or Want of Relations between the different 
Departments of Kjiowledge/ It is fitting at the first 
lecture of this new foundation to dwell for a few moments 
on the intentions of the donor as expressed in this 
definition; and I do so the more wilUngly as I shall 
thereby be enabled to introduce the topics to which the 
present course is to be devoted. 

We are justified, I think, in taking the second clause 
of the definition as in part explanatory of the earlier 
clause. What is the philosophy of the sciences? It is 
not a bad^swer ito say that it is the study of the rela- 
tions between J^ departments of knowledge. 

Then with admirable soUcitude for the freedom of 
learning there is inserted in the definition after the 
word * relations' the phrase *or want of relations.' A 
disproof of relations between sciences would in itself 
constitute a philosophy of the sciences. But we could 
not dispense either with the earlier or the later clause. 
It is not every relation between sciences which enters 
into their philosophy. For example biology and physics 
are connected by the use of the microscope. Still, I may 
safely assert that a technical description of the uses of 
the microscope in biology is not part oj^ the philosophy 
of the sciences. Again, you cannot abandon the later 

W. N. •! 



Digitized by 



Google 



2 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

clause of the definition; namely that referring to the 
relations between the sciences, without abandoning the 

j explicit reference to an ideal in the absence of which 
philosophy must languish from lack of intrinsic interest. 

.' That ideal is the attainment of some imifying concept 

/ which will set in assigned relationships within itself all 
that there is for knowledge, for feeling, and for emotion. 
That far off ideal is the motive power of philosophic 
research; and claims allegiance even as you expel it. 

I The philosophic pluralist is a strict logician; the 
Hegelian thrives on contradictions by the help of his 
absolute; the Mohammedan divine bows before the 
creative will of Allah ; and the pragmatist will swallow 
anything so long as it * works.' 

The mention of these vast systems and of the age- 
long controversies from which they spring, warns us 
to concentrate. Our task is the simpler one of the 
philosophy of the sciences. Now a science has already 
a certain unity which is the very reason why that body 
of knowledge has been instinctively recognised as 
forming a science. The philosophy of a science is the 
endeavour to express explicitly those unifying charac- 
teristics which pervade that complex of thoughts and 
make it to be a science. The philosophy of the sciences 
— conceived as one subject — ^is the endeavour to exhibit 
all sciences as one science, or — ^in case of defeat — ^the 
disproof of such a possibility. 

Again I will make a further simplification, and con- 
fine attention to the natural sciences, that is, to the 
sciences whose subject-matter is nature. By postulating 
a common subject-matter for this group of sciences, a 
unifying philosophy of natural science has been thereby 
presupposed. 



Digitized by 



Google 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 3 

What do we mean by nature? We have to discuss 
the philosophy of natural science. Natural science is 
the science of nature. But — \ ^at is natu re? 

Nature is that which we observe in perception, 
through the senses. In this sense-perception we are 
aware of something which is not thought and which is 
self-contdned for thought. This property of being self- 
contained for thought lies at the base of natural science. 
It means that nature can be thought of as a closed 
system whose mutual relations do not require the 
expression of the fact that they are thought about. 

Thus in a sense nature is independent of thought. By - 
this statemtot no metaphysical pronouncement is in- 
tended. Whit I me^ is that we can think about nature 
without thinking about thought. I shall say that then 
we are thinking * homogeneously' about nature. 

Of course it is possible to think of nature in conjunc- 
tion with thought about the fact that nature is thought 
about. In such a case I shall say that we are thinking 
*heterogeneously' about nature. In fact during the last 
few minutes we have been thinking heterogeneously 
about nature. Natural science is exclusively concerned 
with homogeneous thoughts about nature. 

But sense-perception has in it an element which is 
not thought. It is a difficult psychological question 
whether sense-perception involves thought; and if it 
does involve thought, what is the kind of thought which 
it necessarily invplve^ Note that it has been stated 
above t^J sense-perception is an awareness of some- 
thing which is not thought. Namely, nature is not 
thought.. But this is a different question, namely that 
the fact of sense-perception has a factor which is not 
thought. I call this factor * sense-awareness.' Accord- 

I — 2 



Digitized by 



Google 



4 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

ingly the doctrine that natural science is exclusively 
concerned with homogeneous thoughts about nature 
does not immediately carry with it the conclusion that 
natural science is not concerned with sense-awareness. 

However, I do assert this further statement; namely, 
that though natural science is concerned with nature 
which is the terminus of sense-perception, it is not con- 
cerned with the sense-awareness itself. 

I repeat the main line of this argument, and expand 
it in certain directions. 

Thought about nature is different from the sense- 
perception of nature. Hence the fact of sense-perception 
has an ingredient or factor which is not thought. I call 
this ingredient sense-awareness. It is indifferent to my 
argument whether sense-perception has or has not 
thought as another ingredient. If sense-perception does 
not involve thought, then sense-awareness and sense- 
perception are identical. But the something perceived 
is perceived as an entity which is -the terminus of the 
sense-awareness, something which for thought is 
beyond the fact of that sense-awareness. Also the 
something perceived certainly does not contain other 
sense-awarenesses which are different from the sense- 
awareness which is an ingredient in that perception. 
Accordingly nature as disclosed in sense-perception is 
self-contained as against sense-awareness, in addition 
to being self-contained as against thought. I will also 
express this self-containedness of nature by saying that 
nature is closed to mind. 

This closure of nature does not carry with it any 
metaphysical doctrine of the disjunction of nature and 
mind. It means that in sense-perception natiu-e is 
disclosed as a complex of entities whose mutual relatione 



Digitized by 



Google 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 5 

are expressible in thought without reference to mind, 
that is, without reference either to sense-awareness or 
to thought. Furthermore, I do not wish to be under- 
stood as implying that sense-awareness and thought are 
the only activities which are to be ascribed to mind. 
Also I am not denying that there are relations of natural 
entities to mind or minds other than being the termini 
of the sense-awarenesses of minds. ^ Accordingly I will 
extend the meaning of the terms * homogeneous 
thoughts' and * heterogeneous thoughts' which have 
already been introduced. We are thinking * homogene- 
ously' about nature when we are thinking about it 
without thinking about thought or about sense-aware- 
ness, and we are thjpking * heteroggneously ' about 
nature when we are thinki^ ahoiit it in conjunction 
with thinking either about thought or about sense- 
awareness or about both. 

I also take the homogeneity of thought about nature] 
as excluding any reference to moral or aesthetic values 
whose apprehension is vivid in proportion to self- y 

conscious activity .(The values of nature are perhaps the \/ 
key to the metaphysical synthesis of existence. ^But such ' 
a synthesis is exactly what I am not attempting. I am 
concerned exclusively with the generalisations of widest 
scope which can be effected respecting that which is 
known to us as the direct deliverance of sense-awareness. ^ 

I have said that nature is disclosed in sense-percep- 
tion as a complex of entities. It is worth considering 
what we mean by an entity in this connexion. * Entity' • 
is simply the Latin equivalent for * thing' imless some, 
arbitrary distinction is drawn between the words for 
technical purposes. All thought has to be about things. 
We can gain some idea of this necessity of things for 



Digitized by 



Google 



6 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

thought by examination of the structxire of a proposi- 
ti(Mi. 

Let us suppose that a proposition is being communi- 
cated by an expositor to a recipient. Such a proposition 
is composed of phrases ; some of these phrases may be 
demonstrative and others may be descriptive. 

By a demonstrative phrase I mean a phrase which 
makes the recipient aware of an entity in a way which 
is independent of the particular demonstrative phrase. 
You will understand that I am here using * demonstra- 
tion' in the non-logical sense, namely in the sense in 
which a lecturer demonstrates by the aid of a frog and 
a microscope the circulation of the blood for an ele- 
mentary class of medical students. I will call such 
demonstration * speculative' demonstration, remember- 
ing Hamlet's use of the word * speculation' when he 

says. 

There is no speculation in those eyes. 

Thus a demonstrative phrase demonstrates an entity 
speculatively. It may happen that the expositor has 
meant some other entity — ^namely, the phrase demon- 
strates to him an entity which is diverse from the entity 
which it demonstrates to the recipient. In that case 
there is confusion ; for there are two diverse propositions, 
namely the proposition for the expositor and the pro- 
position for the recipient. I put this possibility aside 
as irrelevant for our discussion, though in practice it 
may be difficult for two persons to concur in the con- 
sideration of exactly the same proposition, or even for 
one person to have determined exactly the proposition 
which he is considering. 

Again the demonstrative phr^e may fail to demon- 
strate any entity. In that case there is no proposition 



Digitized by 



Google 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 7 

for the recipient. I think that we may assume (perhaps 
rashly) that the expositor knows what he means. 

A demonstratiye phrase is a gesture. It is not itself 
a constituent of the proposition, but the entity which it 
demonstrates is such a constituent. You may quarrel 
with a demonstrative phrase as in some way obnoxious 
to you; but if it demonstrates the right entity, the 
proposition is unaffected though your taste may be 
offended. This suggestiveness of the phraseology is part 
of the literary quality of the sentence which conveys 
the proposition. This is because a sentence directly 
conveys one proposition, while in its phraseology it 
suggests a penumbra of other propositions charged with 
emotional value. We are now talking of the one pro- 
position directly conveyed in any phraseology. 

This doctrine is obscured by the fact that in most 
cases what is in form a mere part of the demonstrative 
gestiu-e is in fact a part of the proposition which it is 
desired directly to convey. In such a case we will call 
the phraseology of the proposition elliptical . In ordinary 
intercourse the phraseology of nearly all propositions 
is elliptical. 

Let us take some examples. Suppose that the ex- 
positor is in London, say in Regent's Park and in 
Bedford College, the great women's college which is 
situated in that park. He is speaking in the college hall 
and he says, 

* This college building is commodious.' 

The phrase * this college building' is a demonstrative 
phrase. Now suppose the recipient answers, 

* This is not a college building, it is the lion-house in 
the Zoo.' 

Then, provided that the expositor's original proposi- 



Digitized by 



Google 



8 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

tion has not been couched in elliptical phraseology, the 
expositor sticks to his original proposition when he 
replies, 

* Anyhow, it is commodious/ 

Note that the recipient's answer accepts the specula- 
tive demonstration of the phrase * This college building/ 
He does not say, * What do you mean ? ' He accepts the 
phrase as demonstrating an entity, but declares that 
same entity to be the lion-house in the Zoo. In his 
reply, the expositor in his turn recognises the success 
of his original gesture as a speculative demonstration, 
and waives the question of the suitability of its mode of 
suggestiveness with an * anyhow/ But he is now in a 
position to repeat the original proposition with the aid 
of a demonstrative gesture robbed of any suggestiveness, 
suitable or unsuitable, by saying, 

^ It is commodious.' 

The 'it' of this final statement presupposes that 
thought has seized on the entity as a bare objective for 
consideration. 

We confine ourselves to entities disclosed in sense- 
awareness. The entity is so disclosed as a relatum in the 
complex which is nature. It idawns on an observer 
because of its relations ; but it is an objective for thought 
in its own bare individuaUty. Thought cannot proceed 
otherwise ; namely, it cannot proceed without the ideal 
bare *it' which is speculatively demonstrated. This 
setting up of the entity as a bare objective does not 
ascribe to it an existence apart from the complex in 
which it has been foimd by sense-perception. The *it' 
for thought is essentially a relatum for sense-awareness. 

The chances are that the dialogue as to the college 
building takes another form. Whatever the expositor 



Digitized by 



Google 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 9 

originally meant, he almost certainly now takes his 
former statement as couched in elliptical phraseology, 
and assumes that he was meaning, 

*This is a college building and is commodious/ 
Here the demonstrative phrase or the gesture, which 
demonstrates the *it' which is commodious, has now 
been reduced to * this ' ; and the attenuated phrase, under 
the circmnstances in which it is uttered, is sufficient for 
the purpose of correct demonstration. This brings out 
the point that the verbal form is never the whole phrase- 
ology of the proposition ; this phraseology also includes 
the general circumstancesof its production. Thus the aim 
of a demonstrative phrase is to exhibit a definite * it ' as a 
bare objective for thought; but the modus operandi of I 
a demonstrative phrase is to produce an awareness of | 
the entity as a particular relatum in an auxiliary complex, 
chosen merely for the sake of the speculative demon- 
stration and irrelevant to the proposition. For example, 
in the above dialogue, colleges and buildings, as related 
to the *it' speculatively demonstrated by the phrase 
*this college building,' set that *it' in an auxiliary 
complex which is irrelevant to the proposition 

* It is commodious.' 

Of course in language every phrase is invariably 
highly elliptical. Accordingly the sentence 

* This college building is commodious ' 
means probably 

*This college building is commodious as a college 
building.' 

But it will be found that in the above discussion 
we can replace * commodious' by * commodious as a 
college building' without altering our conclusion; 
though we can guess that the recipient, who thought 



Digitized by 



Google 



lo THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [cH. 

he wa8 in the lion-house of the Zoo, would be less likely 
to assent to 

* Anyhow, it is commodious as a college building.' 
A more obvious instance of elliptical phraseology 

arises if the expositor should address the recipient with 
the remark, 

* That criminal is your friend/ 
The recipient might answer, 

* He is my friend and you are insulting.' 
Here the recipient assumes that the phrase ^That 

criminal ' is elliptical and not merely demonstrative. In 
fact, pure demonstration is impossible though it is the 
ideal of thought. This practical impossibility of pure 
demonstration is a difficulty which arises in the com- 
lunication of thought and in the retention of thought. 
^Namely, a proposition about a particular factor in nature 
can neither be expressed to others nor retained for 
\J repeated consideration without the aid of auxiliary com- 
yplexes which are irrelevant to it. 

I now pass to descriptive phrases. The expositor says, 

* A college in Regent's Park is commodious.' 

The recipient knows Regent's Park well. The phrase 
*A college in Regent's Park' is descriptive for him. If 
its phraseology is not elliptical, which in ordinary life 
it certainly will be in some way or other, this proposition 
simply means, 

* There is an entity which is a college building in 
Regent's Park and is commodious.' 

If the recipient rejoins, 

* The lion-house in the Zoo is the only commodious 
building in Regent's Park,' 

he now contradicts the expositor, on the assumption 
that a lion-house in a Zoo is not a college building. 



jni 



Digitized by 



Google 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT u 

Thus whereas in the first dialogue the recipient 
merely quarrelled with the expositor without con- 
tradicting him, in this dialogue he contradicts him. Thus 
a descriptive phrase is part of the proposition which it 
helps to express, whereas a demonstrative phrase is not 
part of the proposition which it helps to express. 

Again the expositor might be standing in Green Park 
— ^where there are no college buildings — ^and say, 

* This college building is commodious.* 
Probably no proposition will be received by the 

recipient because the demonstrative phrase, 

*This college building* 
has failed to demonstrate owing to the absence of the 
background of sense-awareness which it presupposes. 

But if the expositor had said, 

* A college building in Green Park is conunodious,' 
the recipient would have received a proposition, but a 
false one. 

Language is usually ambiguous and it is rash to make 
general assertions as to its meanings. But phrases which 
commence with * this ' or * that ' are usually demonstrative, 
whereas phrases which conunence with *the' or *a* 
are often descriptive. In studying the theory of pro- 
positional expression it is important to remember the 
wide difference between the analogous modest words 
*this* and *that' on the one hand and *a' and *the' 
on the other hand. The sentence 

*The college building in Regent's Park is com- 
modious' 

means, according to the analysis first made by Bertrand 
Russell, the proposition, 

* There is an entity which (i) is a college building in 
Regent's Park and (ii) is commodious and (iii) is such 



Digitized by 



Google 



12 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

that any college building in Regent's Park is identical 
with it/ 

The descriptive character of the phrase * The college 
building in Regent's Park' is thus evident. Also the 
proposition is denied by the denial of any one of its 
three component clauses or by the denial of any 
combination of the component clauses. If we had 
substituted * Green Park' for * Regent's Park' a false 
proposition would have resulted. Also the erection of a 
second college in Regent's Park would make the pro- 
position false, though in ordinary life common sense 
would poUtely treat it as merely ambiguous. 

* The Iliad ' for a classical scholar is usually a demon- 
strative phrase ; for it demonstrates to him a well-known 
poem. But for the majority of mankind the phrase is 
descriptive, namely, it is synonymous with * The poem 
named "the Iliad".' 

Names may be either demonstrative or descriptive 
phrases. For example * Homer' is for us a descriptive 
phrase, namely, the word with some sUght difference 
in suggestiveness means *The man who wrote the 
Iliad.' 

This discussion illustrates that thought places before 
itself bare objectives, entities as we call them, which 
the thinking clothes by expressing their mutual rela- 
tions. Sense-a\vareness discloses fact with factors which 
are the entities for thought. The separate distinction of 
an entity in thought is not a metaphysical assertion, but 
a method of procedure necessary for the finite expression 
of individual propositions. (Apart from entities there 
could be no finite truths ; they are the means by which 
the infinitude of irrelevance is kept out of thought!) 

To sum up: the termini for thought are entities, 



Digitized by 



Google 



'N 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 13 

primarily with bare individuality, secondarily with 
properties and relations ascribed to them in the pro- 
cedure of thought ; the termini for sense-awareness are 
factors in the fact of nature, primarily relata and only 
secondarily discriminated as distinct individualities. 

No characteristic of nature which is inunediately 
posited for knowledge by sense-awareness can be 
explained. It is impenetrable by thought, in the sense 
that its peculiar essential character which enters into 
experience by sense-awareness is for thought merely the 
guardian of its individuality as a bare entity. Thus for 
thought *red' is merely a definite entity, though for 
awareness * red ' has the content of its individuaUty . The 
transition from the *red* of awareness to the *red' of 
thought is accompanied by a definite loss of content, 
namely by the transition from the factor *red' to the 
entity *red.' This loss in the transition to thought is 
compensated by the fact that thought is conununicable 
whereas sense-awareness is inconununicable. 

Thus there are three components in our knowledge of ^ 
nature, namely, fiict, factors, and entities. Fact is the 
undifferentiated terminus of sense-awareness; factors 
are termini of sense-awareness, differentiated as elements] 
of fact; entires. are factors in their function as the ter 
mini of thought. The entities thus spoken of are natural / 
entities. Thought is wider than nature, so that there are ] 
entities for thought which are not natural entities. 

When we speak of nature as a complex of related 
entities, the * complex' is fact as an entity for thought, 
to whose bare individuality is ascribed the property of 
embracing in its complexity the natural entities. It is 
our business to analyse this conception and in the course 
of the analysis space and time should appear. Evidently 




Digitized by 



Google 



14 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

the relations holding between natural entities are 
themselves natural entities^ namely they are also factors 
of fact, there for sense-awareness. Accordingly the 
structure of the natural complex can never be com- 
pleted in thought, just as the factors of fact can never 
be exhausted in sense-awareness. Unexhaustiveness is 
an essential character of our knowlec^e of nature. Also 
nature does not exhaust the matter for thought, namely 
there are thoughts which would not occur in any homo- 
geneous thinking about nature. 

The question as to whether sense-perception involves 
thought is largely verbal. If sense-perception involves 
a cognition of individuality abstracted from the actual 
position of the entity as a factor in fact, then it un- 
doubtedly does involve thought. But if it is conceived 
as sense-awareness of a factor in fact competent to 
evoke emotion and purposeful action without fiuther 
cognition, then it does not involve thought. In such a 
case the terminus of the sense-awareness is something 
for mind, but nothing for thought. The sense-perception 
of some lower forms of life may be conjectured to 
approximate to this character habitually. Also occasion- 
ally our own sense-perception in moments when thought- 
activity has been lulled to quiescence is not far off the 
attainment of this ideal limit. 

\ The process of discnmination in sense-awarenciss has 
two distinct sides. There is the discrimination of fact 
into piirts, and the discrimination of any part of fact as 
exhibiting relations to entities which are not parts of 
fact though they are ingredients in it. Namely the 
immediate fact for awareness is the whole occurrence 
of nature. It is nature as an event present for sense- 
' awareness, and essentially passing. There is no holding 



Digitized by 



Google 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 15 

nature still and looking at it. We cannot redouble our 
eflForts to improve our knowledge of the terminus of our 
present sense-awareness; it is our subsequent oppor- 
timity in subsequent sense-awareness which gains the 
benefit of our good resolution. Thus the ultimate fact j 
for sense-awareness is ml_ event. This whole event is I 
discriminated by us into partial events. We are aware | 
of an event which is our bodily life, of an event which is I 
the course of nature within this room, and of a vaguely \ 
perceived aggregate of other partial events. This is the , 
discrimination in sense-awareness of fact into parts. ! 

I shall use the term *part* in the arbitrarily limited | 
sense of an event which is part of the whole fact dis- 
closed in awareness. 

i Sense-awareness also yields to us other factors in 
nature which are not events. For example, sky-blue is 
seen as situated in a certain event. This relation of 
situation requires further discussion which is postponed 
to a later lecture. My present point is that sky-blue is 
found in nature with a definite implication in events, 
but is not an event itself. Accordingly in addition to 
events, there are other factors in nature directly dis- 
closed to us in sense^awareness. The conception in 
thought of all the factors in nature as distinct entities 
with definite natural relations is what I have in another 
place^ called the * diversification of nature.* 

There is one general conclusion to be drawn from the 
foregoing discussion. It is that the first task of a philo- 
sophy of science should be some general classification of 
the entities disclosed to us in sense-perception. 

Among the examples of entities in addition to * events * 
which we have used for the purpose of illustration are 

^ Cf. Enquiry. 



Digitized by 



Google 



t^ 



/ - 



i6 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

the buildings of Bedford College, Homer, and sky-blue. 
Evidently these are very different sorts of things ; and it 
is likely that statements which are made about one kind 
of entity will not be true about other kinds. If human 
thought proceeded with the orderly method which 
abstract logic would suggest to it, we might go further 
and say that a classification of natural entities should be 
the first step in science itself. Perhaps you will be 
inclined to reply that this classification has already been 
effected, and that science is concerned with the ad- 
ventures of material entities in space and time. 

The history of the doctrine of matter has yet to be 
"written. It is the history of the influence of Greek 
philosophy on science. That influence has issued in 
one long misconception of the metaphysical status of 
natural entities. The entity has been separated from the 
factor which is the terminus of sense-awareness. It has 
become the substratum for that factor, and the factor 
has been degraded into an attribute of the entity. In 
this way a distinction has been imported into nature 
which is in truth no distinction at all. A natural entity 
is merely a factor of fact, considered in itself. Its dis- 
connexion from the complex of fact is a mere abstraction. 
It is not the substratum of the factor, but the very 
factor itself as bared in thought. Thus what is a mere 
procedure of mind in the translation of sense-awareness 
into discursive knowledge has been transmuted into a 
fundamental character of nature. In this way matter 
has emerged as being the metaphysical substratum of 
its properties, and the course of nature is interpreted 
as the history of matter. 

Plato and Aristotle found Greek thought preoccupied 
with the quest for the simple substances in terms of 



/Google 



Digitized by' 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 17 

which the course of events could be expressed. We 
may formulate this state of mind in the question, What 
is nature made of? The answers which their genius 
gave to this question, and more particularly the con- 
cepts which underlay the terms in which they framed 
their answers, have determined the unquestioned pre- 
suppositions as to time, space and matter which have 
reigned in science. 

In Plato the forms of thought are more fluid than in 
Aristotle, and therefore, as I venture to think, the more 
valuable. Their importance consists in the evidence 
they yield of cultivated thought about nature before it 
had been forced into a uniform mould by the long 
tradition of scientific philosophy. For example in the 
Timaetis there is a presupposition, somewhat vaguely 
expressed, of a distinction between the general becoming 
of nature and the measurable time of nature. In a later 
lecture I have to distinguish between what I call the 
passage of nature and particular time-systems which 
exhibit certain characteristics of that passage. I will not 
go so far as to claim Plato in direct support of this 
doctrine, but I do think that the sections of the Timaeus 
which deal with time become clearer if my distinction 
is admitted. 

This is however a digression. I am now concerned 
with the origin of the scientific doctrine of matter in 
Greek thought. In the Timaeus Plato asserts that nature 
is made of fire and earth with air and water as inter- 
mediate between them, so that * as fire is to air so is air 
to water, and as air is to water so is water to earth.' He 
also suggests a molecular hypothesis for these four 
elements. In this hypothesis everything depends on the 
shape of the atoms ; for earth it is cubical and for fire 



Digitized by 



Google 



|8 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

it is pyramidal. To-day physicists are again discussing 
the structure of the atom, and its shape is no slight 
factor in that structure. Plato *s guesses read much more 
fantastically than does Aristotle *s systematic analysis; 
but in some ways they are more valuable. The main 
outline of his ideas is comparable with that of modem 
science. It embodies concepts which any theory of 
natural philosophy must retain and in some sense must 
explain. Aristotle asked the fundamental question, 
What do we mean by 'substance*? Here the reaction 
between his philosophy and his logic worked very 
unfortunately. In his logic, the fundamental type of 
affirmative proposition is the attribution of a predicate 
to a subject. Accordingly, amid the many current uses 
of the term * substance ' which he analyses, he emphasises 
its meaning as *the ultimate substratum which is no 
longer predicated of anything else.* 

The unquestioned acceptance of the Aristotelian logic 
has led to an ingrained tendency to postulate a sub- 
stratum for whatever is disclosed in sense-awareness, 
namely, to look below what we are aware of for the 
substance in the sense of the * concrete thing.* This 
is the origin of the modem scientific concept of matter 
and of ether, namely they are the outcome of this 
insistent habit of postulation. 

Accordingly ether has been invented by modem 
science as the substratum of the events which are 
spread through space and time beyond the reach of 
ordinary ponderable matter. Personally, I think that 
predication is a muddled notion confusing many different 
relations under a convenient common form of speech. 
For example, I hold that the relation of green to a blade 
of grass is entirely different from the relation of green 



Digitized by 



Google 



J] NATURE AND THOUGHT 19 

to the event which is the life history of that blade for 
some short period, and is different from the relation 
of the blade to that event. In a sense I call the 
event the situation of the green, and in another sense 
it is the situation of the blade. Thus in one sense the 
blade is a character or property which can be predi- 
cated of the situation, and in another sense the green 
is a' character or property of the same event which 
is also its situation. In this way the predication of 
properties veils radically diflFerent relations between 
entities. 

Accordingly * substance,* which is a correlative term 
to * predication,* shares in the ambiguity. If we are to 
look for substance anywhere, I should find it in events 
which are in som^ sense the ultimate substance of 
nature. 

Matter, in its modern scientific sense, isja retujpn^to 
the Ionian ^ort to find i^ space aad time some stuff 
which composes nature. It has a more refined signi- 
fication than the early guesses at earth and water by 
reason of a certain vague association with the Aristotelian 
idea of substance. 

Earth, water, air, fire, and matter, and finally ether 
are related in direct succession so far as concerns their 
postulated charact^s of ultimate substrata of nature. 
They bear witne^ to the imdjdng vitality of Greek 
philosophy in its search for the ultimate entities which 
are the factors of the fact disclosed in sense-awareness. 
This search is the origin of science. 

The succession of ideas starting from the crude 

guesses of the early Ionian thinkers and ending in the 

, nineteenth century ether reminds us that the scientific 

doctrine of matter is really a hybrid through which 

2 — 2 



Digitized by 



Google 



20 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

philosophy passed on its way to the refined Aristotelian 
concept of substance and to which science returned as 
it reacted against philosophic abstractions. Earth, fire, 
and water in the Ionic philosophy and the shaped 
elements in the Timaeus are comparable to the matter 
and ether of modem scientific doctrine. But substance 
represents the final philosophic concept of the sub- 
stratum which imderlies any attribute. Matter (in the 
scientific sense) is already in space and time. Thus 
matter represents the refusal to think away spatial and 
temporal characteristics and to arrive at the bare con- 
cept of an individual entity. It is this refusal which has 
caused the muddle of importing the mere procedure of 
thought into the fact of nature. The entity, bared of 
all characteristics except those of space and time, has ac- 
quired a physical status as the ultimate texture of nature ; 
so that the course of nature is conceived as being merely 
the fortunes of matter in its adventure through space. 
Thus the origin of the doctrine of matter is the out- 
come of uncritical acceptance of space and time as 
external conditions for natural existence. By this I do 
not mean that any doubt should be thrown on facts of 
space and time as ingredients in nature. What I do 
mean is *the imconscious presupposition of space and 
time as being that within which nature is set.* This is 
exactly the sort of presupposition which tinges thought 
in any reaction against the subtlety of philosophical 
criticism. My theory of the formation of the scientific 
doctrine of matter is that first philosophy illegitimately 
transformed the bare entity, which is simply an ab- 
straction necessary for the method of thought, into 
the metaphysical substratum of these factors in nature 
which in various senses are assigned to entities as their 



Digitized by 



Google 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 21 

attributes ; and that, as a second step, scientists (includ- 
ing philosophers who were scientists) in conscious or 
unconscious ignoration of philosophy presupposed this 
substratum, qua substratum for attributes, as never- 
theless in time and space. 

This is surely a muddle. The whole being of substance 
is as a substratimi for attributes. Thus time and space 
should be attributes of the substance. This they 
palpably are not, if the matter be the substance of 
nature, since it is impossible to express spatio-temporal 
truths without having recourse to relations involving 
relata other than bits of matter. I waive this point 
however, and come to another. It is not the substance 
which is in space, but the attributes. What we find in 
space are the red of the rose and the smell of the jasmine \ 
and the noise of cannon. We have all told our dentists ! 
where our toothache is. Thus spacs^^JS not >a rdation N 
between subfiteaftesi^ but betwegQ attributes. 

Thus even if you admit that the adherents of sub- 
stance can be allowed to conceive substance as matter, 
it is a fraud to slip substance into space on the plea 
that space expresses relations between substances. On ( 
the face of it space has nothing to do with substances, 
but only with their attributes. What I mean is, that 
if you choose — ^as I think wrongly — ^to construe our ex- 
perience of nature as an awareness of the attributes of 
substances, wp are by this theory precluded from finding 
any analogous direct relations between substances as 
disclosed in our experience. What we do find are 
relations between the attributes of substances. Thus if 
matter is looked on as substance in space, the space in 
which it finds itself has very little to do with the space 
of our experience. 



Digitized by 



Google 



22 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

The above argument has been expressed in terms of 
the relational theory of space. But if space be absolute 
— ^namely, if it have a being independent of things in it 
— ^the coiu-se of the argument is hardly changed. For 
things in space must have a certain fundamental relation 
to space which we will call occupation. Thus the ob- 
jection that it is the attributes which are observed as 
related to space, still holds. 

The scientific doctrine of matter is held in conjunc- 
tion with an absolute theory of time. The same argu- 
ments apply to the relations between matter and time 
as apply to the relations between space and matter. 
There is however (in the current philosophy) a diflFerence 
in the connexions of space with matter from those of 
time with matter, which I will proceed to explain. 

Space is not merely an ordering of material entities 
so that any one entity bears certain relations to other 
material entities. The occupation of space impresses a 
certain character on each material entity in itself. By 
^reason of its occupation of space matter has extension. 
By reason of its extension each bit of matter is divisible 
into parts, and each part is a nmnerically distinct 
entity from every other such part. Accordingly it 
would seem that every material entity is not really one 
entity. It is an essential multiplicity of entities. There 
seems to be no stopping this dissociation of matter into 
multiplicities short of finding each ultimate entity 
occupying one individual point. This essential multi- 
plicity of material entities is certainly not what is meant 
by science, nor does it correspond to anything disclosed 
in sense-awareness. It is absolutely necessary that at 
a certain stage in this dissociation of matter a halt should 
be called, and that the material entities thus obtained 



Digitized by 



Google 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 23 

should he treated as units. The stage of arrest may be 
arbitrary or may be set by the characteristics of nature ; 
but all reasoning in science ultimately drops its space- 
analysis and poses to itself the problem, * Here is one 
material entity, what is happening to it as a unit 
entity?* Yet this material entity is still retaining its 
extension, and as thus extended is a mere multiplicity. 
Thus there is an essential atomic property in nature 
which is independent of the dissociation of extension. 
There is something which in itself is one, and which is 
more than the logical aggregate of entities occupying 
points within the volume which the unit occupies. 
Indeed we may well be sceptical as to these ultimate 
entities at points, and doubt whether there are any such 
entities at all. They have the suspicious character that 
we are driven to accept them by abstract logic and not 
by observed fact. 

Time (in the current philosophy) does not exert the 
same disintegrating effect on matter which occupies it. 
If matter occupies a duration of time, the whole matter 
occupies every part of that duration. Thus the coimexion 
between matter and time differs from the connexion 
between matter and space as expressed in current 
scientific philosophy. There is obviously a greater 
difficulty in conceiving time as the outcome of relations 
between different bits of matter than there is in the 
analogous conception of space. At an instant distinct 
voliunes of space are occupied by distinct bits of matter. 
Accordingly there is so far no intrinsic difficulty in 
conceiving that space is merely the resultant of relations 
between the bits of matter. But in the one-dimensional 
time the same bit of matt^ occupies different portions 
of time. Accordingly time would have to be expressible 



Digitized by 



Google 



24 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

in terms of the relations of a bit of matter with itself. 
My own view is a belief in the relational theory both of 
space and of time, and of disbelief in the current form 
of the relational theory of space which exhibits bits 
of matter as the relata for spatial relations. The true 
relata are events. The distinction which I have just 
pointed out between time and space in their coimexion 
with matter makes it evident that any assimilation of 
time and space cannot proceed along the traditional line 
of taking matter as a fundamental element in space- 
formation. 

The philosophy of nature took a wrong turn during 
its development by Greek thought. This erroneous 
presupposition is vague and fluid in Plato *s Timaeus. 
The general groundwork of the thought is still un- 
committed and can be construed as merely lacking due 
explanation and the guarding emphasis. But in 
Aristotle*s exposition the current conceptions were 
hardened and made definite so as to produce a faulty 
analysis of the relation between the matter and the form 
of nature as disclosed in sense-awareness. In this phrase 
the term * matter' is not used in its scientific sense. 

I will conclude by guarding myself against a mis- 
apprehension. It is evident that the current doctrine of 
matter enshrines some fundamental law of nature. Any 
simple illustration will exemplify what I mean. For 
example, in a museum some specimen is locked securely 
in a glass case. It stays there for years : it loses its colour, 
and perhaps falls to pieces. But it is the s^e specimen ; 
and the same chemical elements and the same quantities 
of those elements are present within the case at the end 
as were present at the beginning. Again the engineer 
and the astronomer deal with the motibns of real per- 



Digitized by 



Google 



I] NATURE AND THOUGHT 25 

manences m nature. Any theory of nature which for 
one moment loses sight of these great basic facts of 
experience is simply silly. But it is permissible to point 
out that the scientific expression of these facts has be- 
come entangled in a maze of doubtful metaphysics; 
and that, when we remove the metaphysics and start 
afresh on an unprejudiced survey of nature, a new light 
is thrown on many fundamental concepts which domi- 
nate science and guide the progress of research. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CHAPTER II 

THEORIES OF THE BIFURCATION 
OF NATURE 

In my previous lecture I criticised the concept of matter 
as the substance whose attributes we perceive. This way 
of thinking of matter is, I think, the historical reason 
for its introduction into science, and is still the vague 
view of it at the background of our thoughts which 
makes the current scientific doctrine appear so obvious. 
Namely we conceive ourselves as perceiving attributes 
of things, and bits of matter are the things whose 
attributes we perceive. 

In the seventeenth century the sweet simplicity of 
this aspect of matter received a rude shock. The trans- 
mission doctrines of science were then in process of 
elaboration and by the end of the century were un- 
questioned, though their particular forms have since 
been modified. The establishment of these transmission 
theories marks a turning point in the relation between 
science and philosophy. The doctrines to which I am 
especially alluding are the theories of light and sound. 
I have no doubt that the theories had been vaguely 
floating about before as obvious suggestions of common 
sense; for nothing in thought is ever completely new. 
But at that epoch they were systematised and made 
exact, and their complete consequences were ruthlessly 
deduced. It is the establishment of this procedure of 
taking the consequences seriously which marks the 
real discovery of a theory. Systematic doctrines of 
light and sound as being something proceeding from 



Digitized by 



Google 



CH.ii] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 27 

the emitting bodies were definitely established, and in 
particular the connexion of light with colour was laid 
bare by Newton. 

The result completely destroyed the simplicity of the j 
* substance and attribute^ theory of perception. What 
we see depends on the light entering the eye. Further- 
more we do not even perceive what enters the eye. The 
things transmitted are waves or — as Newton thought— | 
minute particles, and the things seen are colours. Locfee ) ^ 
met this difficulty by a theory of primary and secondarjr^J 
qualities. Namely, there are some attributes of the \ 
matter which we do perceive. These are the primary 
qualities, and there are other things which we perceive, 
such as colours, which are not attributes of matter, but 
are perceived by us as if they were *such attributes. 
These are the secondary qualities of matter. 

Why should we perceive secondary qualities? It 
seems an extremely unfortunate arrangement that we 
should perceive a lot of things that are not there. Yet 
this is what the theory of secondary qualities in fact 
comes to. There is now reigning in philosophy and in ^ 
science an apathetic acquiescence in the conclusion that \ 
no coherent account can be given of nature as it is 
disclosed to us in sense-awareness, without dragging in 
its relations to mind. The modem account of nature is 
not, as it should be, merely an account of what the mind ■ 
knows of nature ; but it is also confused with an account 
of what nature does to the mind. The result has been \ 
disastrous both to science and to philosophy, but chiefly 
to philosophy. It has transformed the grand question 
of the relations between nature and mind into the petty 
form of the interaction between the human body and 
mind. 



Digitized by 



Google 



28 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

Berkeley*s polemic against matter was based on this 
confusion introduced by the transmission theory of 
light. He advocated, rightly as I think, the abandon- 
ment of the doctrine of matter in its present form. He 
had however nothing to put in its place except a theory 
of the relation of finite minds to the divine mind. 

But we are endeavouring in these lectures to limit 
ourselves to nature itself and not to travel beyond 
entities which are disclosed in sense-awareness. 

Percipience in itself is taken for granted. We consider 
indeed conditions for percipience, but only so far as 
those conditions are among the disclosures of percep- 
tion. We leave to metaphysics the synthesis of the 
knower and the known. Some further explanation and 
defence of this position is necessary, if the line of argu- 
ment of these lectures is to be comprehensible. 

The immediate thesis for discussion is that any meta- 
physical interpretation is an illegitimate importation into 
the philosophy of natural science. By a metaphysical 
interpretation I mean any discussion of the how (beyond 
nature) and of the why (beyond nature) of thought and 
sense-awareness. In the philosophy of science we seek 
the general notions which apply to nature, namely, to 
what we iare aware of in perception. It is the philosophy 
of the thing perceived, and it should not be confused 
with the metaphysics of reality of which the scope 
embraces both perceiver and perceived. No perplexity 
concerning the object of knowledge can be solved by 
saying that there is a mind knowing it^. 

In other words, the ground taken is this: sense- 
awareness is an awareness of something. What then is 
the general character of that something of which we 
1 Cf. Enquiry y preface. 



Digitized toy Google l 



II] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 29 

are aware? We do not ask about the percipient or 
about the process, but about the perceived. I emphasise 
this point because discussions on the philosophy of 
science are usually extremely metaphysical — ^in my 
opinion, to the great detriment of the subject. 

The recourse to metaphysics is like throwing a match 
into the powder magazine* It blows up the whole arena. ' 
This is exactly what scientific philosophers do when 
they are driven into a corner and convicted of inco- 
herence. They at once drag in the mind and talk of 
entiti,es in the mind or out of the mind as the case may 
be. For natural philosophy everything perceived is in 
nature. We may not pick and choose. For us the red 
glow of the sunset should be as much part of nature as 
are the molecules and electric waves by which men of 
science would explain the phenomenon. It is for natural 
philosophy to analyse how these various elements of 
nature are connected. 

In making this demand I conceive myself as adopting 
our immediate instinctive attitude towards perceptual 
knowledge which is only abandoned under the influence 
of theory. We are instinctively willing to believe that by 
due attention, more can be found in nature than that 
which is observed at first sight. But we will not be 
content with less. What we ask from the philosophy of 
science is some account of the coherence of things 
perceptively known. 

This means a refusal to countenance any theory of 
psychic additions to the object known in perception./ 
Fqr^ample, what is given in perception is the green 
grass. This is an object which we know as an ingredient 
in nature. The theory of psychic additions would treat : 
the greenness as a psychic addition furnished by the 



Digitized by 



Google 



30 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

perceiving mind, and would leave to nature merely the 
molecules and the radiant energy which influence the 
mind towards that perception. My argument is that this 
dragging in of the mind as making additions of its own 
to the thing posited for knowledge by sense-awareness 
is merely a way of shirking the problem of natural 
philosophy. That problem is to discuss the relations 
inter se of things known, abstracted from the bare fact 
that they are known. Natural philosophy should never 
ask, what is in the mind and what is in nature. To do so 
is a confession that it has failed to express relations 
between things perceptively known, namely to express 
those natural relations whose expression is natural 
philosophy. It may be that the task is too hard for us, 
that the relations are too complex and too various for 
our apprehension, or are too trivial to be worth the 
trouble of exposition. It is indeed true that we have 
gone but a very small way in the adequate formulation 
of such relations. But at least do not let us endeavour 
to conceal failure under a theory of the byplay of the 
perceiving mind. 

What I am essentially protesting against is the bi- 
furcation of nature into two systems of reaUty, which, 
in so far as they are real, are real in different sensfe. 
One reality would be the entities such as electrons which 
are the study of speculative physics. This would be the 
reaUty which is there for knowledge ; although on this 
theory it is never known. For what is known is the 
other sort of reaUty, which is the byplay of the mind. 
Thus there would be two natures, one is the conjecture 
and the other is the dream. 

Another way of phrasing this theory which I am 
arguing against is to bifurcate nature into two divisions. 



Digitized by 



Google 



II] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 31 

namely into the nature apprehended in awareness and p 
the nature which is the cause of awarenessi The nature 
which is the fact apprehended in awareness holds within 
it the greenness of the trees, the song of the birds, the 
warmth of the sun, the hardness of the chairs, and the 
feel of the velvet. The nature which is the cause of 
awareness is the conjectured system of molecules and 
electrons which so affects the mind as to produce the 
awareness of apparent nature. The meeting point of 
these two natures is the mind, the causal nature being 
influent and the apparent nature being effluent. 

There are four questions which at once suggest 
themselves for discussion in connexion with this bi- 
furcation theory of nature. They concern (i) causality, 
(ii) time, (iii) space, and (iv) delusions. These questions 
are not really separable. They merely constitute four 
distinct starting points from which to enter upon the 
discussion of the theory. 

Causal nature is the influence on the mind which is\ 
the cause of the effluence of apparent nature from the^ 
mind. This conception of causal nature is not to be 
confused with the distinct conception of one part of 
nature as being the cause of another part. For example, 
th^ burning of the fire and the passage of heat from it 
through intervening space is the cause of the. body, its 
nerves and its brain, iFunctioning in certain ways. But 
this is not an action of nature on the mind. It is an 
interaction within nature. The causation involved in this 
interaction is causation in a diff^erent sense from the 
influence of this system of bodily interactions within 
nature on the alien mind which thereupon perceives 
redness and warmth. 

The bifurcation theory is Han attempt to exhibit 



Digitized by 



Google 



3Z THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

natural science as an investigation of the cause of the 
fact of knowledge. Namely, it is an attempt to exhibit 
apparent nature as an effluent from the mind because of 
causal nature. The whole notion is partiy based on the 
implicit assumption that the mind can only know that 
which it has itself produced and retains in some sense 
within itself, though it requires an exterior reason both 
as originating and as determining the character of its 
activity. But in considering knowledge we shoidd wipe 
out all these spatial metaphors, such as * within the 
mind' and * without the mind.' Knowledge is ultimate. 
There can be no explanation of the * why ' of knowledge ; 
we can only describe the * what ' of knowledge. Namely 
we can analyse the content and its internal relations, 
but we cannot explain why there is knowledge. Thus 
causal nature is a metaphysical chimera ; though there is 
need of a metaphysics whose scope transcends the 
limitation to nature. The object of such a metaphysical 
science is not to explain knowledge, but exhibit in its 
utmost completeness our concept of reality. 
^ Howev er, we must admit that the causaUty theory of 
(nature has its strong suit. The reason why the bifurca- 
ion of nature is always creeping back into scientific 
'philosophy is the extreme difficulty of exhibiting the 
perceived redness and warmth of the fire in one system 
of relations with the agitated molecules of carbon and 
oxygen, with the radiant energy from them, and with the 
various functionings of the material body. Unless we 
produce the all-embracing relations, we are faced with a 
bifurcated nature ; namely, warmth and redness on one 
; side, and molecules, electrons and ether on the other 
side. Then the two factors are explained as being re- 
spectively the cause and the mind's reaction to the cause. 



Digitized by 



Google 



n] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 33 

Time and space would appear to provide these all- 
embracing relations which the advocates of the philo- 
sophy of the miity of nature require. The perceived 
redness of the fire and the warmth are definitely related 
in time and in space to the molecules of the fire and the 
molecules of the body. 

It is hardly more than a pardonable exaggeration to 
say that the determination of the meaning of nature 
reduces itself principally to the discussion of the charac- 
ter of time and the character of space. In succeeding 
lectiires I shall explain my own view of time and space. 
I shall endeavour to show that they are abstractions . 
from more concrete elements of nature, namely, from 
events. The discussion of the details of the process of 
abstraction will exhibit time and space as interconnected, 
and will finally lead us to the sort of connexions between 
their measurements which occur in the modem theory 
of electromagnetic relativity. But this is anticipating 
our subsequent line of development. At present I wish 
to consider how the ordinary views of time and space 
help, or fail to help, in unifying our conception of nature. 

First, consider the absolute theories of time and \ 
space. We are to consider each, namely both time and 
space, to be a separate and independent system of 
entities, each system known to us in itself and for itself 
concurrently with our knowledge of the events of 
nature. Xi^ie is the ordered succession of durationles^y 
instants ; and these instants are known to us merely as 
the relata in the serial relation which is the time- 
ordering relation, and the time-ordering relation is 
merely known to us as relating the instante. Namely, 
the relation and the instants are jointly known to us in 
our apprehension of time, each implying the other. 
W.N. / v.^(>....^^<' ^ ^ 3 



rV ^ ' Digitized by 



Google 



34 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

This is the absolute theory of time. Frankly, I con- 
fess that it seems to me to be very unplausible. I cannot 
in my own knowledge find anything corresponding to 
the bare time of the absolute theory. Time is known to 
me as an abstraction from the passage of events. The 
fundamental fact which renders this abstraction possible 
^ is the passing of nature, its development, its creative 
advance, and combined with this fact is another charac- 
teristic of nature, namely the extensive relation between 
events. These two facts, namely the passage of events 
and the extension of events over each other, are in my 
opinion the qualities from which time and space originate 
as abstractions. But this is anticipating my own later 
speculations. \ 

*" Meanwhile, returning to the absolute theory, we are 
to suppose that time is known to us independently of 
any events in time. What happens in time occupies time. 
This relation of events to the time occupied, namely 
this relation of occupation, is a fundamental relation of 
nature to time. Thus the theory requires that we are 
aware of two fundamental relations, the time-ordering 
relation between instants, and the time-occupation 
relation between instants of time and states of nature 
which happen at those instants. 

There are two considerations which lend powerful 
support to the reigning theory of absolute time. In 
le firet place time extends beyond nature. Our thoughts 
re in time. Accordingly it seems impossible to derive 
time merely from relations between elements of nature. 
For in that case temporal relations could not relate 
thoughts. Thus, to use a metaphor, time would ap- 
parently have deeper roots in reality than has nature. 
For we can imagine thoughts related in time without 



^e 



Digitized by 



Google 



II] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 35 

any perception of nature. For example we can imagine 
one of Milton's angels with thoughts succeeding each 
other in time, who does not happen to have noticed 
that the Almighty has created space and set therein a 
material universe. As a matter of fact I think that Milton 
set space on the same absolute level as time. But that 
need not disturb the illustration. In the second place , 
it is difficult to derive the true serial character of time ^ 
from the relative theory. Each instant is irrevocable. It ' 
can never recu^ by the very character of time. But if 
on the relative theory an instant of time is simply the 
state of nature at that time, and the time-ordering 
relation is simply the relation between such states, then 
the irrevocableness of time would seem to mean that 
an actual state of all nature can never return. I admit 
it seems unlikely that there should ever be such a 1 
recurrence down to the smallest particular. But | 
extreme unlikeliness is not the point. Our ignorance is 
so abysmal that our judgments of likeliness and un- 
likeliness of future events hardly count. The real point 
is that the exact recurrence of a state of nature seems 
merely unlikely, while the recurrence of an instant of 
time violates our whole concept of time-order. The 
instants of time which have passed, are passed, and can 
never be again. 

Any alternative theory of time must reckon with these 
two considerations which are buttresses of the absolute 
theory. But I will not now continue their discussion. 

The absolute theory of space is analogous to the 
corresponding theory of time, but the reasons for its 
maintenance are weaker. Space, on this theory, is a 
system of extensionless points which are the relata in 
space-ordering relations which can technically be com- 

3—2 



Digitized by 



Google 



36 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

bined into one relation. This relation does not arrange 
the points in one linear series analogously to the simple 
method of the time-ordering relation for instants. The 
essential logical characteristics of this relation from 
which all the properties of space spring are expressed 
by mathematicians in the axioms of geometry. From 
these axioms^ as framed by modem mathematicians 
the whole science of geometry can be deduced by the 
strictest logical reasoning. The details of these axioms 
do not now concern us. The points and the relations 
are jointly known to us in our apprehension of space, 
each implying the other. What happens in space, 
occupies space. This relation of occupation is not 
usually stated for events but for objects. For example, 
Pompey*s statue w;ould be said to occupy space, but not 
the event which was the assassination of Julius Caesar. 
In this I think that ordinary usage is unfortunate, and 
/ I hold that the relations of events to space and to time 
i are in all respects analogous. But here I am intruding 
my own opinions which are to be discussed in subse- 
/* quent lectures. Thus the theory of absolute space 
requires that we are aware of two fundamental relations, 
the space-ordering relation, which holds between points, 
and the space-occupation relation between points of 
space and material objects. 

This theory lacks the two main supports of the corre- 
sponding theory of absolute time. In the first place space 
does not extend beyond nature in the sense that time 
seems to do. Our thoughts do not seem to occupy space 
in quite the same intimate way in which they occupy 
time. For example, I have been thinking in a room, and 

^ Cf . (for example) Projective Geometry by Veblen and Young, 
vol. i. 1910, vol. ii. 1917, Ginn and Company, Boston, U.S.A. 



Digitized by 



Google 



II] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 37 

^to that extent my thoughts are in space. But it seems 
nonsense to ask how much volume of the room they 
occupied, whether it was a cubic foot or a cubic inch; 
whereas the same thoughts occupy a determinate dura- 
tion of time, say, from eleven to twelve on a certain date. 

Thus whereas the relations of a relative theory of ^ 
time are required to relate thoughts, it does not seem so 
obvious that the relations of a relative theory of space 
are required to relate them. The connexion of thought 
with space seems to have a certain character of indirect- 
ness which appears to be lacking in the connexion of 
thought with time. 

Again the irrevocableness of time does not seem to . 
have any parallel for space. Space, on the relative theory, ^ 
is the outcome of certain relations between objects 
commonly said to be in space ; and whenever there are 
the objects, so related, there is the space. No difficulty 
seems to arise like that of the inconvenient instants of 
time which might conceivably turn up again when we 
thought that we had done with them. 

The absol ute theory of space is not now generally 
popular. The knowledge of bare space, as a system of 
entities known to us in itself and for itself independently 
of our knowledge of the events in nature, does not seem 
to correspond to anything in our experience. Space, 
like time, would appear to be an abstraction from events . 
According to my own theory it only differentiates 
itself from time at a somewhat developed stage of the 
abstractive process. The more usual way of expressing 
the rglatig nal theory of space would be to consider space ^ 
as an abstraction from the relations between material) 
objects. 

Suppose now we assume absolute time and absolute 



Digitized by 



Google 



38 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

space. What bearing has this assumption on the con- 
cept of nature as bifurcated into causal nature and 
apparent nature? Undoubtedly the separation between 
the two natures is now greatly naitigated. We can pro- 
vide them with two systems of relations in conunon ; for 
both natures can be presumed to occupy the same space 
and the same time. The theory now is this : Causal events 
occupy certain periods of the absolute time and occupy 
certain positions of the absolute space. These events 
influence a mind which thereupon perceives* certain 
apparent events which occupy certain periods in the * 
absolute time and occupy certain positions of the 
absolute space; and the periods and positions occupied 
by the apparent events bear a determinate relation to 
the periods and positions occupied by the causal events. 

Furthermore definite causal events produce for the 
mind definite apparent events. Delusions are apparent 
events which appear in temporal periods and spatial 
positions without the intervention of these causal 
events which are proper for influencing of the mind to 
their perception. 

The whole theory is perfectly logical. In these dis- 
cussions we cannot hope to drive an unsound theory to 
a logical contradiction. A reasoner, apart from jnere 
slips, only involves himself in a contradiction when he 
is shying at a reductio ad absurdum. The substantial^ 
reason for rejecting a philosophical theory is the * ab- 
surdum* to which it reduces us. In the case of the 
philosophy of natural science the * absurdum* can only 
be that our perceptual knowledge has not the character 
assigned to it by the theory. If our opponent aflSums 
that his knowledge has that character, we can only — 
after making doubly sure that we understand each 



Digitized by 



Google 



II] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 39 

other — agree to diflFer. Accordingly the first duty of 
an expositor in stating a theory in which he disbelieves 
is to exhibit it as logical. It is not there where his 
trouble Ues. 

Let me summarise the previously stated objections \ \ 
to this theory of nature. In the first place it seeks for 
the cause of the knowledge of the thing known instead 
of seeking for the character of the thing known: 
secondly it assumes a knowledge of time in itself apart 
from events related in time : thirdly it assumes a know- 
ledge of space in itself apart from events related in 
space. There are in addition to these objections other 
flaws in the theory. 

Some light is thrown on the artificial status of causal 
nature in this theory by asking, why causal nature is 
presmned to occupy time and space. This really raises 
the fundamental question as to what characteristics 
causal nature should have in common with apparent 
nature. Why — on this theory — should the cause which 
influences the mind to perception have any character- 
istics in conunon with the effluent apparent nature? 
In particular, why should it be in space? Why should 
it be in time? And more generally, What do we 
know about mind which would allow us to infer any 
particular characteristics of a cause which should in- 
fluence mind to particular eff^ects? 

The transcendence of time beyond nature gives some 
slight reason for presuming that causal nature should 
occupy time. For if the mind occupies periods of time, 
there woidd seem to be some vague reason for assuming 
that influencing causes occupy the same periods of 
time, or at least, occupy periods which are strictly 
related to the mental periods. But if the mind does not 



Digitized by 



Google 



40 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [cH. 

occupy volumes of space, there seems to be no reason 
why causal nature should occupy any volumes of space. 
Thus space would seem to be merely apparent in the 
same sense as apparent nature is merely apparent. 
Accordingly if science is really investigating causes 
which operate on the mind, it would seem to be entirely 
on the wrong tack in presuming that the causes which 
it is seeking for have spatial relations. Fiuthermore 
there is nothing else in our kno^edge analogous to 
these causes which influence the mind to perception. 
Accordingly, beyond the rashly presumed fact that they 
occupy time, there is really no ground by which we can 
determine any point of their character. They must 
remain for ever unknown. 

Now I assume as an axiom that science is not a 
fairy tale. It is not engaged in decking out unknowable 
entities with arbitrary and fantastic properties. What 
then is it that science is doing, granting that it is 
eflFecting something of importance? My answer is that 
it is determining the character of things known, namely 
the character of apparent nature. But we may drop the 
term * apparent*; for there is but one nature, namely 
the nature which is before us in perceptual knowledge. 
The characters which science discerns in nature are 
subtle characters, not obvious at first sight. They are 
relations of relations and characters of characters. But 
for all their subtlety they are stamped with a certain 
simplicity which makes their consideration essential in 
unravelling the complex relations between characters 
of more perceptive insistence. 

The fact that the bifurcation of nature into causal and 
apparent components does not express what we mean 
by our knowledge is brought before us when we realise 



Digitized by 



Google 



II] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 41 

our thoughts in any discussion of the causes of our 
perceptions. For example, the fire is burning and we 
see a red coal. This is explained in science by radiant 
energy from the coal entering our eyes. But in seeking 
for such an explanation we are not asking what are the 
sort of occurrences which are fitted to cause a mind to 
see red. The chain of causation is entirely different. The 
mind is cut out altogether. The real question is, When 
red is found in nature, what else is found there also? 
Namely we are asking for an analysis of the accom- 
paniments in nature of the discovery of red in nature. 
In a subsequent lecture I shall expand this line of 
thought. I simply draw attention to it here in order to 
point out that the wave-theory of light has not been 
adopted because waves are just the sort of things which 
ought to make a mind perceive colours. This is no part 
of the evidence which has ever been adduced for the 
wave-theory, yet on the causal theory of perception, it 
is really the only relevant part. In other words, science . 
is not discussing the causes of knowledge, but the/.i 
coherence of knowledge. The understanding which is / 
sought by science is an understanding of relations 
within nature. 

So far I have discussed the bifurcation of nature in 
connexion with the theories of absolute time and of 
absolute space. My reason has been that the intro- 
duction of the relational theories only weakens the case 
for bifurcation, and I wished to discuss this case on 
its strongest grounds. 

For instance, suppose we adopt the relational theory 
of space. Then the space in which apparent nature is set 
is the expression of certain relations between the appa- 
rent objects. It is a set of apparent relations between 



Digitized by 



Google 



4Z THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

^ apparent relata. Apparent nature is the dream, and the 
f apparent relations of space are dream relations, and the 
^pace is the dream space. Similarly the space in which 
causal nature is set is the expression of certain rela- 
tions between the causal objects. It is the expression 
of certain facts about the causal activity which is going 
on behind the scenes. Accordingly causal space belongs 
to a different order of reality to apparent space. Hence 
there is no pointwise connexion between the two and 
it is meaningless to say that the molecules of the grass 
are in any place which has a determinate spatial relation 
to the place occupied by the grass which we see. This 
conclusion is very paradoxical and makes nonsense of 
all scientific phraseology. The case is even worse if we 
admit the relativity of time. For the same argiunents 
apply, and break up time into the dream time and causal 
time which belong to different orders of reality. 

I have however been discussing an extreme form of 
the bifurcation theory. It is, as I think, the most 
defensible form. But its very definiteness makes it the 
more evidently obnoxious to criticism. The intermediate 
form allows that the nature we are discussing is always 
the nature directly known, and so far it rejects the 
bifurcation theory. But it holds that there are psychic 
additions to nature as thus known, and that these 
additions are in no proper sense part of nature. For 
example, we perceive the red billiard ball at its proper 
time, in its proper place, with its proper motion, with 
its proper hardness, and with its proper inertia. But 
its redness and its warmth, and the sound of the click 
as a cannon is made off it are psychic additions, namely^ 
secondary qualities which are only the mind's way 
of perceiving nature. This is not only the vaguely 



Digitized by 



Google 



II] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 43 

prevalent theory, but is, I believe, the historical form of 
the bifurcation theory in so far as it is derived frorn^ 
philosophy. I shall call it the theOTyofpsyehicaddideRs. 

This theory of psychic additions is a sound common- 
sense theory which lays immense stress on the obvious 
reality of time, space, solidity and inertia, but distrusts 
the minor artistic additions of colour, warmth and sound. 

The theory is the outcome of common-sense in 
retreat. It arose in an epoch when the transmission 
theories of science were being elaborated. For example, 
colour is the result of a transmission from the material 
object to the perceiver's eye; and what is thus trans- 
mitted is not colour. Thus colour is not part of the 
reality of the material object. Similarly for the same 
reason sounds evaporate from nature. Also warmth is 
due to the transfer of something which is not tempera- 
ture. Thus we are left with spatio-temporal positions, 
and what I may term the * pushiness * of the body. This 
lands us to eighteenth and nineteenth centiuy material- 
ism, namely, the belief that what is real in nature is 
matter, in time and in space. and with inertia. 

Evidently a distinction in quality has been presup- 
posed separating off some perceptions due to touch from 
other perceptions. These touch-perceptions are per- 
ceptions of the real inertia, whereas the other perceptions 
are psychic additions which must be explained on the 
causal theory. This distinction is the product of an 
epoch in which physical science has got ahead of medical 
pathology and of physiology. Perceptions of push are 
just as much the outcome of transmission as are per- 
ceptions of colour. When colour is perceived the nerves 
of the body are excited in one way and transmit their 
message towards the brain, and when push is perceived 



Digitized by 



Google 



44 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE' [ch. 

other nerves of the body are excited in another way and 
^ transmit their message towards the brain. The message 
of the one set is not the conveyance of colour, and the 
message of the other set is not the conveyance of push. 
But in one case colour is perceived tod in the other 
case the push due to the object. If you snip certain 
nervfes, there is an end to the perception of colour ; and 
if you snip certain other nerves, there is an end to the 
perception of push. It would appear therefore that any 
\ treasons which should remove colour from the reality of 
\ "^uj^ij^ I nature should also operate to remove inertia. 
j,^ v^*") Thus the attempted bifurcation of apparent nature 
into two parts of which one part is both causal for its 
own appearance and for the appearance of the other 
part, which is purely apparent, fails owing to the failure 
to establish any fundamental distinction between our 
ways of knowing about the two parts of nature as thus 
partitioned. I am not denying that the feeling of 
muscular effort historically led to the formulation of 
the concept of force. But this historical fact does not 
warrant us in assigning a superior reality in nature to 
material inertia over colour or sound. So far as reality 
is concerned all our sense-perceptions are in the same 
boat, and must be treated on the same principle. The 
evenness of treatment is exactly what this compromise 
theory fails to achieve. 

The bifurcation theory however dies hard. The 
reason is that there really is a difficulty to be faced in 
relating within the same system of entities the redness 
of the fire with the agitation of the molecules. In another 
lecture I will give my own explanation of the origin of 
^the difficulty and of its solution. 

Another favourite solution, the most attenuated form 



Digitized by 



Google 



n] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 45 

which the bifurcation theory assumes, is to maintain 
that the molecules and ether of science are pxirely 
conceptual. Thus there is but one nature, namely 
apparent nature, and atoms and ether are merely names 
for logical terms in conceptual formulae of calculation. 
But what is a formula of calculation? It is presum- 
ably a statement that something or other is true for 
natural occurrences. Take the simplest of all formulae. 
Two and two make four. This — so far as it applies to 
nature — ^asserts that if you take two natural entities, 
and then again two other natural entities, the combined 
class contains foiir natural entities. Such formulae 
which are true for any entities cannot result in the 
production of the concepts of atoms. Then again there 
are formulae which assert that there are entities in 
nature with such and such special properties, say, for 
example, with the properties of the atoms of hydrogen. 
Now if there are no such entities, I fail to see how 
any statements about them can apply to nature. For 
example, the assertion that there is green cheese in the 
moon cannot be a premiss in any deduction of scientific 
importance, unless indeed the presence of green cheese 
in the moon has been verified by experiment. The 
current answer to these objections is that, though atoms 
are merely conceptual, yet they are an interesting and 
picturesque way of saying something else which is true 
of nature. But surely if it is something else that you 
mean, for heaven's sake say it. Do away with this 
elaborate machinery of a conceptual nature which 
consists of assertions about things which don't exist in 
order to convey truths about things which do exist. 
I am maintaining the obvious position that scientific 
laws, if they are true, are statements about entities 



Digitiaed by 



Google 



/ 



46 



THE CONCEPT OF NATURE 



[CH. 



which we obtain knowledge of as being in nature; and 
that, if the entities to which the statements ref^ are 
not to be found in nature, the statements about them 
have no relevance to any purely natural occurrence. 
Thus the molecules and electrons of scientific theory 
are, so far as science has correctly formulated its laws, 
each of them factors to be foimd in nature. The elec- 
trons are only hypothetical in so far as we are not quite 
certain that the electron theory is true. But theit hypo- 
thetical character does not arise from the essential nature 
of the theory in itself after its truth has been granted. 

Thus at the end of this somewhat complex discussion, 
we return to the position which was affirmed at its 
beginning. The primary task of a philosophy of natural 
science is to elucidate the concept of nature, considered 
as one complex fact for knowledge, to exhibit the funda- 
mental entities and the fundamental relations between 
entities in terms of which all laws of nature have to be 
stated, and to secure that the entities and relations thus 
exhibited are adequate for the expression of all the 
relations between entities which occxir in nature. 

The third requisite, namely that of adequacy, is the 
one over which all the difficulty occurs. The ultimate 
data of science are commonly assumed to be time, space, 
material, qualities of material, and relations between 
material objects. But data as they occur in the scientific 
laws do not relate all the entities which present them- 
selves in our perception of nature. For example, the 
wave-theory of light is an excellent well-established 
theory; but unfortunately it leaves out colour as per- 
ceived. Thus the perceived redness — or, other colour — 
has to be cut out of natxire and made into the reaction 
of the mind under the impulse of the actual events of 



Digitized by 



Google 



n] THEORIES OF BIFURCATION OF NATURE 47 

nature. In other words this concept of the fundamental 
relations within nature is inadequate. Thus we have 
to bend oiir energies to the Qaunciation of adequate 
concepts. 

But in so doing, are we not in fact endeavouring to 
solve a metaphysical problem? I do not think so. We 
are merely endeavouring to exhibit the type of relations 
which hold between the entities which we in fact per- 
ceive as in nature. We are not called on to make any 
pronoimcement as to the psychological relation of 
subjects to objects or as to tiie status of either in the 
reahn of reality. It is true that the issue of oxir endeavour 
may provide material which is relevant evidence for a 
discussion on that question. It can hardly fail to do so. 
But it is only evidence, and is not itself the metaphysical 
discussion. In order to make clear the character of this 
further discussion which is out of our ken, I will set 
before you two quotations. One is from Schelling and 
I extract the quotation from the work of the Russian 
philosopher Lossky which has recently been so ex- 
cellently translated into English ^ — ' In the " Philosophy 
of Nature " I considered the subject-object called nature 
in its activity of self-constructing. In order to imder- 
stand it, we must rise to an intellectual intuition of nature. 
The empiricist does not rise thereto, and for this reason 
in all his explanations it is always he himself that proves 
to be constructing nature. It is no wonder, then, that 
his construction and that which was to be constructed 
so seldom coincide. A Natur-phihsaph raises nature to 
independence, and makes it construct itself, and he 
never feels, therefore, the necessity of opposing nature 

^ The Intuitive Basis of Knowledge^ by N. O. Lossky, transl. by 
Mrs Duddington, Macmillan and Co., 1919. 



Digitized by 



Google 



48 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch.ii 

as constructed {i.e. as experience) to real nature, or of 
correcting the one by means of the other/ 

The other quotation is from a paper read by the Dean 
of St PauPs before the Aristotelian Society in May of 
1919. Dr Inge's paper is entitled *Platonism and 
Human ImmortaUty / and in it there occurs the following 
statement: *To sum up. The Platonic doctrine of im- 
mortality rests on the independence of the spiritual world. 
The spiritual world is not a world of unrealised ideals, 
over against a real world of unspiritual fact. It is, on 
the contrary, the real world, of which we have a true 
though very incomplete knowledge, over against a world 
of common experience which, as a complete whole, is 
not real, since it is compacted out of miscellaneous data, 
not all on the same level, by the help of the imagination. 
There is no world corresponding to the world of our 
common experience. Nature makes abstractions for us, 
deciding what range of vibrations we are to see and hear, 
what things we are to notice and remember.* 

I have cited these statements because both of them 
deal with topics which, though they lie outside the range 
of our discussion, are always being confused with it. 
The reason is that they lie proximate to our field ;of 
thought, and are topics which are of burning interest 
to the metaphysically minded. It is difficult for a 
philosopher to realise that anyone really is confining 
his discussion within the limits that I have set before 
you. The boundary is set up just where he is beginning 
to get excited. But I submit to you that among the 
necessary prolegomena for philosophy and for natural 
science is a thorough imderstanding of the types of 
entities, and types of relations among those entities, 
which are disclosed to us in our perceptions of nature. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CHAPTER III 

TIME 

The two previous lectiires of this course have been 
mainly critical. In the present lecture I propose to 
enter upon a survey of the kinds of entities which are 
posited for knowledge in sense-awareness. My purpose 
is to investigate the sorts of relations which these entities 
of various kinds can bear to each other. A classification 
of natiiral entities is the beginning of natural philosophy. 
To-day we commence with the consideration of Time. 

In the first place there is posited for us a general 
fact: namely, something is going on; there is an oc- 
currence for definition. 

This general fact at once yields for our apprehension 
two factors, which I will name, the * discerned' and the 
^ discernible.' The discerned is comprised of those 
elements of the general fact which are discriminated 
with their own individual peculiarities. It is the field 
directly perceived. But the entities of this field have 
relations to other entities which are not particularly 
discriminated in this individual way. These other 
entities are known merely as the relata in relation to the 
entities of the discerned field. Such an entity is merely 
a 'something' which has such-and-such definite rela- 
tions to some definite entity or entities in the discerned 
field. As being thus related, they are — owing to the 
particular character of these relations — ^known as 
elements of the general fact which is going on. But we 
are not aware of them except as entities fulfilling the 
functions of relata in these relations. 

Thus the complete general fact, posited as occurring, 
comprises both sets of entities, namely the entities 



Digitized by 



Google 



50 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

perceived in their own individuality and other entities 
merely apprehended as relata without further definition. 
This complete general fact is the discernible and it 
comprises the discerned. The discernible is all nature as 
disclosed in that sense-awareness, and extends beyond 
and comprises all of nature as actually discriminated 
or discerned in that sense-awareness. The discerning 
or discrimination of nature is a peculiar awareness of 
special factors in nature in respect to their peculiar cha- 
racters. But the factors in nature of which we have this 
peculiar sense-awareness are known as not comprising 
all the factors which together form the Whole complex 
of related entities within the general fact there for 
discernment. This peculiarity of knowledge is what I 
call its imexhaustive character. This character may be 
metaphorically described by the statement that nature 
as perceived always has a ragged edge. For example, 
there is a world beyond the room to which our sight is 
confined known to us as completing the space-relations 
of the entities discerned within the room. The junction 
of the interior world of the room with the exterior world 
beyond is never sharp. Sounds and subtler factors 
disclosed in sense-awareness float in from the outside. 
Every type of sense has its own set of discriminated 
entities which are known to be relata in relation with 
entities not discriminated by that sense. For example we 
see something which we do not touch and we touch 
something which we do not see, and we have a general 
sense of the .space-relations between the entity dis- 
closed in sight and the entity disclosed in touch. Thus 
in the first place each of these two entities is known as 
a relatum in a general system of space-relations and 
in the second place the particular mutual relation of 



Digitized by 



Google 



Ill] TIME 51 

these two entities as related to each other in this general 
system is determined. But the general system of space- 
relations relating the entity discriminated by si^ti^^^^ 
with that discriminated by sight is not dependent on 
the peculiar character of the other entity as reported 
by the alternative sense. For example, the space- 
relations of the thing seen would have necessitated an 
entity as a relatum in the place of the thing touched 
even although certain elements of its character had hot 
been disclosed by touch. Thus apart from the touch 
an entity with a certain specific relation to the thing seen 
would have been disclosed by sense-awareness but not 
otherwise discriminated in respect to its individual 
character. An entity merely known as spatially related 
to some discerned entity is what we mean by the bare 
idea of * place.* The concept of place marks the dis- 
closure in sense-awareness of entities in nature known 
merely by their spatial relations to discerned entities. 
It is the disclosure of the discernible by means of its 
relations to the discerned. 
c_ This disclosure of an entity as a relatum without 
further specific discrimination of quaUty is the basis of 
our cpncept of significance. In the above example the 
thing seen was significant, in that it disclosed its spatial 
relations to other entities not necessarily otherwise 
entering into consciousness. Thus sigiificance. is re-; 
latedness, but it is relatedness with the emphasis on one ' 
end only of the relation. 

For the sake of simplicity I have confined the argu- 
ment to spatial relations; but the same considerations 
apply to temporal relations. The concept of * period of 
time * marks the disclosure in sense-awareness of entities 
in nature known merely by their temporal relations to 

4—2 



Digitized by 



Google 



S2 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

discerned entities. Still further, this separation of the 
ideas of space and time has merely been adopted for the 
sake of gaining simpUcity of exposition by conformity 
to current language. What we discern is the specific 
e/J^A/T character of a place through a period oLtimc. This is 
what I mean by an ^ event .' We discern some specific 
character of an event. But in discerning an event we 
/ are also aware of its significance as a relatum in the struc- 
' ture of events. This structxire of events is the complex 
of events as related by the two relations of extension and 
cogredience. The most simple expression of the proper- 
ties of this structure are to be found in our spatial and 
temporal relations. A discerned event is known as related 
in this structure to other events whose specific characters 
are otherwise not disclosed in that immediate awareness 
except so far as that they are relata within the structure. 
The disclosure in sense-awareness of the structure 
of events classifies events into those which are discerned 
in respect to some^furthacjn dividual charac ter and those 
which are not o therwise d isclosed except as elements 
of the structure. These signified events must include 
events in the remote past as well as events in the 
future. We are aware of these as the far off periods of 
imbounded time. But there is another classification of 
events which is also inherent in sense-awareness. These 
are the events which share the immediacy of the im- 
mediately present discerned events. These are the events 
whose characters together with those of the discerned 
events comprise all nature present for discernment. 
They form the complete general fact which is all nature 
now present as disclosed in that sense-awareness. It is 
in this second classification of events that the differentia- 
tion of space from time takes its origin. The germ of 



l:::^ 



Digitized by 



Google 






in] TIME 53 

space is to be found in the mutual relations of events /!i ' 

within the immediate general fact which is all nature ^ *^i 

• ^ t. *> 

Hjjjy discernible, namely within the one event which is s? ^- ^ 

the totality of present nature. The relations of other / > rc" 

^YpntR to this totality of nature form the texture of timc^!\^ ^^ *^ ^ 

The unity of this general present fact is expressed by ^^ .^^' J^ 
the concept of simultaneity. The general fact is the ^^ ^ 
whole simultaneous occurrence of nature which is now ^ ^ 

for sense-awareness. [This general fact is what I have l ^^ ^ 
called the discernible. But in future I will call it a i V 
* duration/ meaning thereby a certain whole of nature 
which is limited only by the property of being a simul- 
taneity. Further in obedience to the principle of com- 
prising within nature the whole terminus of sense-aware- 
ness, simultaneity must not be conceived as an irrelevant 
mental concept imposed upon nature. Our sense- 
awareness posits for immediate discernment a certain 
whole, here called a * duration'; thus a duration is a 
definite natural entity. A duration is discriminated as 
a complex of partial events, and the natural entities 
which are components of this complex are thereby said 
to be * simultaneous with this duration.* Also in a 
derivative sense they are simultaneous with each other 
in respect to this duration. Thus simultaneity is a 
definite natural relation. The word * duration ' is perhaps 
unfortunate in so far as it suggests a mere abstract 
stretch of time. This is not what I mean. A duration is i 
a concrete slab of nature limited by simultaneity which 
is an essential factor disclosed in sense-awareness. 

Nature is a process. As in the case of everything 
directly exhibited in sense-awareness, there can be no 
explanation of this characteristic of nature. All that 
can be done is to use language which may speculatively 



Digitized by 



Google 



■'-^' 



54 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

demonstrate it, and also to express the relation of this 
factor in nature to other factors. 

It is an exhibition of the process of nature that each 
duration happens and passes. The process of nature can 
also be termed the passage of nature. I definitely refraih 
at this stage from using the word *time/ since the 
measurable time of science and of civilised life generally 
merely exhibits some aspects of the more fundamental 
fact of the passage of nature. I believe that in this 
doctrine I am in full accord with Bergson, though he 
uses *time' for the fundamental fact which I c^U the 
^passage of .nature.' Also the passage of nature is ex- 
hibited equally in spatial transition as well as in temporal 
transition. It is in virtue of its passage that nature is 
always moving on. It is involved in the meaning of this 
property of * moving on ' that not only is any act of sense- 
awareness just that act and no other, but the terminus 
of each act is also imique and is the terminus of no other 
act. Sense-awareness seizes its only chance and presents 
for knowledge something which is for it alone. 

There are two senses in which the terminus of sense- 
awareness is unique. It is unique for the sense-aware- 
ness of an individual mind and it is unique for the 
sense-awareness of all minds which are operating under 
natural conditions. There is an inu)ortant distinction 
between the two cases, (i) For one mind not only is the 
discerned component of the general fact exhibited in 
any act of sense-awareness distinct from the discerned 
component of the general fact exhibited in any other 
act of sense-awareness of that mind, but the two corre- 
sponding durations which are respectively related by 
simultaneity to the two discerned components are 
necessarily distinct. This is an exhibition of the temporal 



Digitized by 



Google 



in] TIME 55 

passage of nature ; namely, one duration has passed into 
the other. Thus not only is the passage of nature an 
essential character of nature in its rdk of the terminus of 
sense-awareness, but it is also essential for sense- 
awareness in itself. It is this truth which makes time 
appear to extend beyond nature. But what extends 
beyond nature to mind is not the serial and measurable 
time, which exhibits merely the character of passage in 
nature, but the quality of passage itself which is in no 
way measurable except so far as it obtains in nature. 
That is to say, * passage* is not measurable except asi 
it occurs in nature in connexion with extension. In 
passage we reach a connexion of nature with the ultimate 
metaphysical reality. The quality of passage in dura- 
tions is a particular exhibition in nature of a quality 
which extends beyond nature. For example passage is 
a quality not only of nature, which is the thing known, 
but also of sense-awareness which is the procedure of 
knowing. Durations have all the reality that nature has, 
though what that may be we need not now determine. 
The measiirableness of time is derivative from the 
properties of durations. So also is the serial character 
of time. We shall find that there are in nature competing 
serial time-systems derived from diflFerent families of 
durations. These are a peculiarity of the character of 
passage as it i* foimd in nature. This character has the 
reality of nature, but we must not necessarily transfer 
natural timeto extra-natural entities, (ii) Fortwo minds, 
the discerned components of the general facts exhibited 
in their respective acts of sense-awareness must be 
diflFerent. For each mind, in its awareness of nature is 
aware of a certain complex of related natural entities 
in their relations to the living body as a focus. But the 



Digitized by 



Google 



56 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

associated durations may be identical. Here we are 
touching on that character of the passage nature which 
issues in the spatial relations of simultaneous bodies. 
This possible identity of the durations in the case of 
the sense-awareness of distinct minds is what binds 
into one nature the private experiences of sentient 
beings. We are here considering the spatial side of the 
passage of nature. Passage in this aspect of it also seems 
to extend beyond nature to mind. 

It is important to distinguish simultaneity from in- 
stantaneousness. I lay no stress on the mere current 
usage of the two terms. There are two concepts which 
I want to distinguish, and one I call simultaneity and 
the other instantaneousness. I hope, that the words are 
judiciously chosen; but it really does not matter so 
long as I succeed in explaining my meaning. Simul- 
taneity is the property of a group of natural elements 
which in some sense are components of a duration. 
A duration can be all nature present as the immediate 
fact posited by sense-aw9i;eness. A duration retains 
within itself the passage of nature. There are within it 
antecedents and consequents which are also durations 
which may be the complete specious presents of quicker 
consciousnesses. In other words a duration retains 
temporal thickness. Any concept of all nature as imme- 
diately known is always a concept of 'some duration 
though it may be enlarged in its temporal thickness 
beyond the possible specious present of any being known 
to us as existing within nature. Thus simultaneity is an 
ultimate factor in nature,inunediate for sense-awareness. 

Instantaneousness is a complex logical concept of a 
procedure in thought by which constructed logical 
entities are produced for the sake of the simple ex- 



Digitized by 



Google 



in] TIME 57 

pression in thought of properties of nature. Instan- 
taneousness is the concept of all nature at an instant, 
where an instant is conceived as deprived of all tem- 
poral extension. For example we conceive of the dis- 
tribution of matter in space at an instant. This is a very 
useful concept in science especially in appUed mathe- 
matics ; but it is a very complex idea so far as concerns 
its connexions with the immediate facts of sense- 
awareness. There is jio such thing as nature at an instant 
posited by sense-awareness. What sense-awareness 
delivers over for knowledge is nature through a period. 
Accordingly nature at an instant, since it is not itself 
a natural entity, must be defined in terms of genuine 
natural entities. Unless we do so, our science, which 
employs the concept of instantaneous nature, must 
abandon all claim to be foimded upon observation. 

I will use the term ^ moment ' to mean ^^1 nature at an 
ijQStaQt.' A moment, in the sense in which the term is 
here usect,'has no temporal extension, and is in this re- 
spect to be contrasted with a duration which has such 
extension. What is directly yielded to our knowledge by 
sense-awareness is a duration. Accordingly we have now 
to explain how moments are derived from durations, and 
also to explain the piirpose served by their introduction. 

A moment is a limit to which we approach as we 
confine attention to diirations of minimum extension. 
Natural relations among the ingredients of a duration 
gain in complexity as we consider durations of increasing 
temporal extension. Accordingly there is an approach 
to ideal simpUcity as we approach an ideal diminution 
of extension. 

The word Mimit' has a precise signification in the 
logic of number and even in the logic of non-numerical 



Digitized by 



Google 



S8 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

one-dimensional series. As used here it is so far a mere 
metaphor, and it is necessary to explain directly the 
concept which it is meant to indicate. 

Durations can have the two-termed relational pro- 
perty of extending one over the other. Thus the duration 
which is all nature during a certain minute extends over 
the duration which is all nature during the 30th second 
of that minute. This relation of * extending over* — 
* extension' as I shall call it — ^is a fundamental natural 
relation whose field comprises more than durations. It 
is a relation which two limited events can have to each 
other. Furthermore as holding between durations the 
relation appears to refer to the purely temporal ex- 
tension. I shall however maintain that the same relation 
of extension lies at the base both of temporal and spatial 
extension. This discussion can be postponed; and for 
the present we are simply concerned with the relation 
of extension as it occurs in its temporal aspect for the 
limited field of durations. 

The concept of extension exhibits in thought one side 
of the ultimate passage of nature. This relation holds 
because of the special character which passage assmnes 
in nature ; it is the relation which in the case of durations 
expresses the properties of * passing over.* Thus the 
duration which was one definite minute passed over the 
duration which was its 30th second. The duration of the 
30th second was part of thedurationof theminute. I shall 
use the terms * whole * and * part * exclusively in this sense, 
that the * part * is an evottt which is extended over by the 
other event which is the * whole.* Thus in my nomencla- 
ture * whole' and *part* refer exclusively to this funda- 
mental relation of extension; and accordingly in this 
technical usage only events can be either wholes or parts. 



Digitized by 



Google 



[a III] TIME 59 

oe • CThe continuity of nature arises from extension. Every 
tii event extends over other events, and every event is 
extended over by other events) Thus in the special case of 
)K durations which are now the only events directly under 
tic consideration, every duration is part of other durations ; 
\r and every duration has other durations which are 
I parts of it. Accordingly there are (no maximum dura- 
tions and no minimmn durations ."" Thus there is no 
K* atomic structure of durations, and the perfect definition 
! of a (duration, so as to mark out its individuality and 

distinguish it from highly analogous durations over 

1 which it is passing, or which are passing over it, is an 
arbitrary postulate of thought.) Sense-awareness posits 
durations as factors in nature but does not clearly enable 
thought to use it as distinguishing the separate indi- 
vidualities of the entities of an allied group of slightly 
differing durations. This is one instance of the ^n- y^^ 
determinateness of sense-awareness.) (Exactness is an ^^ 
ideal of thought, and is only realised in experience by 

the selection of a route of approximation) 

The absence of maximum and minimum durations 
does not exhaust the properties of nature which make 
up its continuity. The passage of nature involves the 
existence of a(family of durations^ When two durations 
belong to the same family either one contains the other, 
or they overlap each other in a subordinate duration 
without either containing the other; or they are com-/ 
pletely separate. The excluded case is that of durations \^ 
overlapping in finite events but not containing a third 
diiration as a conunon part.) ^ . 

It is evident that the^elation of extension is transitive ^ 
namely as applied to durations, if duration A is part of 
duration By and duration B is part of duration C, then A 




Digitized by 



Google 



6o THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

is part of C. Thus the first two cases may be combined 
into one and we can say that two durations which 
belong to the same family either are such that there are 
durations which are parts of both or are completely 
separate. 

Furthermore the converse of this proposition holds; 
namely, if two durations have other durations which are 
parts of both or if the two durations are completely 
separate, then they belong to the same family. 

The further characteristics of the continuity of 
nature — so far as durations are concerned — ^which has 
not yet been formulated arises in connexion with a 
family of durations. It can be stated in this way : tFhere 
are durations which contain as parts any two durations 
of the same family.) For example a week contains as 
parts any two of its days. It is evident that a containing 
duration satisfies the conditions for belonging to the 
same family as the two contained durations. 

We are now prepared to proceed to the definition of 
a moment of time) (Consider a set of durations all taken 
from the same family. Let it have the following pro- 
perties : (i) of any two members of the set one contains 
the other as a part, and (ii) there is no duration which 
is a common part of every member of the set]. 

Now the /relation of whole and part is asymmetrical} 
and by this I mean that if ^ is part of 5, then B is not 
part of A. Also we have already noted that the relation 
is transitive. Accordingly we can easily see that the 
(durations of any set with the properties just enumerated 
must be arranged in a one-dimensional serial order in 
which as we descend the series we progressively reach 
durations of smaller and smaller temporal extension! 
The series may start with any arbitrarily assumed 



Digitized by 



Google 



Ill] TIME 6i 

duration of any temporal extension, but in descending 
the series the temporal extension progressively con- 
tracts and the successive durations are packed one within 
the other like the nest of boxes of a Chinese toy. But 
the set differs from the toy in this particular: the toy 
has a smallest box which forms the end box of its series ; 
but |he set of durations can have no smallest duration 
nor can it converge towards a duration as its limit. For 
the parts either of the end duration or of the limit would 
be parts of all the durations of the set and thus the 
second condition for the set would be violated?) 

(t will call such a set of durations an * abstractive set' 
of durations.) It is evident that an abstractive set as we 
pass along it converges to the ideal of all nature with 
no temporal extension, namely, to the ideal of all nature 
at an instant. But this ideal is in fact the ideal of a 
nonentity. 'What the abstractive set is in fact doing is 
to guide thought to the consideration of the progressive 
simplicity of natural relations as we progressively 
diminish the temporal extension of the duration con- 
sidered J Now the whole point of the procedure is that 
(the quantitative expressions of these natural properties 
do converge to limits though the abstractive set does 
not converge to any limiting duration^ The laws relating 
these quantitative limits are the(laws of nature * at an 
instant,'^ although ^n truth there is no nature at an 
instant and there is only the abstractive set) Thus an 
abstractive set is effectively the entity meant when we 
consider an instant of time without temporal extension. 
It subserves all the necessary purposes of giving a 
definite meaning to the concept of the properties of 
nature at an instant. I fully agree that this concept is 
fundamental in the expression of physical science. The 



Digitized by 



Google 



62 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

difficulty is to express our meaning in terms of the imme- 
diate deliverances of sense-awareness, and'I offer the 
above explanation as a complete solution of the problem. 

In this explanation a rooi^en t is the set of natural 
properties reached by a route of approximation. LAn 
abstractive series is a route of approximation) There are 
diflFerent routes of approximation to the same limiting 
set of the properties of nature. In other words there 
are diflFerent^ abstractive sets 'which are to be regarded 
as (routes of approximation to the same moment.^ 
Accordingly there is a certain amount of technical detail 
necessary in explaining the relations of such abstractive 
sets with the same convergence^ and in guarding against 
possible exceptional cases. Such details are not suitable 
for exposition in these lectures, and I have dealt with 
them fully elsewher© 

(It is more convenient for technical purposes to look 
on a moment as being the class of all abstractive sets of 
durations with the same convergence."^ Wi^ this defini- 
tion (provided that we can successfully explain what 
we mean by the *same convergence' apart from a 
detailed knowledge of the set of natural properties 
arrived at by approximation) a moment is merely a class 
of sets^ of durations whose relations of extension in 
respect to each other have certain definite peculiarities. 
^We may term these connexions of the component 
durations the * extrinsic' properties of a moment; the 
* intrinsic' properties of the moment are the properties 
of nature arrived at as a limit as we proceed along any 
one of its abstractive sets) These are the properties of 
nature *at that moment,' or *at that instant.' 

^ Of. An Enquiry conceiTting the Principles of Natural Knowledge^ 
Cambridge University Press, 19 19. 



Digitized by 



Google 



Ill] TIME . 63 

The durations which enter into the composition of 
a moment all belong to one family. Thus there is one 
famil y of moments corresponding to one family of 
durations. Also if we take two moments of the same 
family, among the durations which enter into the com- 
position of one moment the smaller diu*ations are 
completely separated from the smaller durations which 
enter into the composition of the other moment. Thus 
the two moments in their intrinsic properties must 
exhibit the limits of completely different states of natiu*e . » 
In this sense the two moments are completely separated . 
I will call two moments of the same family ' parallel .* X 

Corresponding to each duration there are two 
moments of the associated family of moments which \ 
are the boundary moments of that duration. A 
* boundary moment' of a duration can be defined in 
this way. (There are durations of the same family as the 
given duration which overlap it but are not contained 
in it. Consider an abstractive set of such durations. 
Such a set defines a moment which is just as much 
without the duration as within it. Such a moment is a 
boundary moment of the duration^ Also we call upon 
our sense-awareness of the passage of nature to inform 
us that there are two such boundary moments, namely 
the earlier one and the later one. We will call them the 
initial and the final boundaries. 

There are also moments of the same family such that 
the shorter durations in their composition are entirely 
separated from the given duration. Such moments will 
be said to lie * outside ' the given duration. Again other 
moments of the family are such that the shorter dura- 
tions in their composition are parts of the given dura- 
tion. Such moments are said to lie * within' the given 



Digitized by 



Google 



64 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

duration or to ' inhgre ' in it . Hie whole family of parallel 
moments is accounted for in this way by rrference to 
any given duration of the associated family of durations . 
Namely, there are moments of the family which he 
without the given duration, there are the two moments 
which are the boundary moments of the given duration, 
and the moments which he within the given duration. 
Furthermore any two moments of the same family are 
the boundary moments of some one duration of the 
associated family of durations. 

It is now possible to define the serial relation of 
temporal order among the moments of a family. For 
let A and C be any two moments of the family, these 
moments are the boundary moments of one duration d 
of the associated family, and any moment B which lies 
within the duration d will be said to lie between the 
moments A and C. Thus the three-termed relation of 
* lying-betw^n * as relating three moments Ay -fit and C 
is completely defined . Also our knowledge of the passage 
of nature assures us that this relation distributes the 
moments of the family into a serial order. I abstain 
from envunerating the definite properties which secure 
this result, I have enumerated them in my recently 
published book^ to which I have already referred. 
Furthermore the passage of nature enables us to know 
that one direction along the series corresponds to 
passage into the future and the other direction corre- 
sponds to retrogression towards the past. 

Such an ordered series of moments is what we mean 
by time defined as a series. Each element of the series 
exhibits an instantaneous state of nature. Evidently this 
serial time is the result of an intellectual process of 

^ Of. Enquiry. 



Digitized by 



Google 



Ill] TIME 65 

abstraction. What I have done is to give precise d^ni- 
tions of the procedure by which the abstraction is 
effected. This procedure is merely a particular case of 
the general method which in my book I name the 
'method of extensive abstraction.' This ser^^ time is 
evidently not the very passage of nature itself. It 
exhibits some of the natural properties which flow from 
it. The state of nature * at a moment ' has evidently lost 
this ultimate quality of passage. Also the temporal 
series of moments only retains it as an extrinsic relation j 
of entities and not as the outcome of the essential being^ 
of the terms of the series. 

Nothing has yet been said as to the measurement of 
time. Such measurement does not follow from the 
mere serial property of time; it requires a theory of 
congruence which will be considered in a later lecture. 

In estimating the adequacy of this definition of the 
temporal series as a formulation of experience it is 
necessary to discriminate between the crude deliverance 
of sense-awareness and our intellectual theories. The 
lapse of time is a measurable serial quantity. The whole 
of scientific theory depends on this assimiption and any 
theory of time which fails to provide such a measurable 
series stands self-condemned as unable to account for 
the most salient fact in experience. Our difficulties only 
begin when we ask what it is that is measured. It is 
evidently something so fundamental in experience that 
we can hardly stand back from it and hold it apart so 
as to view it in its own proportions. 

We have first to make up our minds whether time isi 
to be found in nature or nature is to be found in time.^ 
The difficulty of the latter alternative — ^namely of 
making time prior to nature — is that time then becomes 



Digitized by 



Google 



66 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

a metaphysical enigma. What sort of entities are its 
instants or its periods? The dissociation of time from 
events discloses to our inmiediate inspection that the 
attempt to set up time as an independent terminus for 
knowledge is like the effort to find substance in a shadow. 
^^ . There is time because there are happenings, and apart 
*from happenings there is nothing. 

It is necessary however to make a distinction. /In 
some sense time extends beyond nature) It is not true 
that a timeless sense-awareness and a timeless thought 
combine to contemplate a timeful nature. 'Sense-aware- 
ness and thought are themselves processes as well as 
their termini in nature. In other words there is a 
. passage of sense-awareness and a passage of thought. 
Thus the reign of the quaUty of passage extends beyond 
nature.) But now the distinction arises between passage 
which is fundamental and the temporal series which is 
a logical abstraction representing some of the properties 
of nature. A temporal series, as we have defined it, 
represents merely certain properties of a family of 
durations — ^properties indeed which durations only 
posstsss because of their partaking of the character of 
passage, but on the other hand properties which only 
durations do possess. Accordingly ^time in the sense of a 
measurable temporal series is a character of nature only, ) 
and does not extend to the processes of thought and of 
sense-awareness exceptbyacorrelation of these processes 
with the temporal series implicated in their proceduresJ 
So ifar the passage of nature has been considered in 
connexion with the passage of durations; and in this 
connexion it is peculiarly associated with temporal 
series. We must remember however that the character 
of passage is peculiarly associated with the extension of 



Digitized by 



Google 



Ill] TIME 67 

events, and that from this extension spiatial transition 
arises just as much as temporal transition. The dis- 
cussion of this point is reserved for a later lecture but 
it is necessary to remember it now that we are pro- 
ceeding to discuss the application of the concept of 
passage beyond nature, otherwise we shall have too 
narrow an idea of the essence of passage. 

It is necessary to dwell on the subject of sense-aware- 
ness in this connexion as an example of the way in 
which time concerns mind, although measurable time is 
a mere abstract from nature and nature is closed to mind. 

Consider sense-awareness — ^not its terminus which 
is nature, but sense-awareness in itself as a procedure 
of mind. Sens^-awareness is a relation of mind to 
nature. Accordingly we are now considering mind as 
a relatum in sense-awareness. For mind there is the 
inmiediate sense-awareness and there is memo ry. The 
distinction between memory and the present immediacy 
has a double bearing. On the one hand it discloses that 
mind is not impartially aware of all those natural 
durations to which it is related by awareness. Its 
awareness shares in' the passage of nature. We can 
imagine a being whose awareness, conceived as his 
private possession, suffers no transition, although the 
terminusf of his awareness is om* own transient nature. 
There is no essential reason why memory should not 
Ije raised to the vividness of the present fact ; and then 
from the side of mind. What is the difference between 
the present and the past? Yet with this hypothesis we 
can also suppose that the vivid remembrance and the 
present fact are posited in awareness as in their temporal 
serial order. Accordingly we must admit that though 
we can imagine that mind in the operation of sense- 

5—2 



Digitized by 



Google 



68 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

awareness might be free from any character of passage, 
yet in point of fact our experience of sense-awareness 
exhibits our minds as partaking in this character. 

On the other hand the mere fact of memory is an 
escape from transience. In memory the past is present. 
It is not present as overleaping the temporal succession 
of nature, but it is present as an immediate fact for 
the mind. Accordingly memory is a disengagement of 
the mind from the mere passage of nature ; for what has 
passed for nature has not passed for mind. 

Furthermore the distinction between memory and 
the inunediate present is not so clear as it is conventional 
to suppose. There is an intellectual theory of time as a 
moving knife-edge, exhibiting a present fact without 
temporal extension. This theory arises from the concept 
of an ideal exactitude of observation. Astronomical 
observations are successively refined to be exact to 
tenths, to hundredths, and to thousandths of seconds. 
But the final refinements are arrived at by a system of 
averaging, and even then present us with a stretch of 
time as a margin of error. Here error is merely a con- 
ventional term to express the fact that the character of 
experience does not accord with the ideal of thought. 
I have already explained how the concept of a moment 
conciliates the observed fact with this ideal; namely, 
there is a limiting simplicity in the quantitative ex- 
pression of the properties of durations, which is 
arrived at by considering any one of the abstractive 
sets included in the moment. In other words the 
extrinsic character of the moment as an aggregate of 
durations has associated with it the intrinsic character 
of the moment which is the limiting expression of 
natural properties. 



Digitized by 



Google 



y 



III] TIME 69 

Thiis the character of a moment and the ideal of 
exactness which it enshrines do not in any way weaken 
the position that the ultimate terminus of awareness is 
a duration with temporal thickness. This immediate 
duration is not clearly marked out for our apprehension. 
Its earlier boimdary is blurred by a fading into memory, 
and its later boundary is blurred by an emergence from ^ 
anticipation.frhere is no sharp distinction either between y 

memory and the present inunediacy or Between the 
present inunediacy and anticipation* The present is a 
wavering breadth of boundary between the two ex- 
tremes. Thus our own sense-awareness with its extended 
present has some of the character of the sense-awareness 
of the imaginary being whose mind was free from passage 
and who contemplated all nature as an immediate fact. 
Our own present has its antecedents and its consequents, 
and for the imaginary being all nature has its ante- 
cedent and its consequent durations. Thus the only 
difference in this respect between us and the imaginary ^"^ 
being is that for him all nature shares in the inunediacy 
of our present duration. 

The conclusion of this discussion is that (so far as 
sense-awareness is concerned there is a passage of 
mind which is distinguishable from the passage of 
nature though closely allied with it J We may speculate, 
if we like, that this alliance of the passage of mind with 
the passage of nature arises from their both sharing in 
some ultimate character of passage which dominates 
all being. But this is a speculation in which we have 
no concern. The inunediate deduction which is suffi- 
cient for us is that — so far as sense-awareness is con- 
cerned — ^mind is not in time or in space in the same ^ y 
sense in which the events of nature are in time, but 



Digitized by 



Google 



70 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

that it is derivatively in time and in space by reason of 
the peculiar alliance of its passage with the passage 
of nature. Thus mind is in time and in space in a sense 
peculiar to itself. This has been a long discussion to 
arrive at a very simple and obvious conclusion. We all 
feel that in some sense our minds are here in this room 
and at this time. But it is not quite in the same sense 
as that in which the events of nature which are the 
existences of our brains have their spatial and temporal 
positions. The fundamental distinction to remember is 
that inunediacy for sense-awareness is not the same as 
instantaneousness for nature. This last conclusion bears 
on the next discussion with which I will terminate this 
lecture. This question can be formulated thus. Can 
alternative temporal series be foimd in nature? 

A few years ago such a suggestion would have been 
put aside as being fantastically impossible . It would have 
had no bearing on the science then current, and was 
akin to no ideas which had ever entered into the dreams 
of philosophy. The eighteenth and nineteenth centuries 
accepted as their natural philosophy a certain circle of 
concepts which were as rigid and definite as those of 
the philosophy of the middle ages, and were accepted 
with as little critical research. I will call this natural 
philosophy * materialism.' Not only were men of science 
materialists, but also adherents of all schools of philo- 
sophy. The idealists only differed from the philosophic 
materialists on question of the alignment of nature in 
reference to mind. But no one had any doubt that the 
philosophy of nature considered in itself was of the 
type which I have called materialism. It is the philo- 
sophy which I have already examined in my two 
lectures of this course preceding the present one. It 



Digitized by 



Google 



[a ni] TIME 71 

Q c can be summarised as the belief that nature is an aggre- 
^ gate of material and that this material exists in some 
Dg sense at each successive member of a one-dimensional 
^^ series of extensionless instants of time. Furthermore 
J the mutual relations of the material entities at each 
Q2 instant formed these entities into a spatial configuration 
Qjf in an unbounded space. It would seem that space — on 
if! this theory — ^would be as instantaneous as the instants, 
^^ and that some explanation is required of the relations 
t' between the successive instantaneous spaces. The 
3j materiaUstic theory is however silent on this point; 
[jj' and the succession of instantaneous spaces is tacitly 
[jj combined into one persistent space. This theory is a 
purely intellectual rendering of experience which has 
had the luck to get itself formulated at the dawn of 
scientific thought. It has dominated the language and 
the imagination of science since science flourished in 
Alexandria, with the result that it is now hardly possible 
to speak without appearing to assume its immediate 
obviousness. 

But when it is distinctly formulated in the abstract 
terms in which I have just stated it, the theory is very 
far from obvious. The passing complex of factors which 
compose the fact which is the terminus of sense-aware- 
ness places before us nothing corresponding to the 
trinity of this natural materialism. This trinity is com- 
posed (i) of the temporal series of extensionless instants, 
(ii) of the aggregate of material entities, and (iii) of 
space which is the outcome of relations of matter. 

There is a wide gap between these presuppositions 
of the intellectual theory of materialism and the im- 
mediate deliverances of sense-awareness. I do not 
question that this materialistic trinity embodies im- 



Digitized by 



Google 



\ 



^^ THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

portant characters of nature. But it is necessary to 
express these characters in terms of the facts c^ 
experience. This is exactly what in this lecture I have 
been endeavouring to do so far as time is concerned ; 
and we have now come up against the question, Is 
there only one temporal series? The uniqueness of the 
temporal series is presupposed in the materialist 
philosophy of nature. But that philosophy is merely a 
theory, like the Aristotelian scientific theories so firmly 
believed in the middle ages. If in this lecture I have 
in any way succeeded in getting behind the theory to 
the immediate facts, the answer is not nearly so certain. 
The question can be transformed into this alternative 
form, Is there only one family of durations? In this 
question the meaning of a * family of durations' has 
been defined earlier in this lecture. The answer is now 
not at all obvious. On the materialistic theory the 
instantaneous present is the only field for the creative 
activity of nature. The past is gone and the future is 
not yet. Thus (on this theory) the inunediacy of per- 
ception is of an instantaneous present, and this unique 
present is the outcome of the past and the promise of 
the future. But we deny this immediately given in- 
stantaneous present. There is no such thing to be found 
in nature. As an ultimate fact it is a nonentity. What 
is immediate for sense-awareness is a duration. Now a 
duration has within itself a past and a future; and the 
temporal breadths of the immediate diu-ations of sense- 
awareness are very indeterminate and dependent on the 
individual percipient. Accordingly there is no unique 
factor in nature which for every percipient is pre- 
eminently and necessarily the present. The passage of 
nature leaves nothing between the past and the future. 



Digitized by 



Google 



Ill] TIME 73 

What we perceive as present is the vivid fringe of 
memory tinged with anticipation. This vividness lights J 
up the discriminated field within a duration. But no 
assurance can thereby be given that the happenings of 
nature cannot be assorted into other durations of alter- 
native families. We cannot even know that the series 
of immediate durations posited by the sense-awareness 
of one individual mind all necessarily belong to the 
same family of durations. There is not the slightest 
reason to believe that this is so. Indeed if my theory of 
nature be correct, it will not be the case. 

The materialistic theory has all the completeness of 
the thought of the middle ages, which had a complete 
answer to everything, be it in heaven or in hell or in 
nature. There is a trimness about it, with its instan- 
taneous present, its vanished past, its non-existent 
future, and its inert matter. This trimness is very 
medieval and ill accords with brute fact. 

The theory which I am urging admits a greater/ 
ultimate mystery and a deeper ignorance. The past and 
the future meet ^and mingle in the ill-defined present. 
(The passage of nature which is only another name for 
the creative force of existence has no narrow ledge of 
definite instantaneous present within which to operate. 
Its operative presence which is now urging nature 
forward must be sought for throughout the whole, in 
the remotest past as well as in the narrowest breadth of 
any present diiration. Perhaps also in the unrealised 
future. Perhaps also in the future which might be as 
well as the actual future which will be. It is impossible 
to meditate on time and the mystery of the creative 
passage of nature without an overwhelming emotion 
at the limitations of human intelligence. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CHAPTER IV 

THE METHOD OF EXTENSIVE 
ABSTRACTION 

To-day's lecture must commence with the consideration 
of limited events. We shall then be in a position to 
enter upon an investigation of the factors in nature 
which are represented by our conception of space. 

The duration which is the immediate disclosure of 
our sense-awareness is discriminated into parts. There 
is the part which is the life of all nature within a room, 
and there is the part which is the life of all nature 
within a table in the room. These parts are limited 
events. They have the endurance of the present duration, 
and they are parts of it. But whereas a duration is an 
unlimited whole and in a certain limited sense is all 
that there is, a limited event possesses a completely 
defined limitation of extent which is expressed for us 
in spatio-temporal terms. 

We arc accustomed to associate an event with a certain 
melodramatic quaUty. If a man is run over, that is an 
event comprised within certain spatio-temporal limits. 
We are not accustomed to consider the endurance of 
the Great Pyramid throughout any definite day as an 
event. But the natural fact which is the Great Pyramid 
throughout a day, meaning thereby all nature within it, 
is an event of the same character as the man's accident, 
meaning thereby all nature with spatio-temporal limita- 
tions so as to include the man and the motor during the 
period when they were in contact. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CH.iv] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 75 

We are accustomed to analyse these events into three 
factors, time, space, and material. In fact, we at once > 

apply to them the concepts of the materialistic theory 
of nature. I do ijot deny the utility of this analysis for 
the purpose of expressing important laws of nature. 
What I am denying is that anyone of these factors is 
posited for us in sense-awareness in concrete inde- 
pendence. We perceive one unit factor in nature ; and 
this factor is that something is going on then — ^there. 
For example, we perceive the going-on of the Great 
Pyramid in its relations to the goings-on of the sur- 
rounding Egyptian events. We are so trained, both by 
language and by formal teaching and by the resulting 
convenience, to express our thoughts in terms of this 
materialistic analysis that intellectually we tend to 
ignore the true unity of the factor really exhibited in 
sense-awareness. It is this unit factor, retaining in 
itself the passage of nature, which is the primary 
concrete element discriminated in nattu'e. These 
primary factors are what I mean by events. 

Events are the field of a two-termed relation, namely 
the relation of extension which was considered in the 
last lecture. Events are the things related by the 
relation of extension. If an event A extends over an 
event 5, then B is *part oV A, and ^ is a * whole of 
which 5 is a part. Whole and part are invariably used 
in these lectures in this definite sense. It follows that 
in reference to this relation any two events A and B 
may have any one of four relations to each other, 
namely (i) A may extend over 5, or (ii) B may extend 
over Ay or (iii) A and B may both extend over some 
third event C, but neither over the other, or (iv) A 
and B may be entirely separate. These alternatives can 



Digitized by 



Google 



76 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

obviously be illustrated by Euler's diagrams as they 
appear in logical textbooks. 

-The continuity of nature is the continuity of events. 
This continuity is merely the name for the aggregate 
of a variety of properties of events in connexion with 
the relation of extension. 

In the first place, this relation is transitive ; secondly, 
every event contains other events as parts of itself; 
thirdly every event is a part of other events; fourthly 
given any two finite events there are events each erf 
which contains both of them as parts ; and fifthly there 
is a special relation between events which I term 
^junction.* 

Two events have junction when there is a third event 
of which both events are parts, and which is such that 
no part of it is separated from both of the two given 
events. Thus two events with junction make up exactly 
one event which is in a sense their sum. 

Only certain pairs of events have this property. In 
general any event containing two events also contains 
parts which are separated from both events. 

There is an alternative definition of the junction of 
two events which I have adopted in my recent book^. 
Two events have junction when there is a third event 
such that (i) it overlaps both events and (ii) it has no 
part which is separated from both the given events. If 
either of these alternative definitions is adopted as the 
definition of junction, the other definition appears as 
an axiom respecting the character of junction as we 
know it in nature. But we are not thinking of logical 
definition so much as the formulation of the results 
of direct observation. There is a certain continuity 

^ a. Enquiry. 



Digitized by 



Google 



lY] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 77 

inherent in the observed unity of an event, and these 
two definitions of jtinction are really axioms based 
on observation respecting the character of this con- 
tinuity. 

The relations of whole and part and of overlapping 
are particular cases of the junction of events. But it 
is possible for events to have junction when they are 
separate from each other; for example, the upper and 
the lower part of the Great Pyramid are divided by some 
imaginary horizontal plane. 

The continuity which nature derives from events 
has been obscured by the illustrations which I have 
been obliged to give. For example I have taken the 
existence of the Great Pyramid as a fairly well-known 
fact to which I could safely appeal as an illustration. 
This is a type of event which exhibits itself to us as the 
situation of a recognisable object ; and in the example 
chosen the object is so widely recognised that it has 
received a name. An object is an entity of a different 
type from an event. For example, the event which is 
the life of nature within the Great Pyramid yesterday 
and to-day is divisible into two parts, namely the Great 
Pyramid yesterday and the Great Pyramid to-day. But 
the recognisable object which is also called the Great 
Pyramid is the same object to-day as it was yesterday. 
I shall have to consider the theory of objects in another 
lecture. 

The whole subject is invested with an immerited 
air of subtlety by the fact that when the event is the 
situation of a well-marked object, we have no language 
to distinguish the event from the object. In the case 
of the Great Pyramid, the object is the perceived unit 
entity which as perceived remains self-identical through- 



Digitized by 



Google 



78 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

f out the ages ; while the whole dance of molecules and 
I the shifting play of the electromagnetic field are 
nJ ingredients of the event. An object is in a sense out 
^ of time. It is only derivatively in time by reason of its 
having the relation to events which I term * situation.' 
This relation of situation will require discussion in a 
subsequent lecture. 

The point which I want to make now is that being the 
situation of a well-marked object is not an inherent 
necessity for an event. Wherever and whenever some- 
thmg is going on, there is an event. Furthermore 
* wherever and whenever' in themselves presuppose an 
event, for space and time in themselves are abstractions 
from events. It is therefore a consequence of this 
doctrine that somethmg is always going on everywhere, 
even in so-called empty space. This conclusion is in 
accord with modern physical science which presupposes 
the play of an electromagnetic field throughout space 
and time. This doctrine of science has been thrown into 
the materialistic form of an all-pervading ether. But 
the ether is evidentlya mere idle concept — ^in the phraseo- 
logy which Bacon applied to the doctrine of final 
causes, it is a barren virgin. Nothing is deduced from 
it; and the ether merely subserves the purpose of 
satisfying the demands of the materialistic theory. The 
important concept is that of the shifting facts of the 
fields of force. This is the concept of an ether of events 
which should be substituted for that of a material 
ether. 

It requires no illustration to assure you that an event 
is a complex fact, and the relations between two events 
form an almost impenetrable maze. The clue discovered 
by the common sense of mankind and systematically 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 79 

utilised in science is what I have elsewhere^ called the 
law of convergence to simplicity by diminution of 
extent. 

If A and B are two events, and A' is part of A and 
B' is part of By then in many respects the relations 
between the parts A' and B' will be simpler than the 
relations between A and B. This is the principle which 
presides over all attempts at exact observation. 

The first outcome of the systematic use of this law 
has been the formulation of the abstract concepts of 
Time and Space. In the previous lecture I sketched 
how the principle was applied to obtain the time-series. 
I now proceed to consider how the spatial entities are 
obtained by the same method. The systematic pro- 
cedure is identical in principle in both cases, and I 
have called the general tj^^e of procedure the ' method 
of extensive abstraction.* 

You will remember that in my last lecture I defined 
the concept of an abstractive set of durations. This 
definition can be extended so as to apply to any events, 
limited events as w^U as durations. The only change 
that is required is the substitution of the word * event' 
for the word ' duration.' Accordingly an abstractive set 
of events is any set of events which possesses the two 
properties, (i) of any two members of the set one con- 
tains the other as a part, and (ii) there is no event which 
is a common part of every member of the set. Such a 
set, as you will remember, has the properties of the 
Chinese toy which is a nest of boxes, one within the 
other, with the diflFerence that the toy has a smallest 
box, while the abstractive class has neither a smallest 

^ Cf. Organisation of Thought^ pp. 146 6t seq. Williams and 
Norgate, 1917. 



Digitized by 



Google 



8o THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

event nor does it converge to a limiting event which is 
not a member of the set. 

Thus, so far as the abstractive sets of events are con- 
cerned, an abstractive set converges to nothing. There 
is the set with its members growing indefinitely smaller 
and smaller as we proceed in thought towards the 
smaller end of the series; but there is no absolute 
minimum of any sort which is fimally reached. In fact 
the set is just itself and indicates nothing else in the 
way of events, except itself. But each event has an 
intrinsic character in the way of being a situation of 
objects and of having parts which are situations of 
objects and — ^to state the matter more generally — ^in the 
way of being a field of the life of nature. This character 
can be defined by quantitative expressions expressing 
relations between various quantities intrinsic to the 
event or between such quantities and other quantities 
intrinsic to other events. In the case of events of con- 
siderable spatio-temporal extension this set of quanti- 
tative expressions is of bewildering complexity. If 
^ be an event, let us denote by q {e) the set of quanti- 
tative expressions defining its character including its 
connexions with the rest of nature. Let e^, e^^ ^3, etc. 
be an abstractive set, the members being so arranged 
that each member such as e^ extends over all the suc- 
ceeding members such as ^,^+1, e^^^^ and so on. Then 
corresponding to the series 

1 t, ^i> ^2> ^3> •••> ^nj ^n+l> •••> 

there is the series 

^ ' '^ - q (^i)> q {^2)y q (^s)* -m q (^n), q K+i), ..-. 

Call the series of events s and the series of quanti- 
tative expressions q (s). The series s has no last term and 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF feXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 8i 

no events which are contained in every member of the 
series. Accordingly the series of events converges to 
nothing. It is just itself. Also the series q {s) has no 
last term. ^But the sets of homologous quantities 
nmning through the various terms of the series do 
converge to definite limits^ For example if j^i be a 
quantitative measurement found in q (^i), and Q^ the 
homologue to Q^ to be found in q{e^y and Q^ the 
homologue to Q^ and Q^ to be found in q (^3), and so on, 
then the series 

Qly Q%i Qz9 •••> Qny Qn+U •••> 

though it has no last term, does in general converge to 
a definite limit. Accordingly there is a class of limits 
l(s) which is the class of the limits of those members of 
q(en) which have homologues throughout the series q(s) 
as n indefinitely increases. We can represent this state- 
ment diagranunatically by using an arrow (-^) to mean 
* converges to.' Then 

^l> ^2> ^3> •••> ^ny ^n+l» ••• "^ nothing, 

and 

The mutual relations between the limits in the set 
7(5), and also between these limits and the limits in 
other sets /(^'), l{s")y ..., which arise from other 
abstractive sets s\ 5", etc., have a peculiar simpUcity. 

Thus the set s does indicate an ideal simplicity of 
natural relations, though this simplicity is not the 
character of any actual event in s. We can make an 
approximation to such a simplicity which, as estimated 
numerically, is as close as we like by considering an 
event which is far enough down the series towards the 
small end. It will be noted that it is the infinite series, 

W.N. 6 



Digitized by 



Google 



82 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

as it stretches away in unending succession towards 
the small end, which is of importance. The arbitrarily 
large event with which the series starts has no importance 
at all. We can arbitrarily exclude any set of events at 
the big end of an abstractive set without the loss of 
any important property to the set as thus modified. 

I call the limiting character of natural relations which 
is indicated by an abstractive set, the * intrinsic character ' 
of the set; also the properties, connected with the 
relation of whole and part as concerning its members, 
by which an abstractive set is defined together form what 
I call its * extrinsic character.* The fact that the ex- 
trinsic character of an abstractive set determines a 
definite intrinsic character is the reason of the import- 
ance of the precise concepts of space and time. This 
emergence of a definite intrinsic character from an 
abstractive set is the precise meaning of the law of 
convergence. 

For example, we see a train approaching during a 
minute. The event which is the life of nature within 
that train during the minute is of great complexity and 
the expression of its relations and of the ingredients 
of its character bafHes us. If we take one second of 
that minute, the more limited event which is thus 
obtained is simpler in respect to its ingredients, and 
shorter and shorter times such as a tenth of that second, 
or a hundredth, or a thousandth — so long as we have a 
definite rule giving a definite succession of diminishing 
events — give events whose ingredient characters con- 
verge to the ideal simplicity of the character of the train 
at a definite instant. Furthermore there are different 
types of such convergence to simplicity. For example, 
we can converge as above to the limiting character 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 83 

expressing nature at an instant within the whole volume 
of the train at that instant, or to nature at an instant 
vnthin some portion of that volume — ^for example 
vnthin the boiler of the engine — or to nature at an 
instant on some area of surface, or to nature at an instant 
on some line^thin the train, or to nature at an instant 
at some point of the train. In the last case the simple 
limiting characters arrived at will be expressed as 
densities, specific gravities, and types of material. 
Fiuthermore we need not necessarily converge to an 
abstraction which involves nature at an instant. We 
may converge to the physical ingredients of a certain 
point track throughout the whole minute. Accordingly 
there are different types of extrinsic character of con- 
vergence which lead to the approximation to different 
types of intrinsic characters as limits. 

We now pass to the investigation of possible con- 
nexions between abstractive sets. One set may * cover' 
another. I define * covering' as follows: An abstractive 
set p covers an abstractive set q when every member of 
p contains as its parts some members of q. It is evident 
that if any event e contains as a part any member of 
the set 5, then owing to the transitive property of ex- 
tension every succeeding member of the small end of q 
is part of e. In such a case I will say that the abstractive 
set q * inheres in * the event e. Thus when an abstractive 
set p covers an abstractive set ^, the abstractive set q 
inheres in every member of />. 

Two abstractive sets may each cover the other. When 
this is the case I shall call the two sets * equal in ab- 
stractive force.' When there is no danger of misunder- 
standing I shall shorten this phrase by simply saying 
that the two abstractive sets are * equal.* The possibility 

6—2 



Digitized by 



Google 



84 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

of this equality of abstractive sets arises from the fact 
that both sets, p and q, are infinite series towards their 
small ends. Thus the equality means, that given any 
event x belonging to />, we can always by proceeding 
far enough towards the small end of q find an event y 
which is part of Xy and that then by proceeding far 
enough towards the small end oip we can find an event z 
which is part of jy, and so on indefinitely. 

The importance of the equality of abstractive sets 
arises from the assumption that the intrinsic characters 
of the two sets are identical. If this were not the case 
exact observation would be at an end. 

It is evident that any two abstractive sets which are 
equal to a third abstractive set are equal to each other. 
An * abstractive element' is the whole group of ab- 
stractive sets which are equal to any one of themselves. 
Thus all abstractive sets belonging to the same element 
are equal and converge to the same intrinsic character. 
Thus an abstractive element is the group of routes of 
approximation to a definite intrinsic character of ideal 
simplicity to be found as a limit among natimd facts. 

If an abstractive set/) covers an abstractive set g, then 
any abstractive set belonging to the abstractive element 
of which /> is a member will cover any abstractive set 
belonging to the element of which g is a member. 
Accordingly it is useful to stretch the meaning of the 
term * covering/ and to speak of one abstractive element 

* covering * another abstractive element. If we attempt in 
like manner to stretch the term * equal ' in the sense of 

* equal in abstractive force/ it is obvious that an ab- 
stractive element can only be equal to itself. Thus an 
abstractive element has a unique abstractive force and is 
the construct from events which represents one definite 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 85 

intrinsic character which is arrived at as a limit by the 
use of the principle of convergence to simplicity by 
diminution of extent. 

When an abstractive element A covers an abstractive 
element £, the intrinsic character of ^ in a sense 
includes the intrinsic character oi B. It results that 
statements about the intrinsic character of £ are in a 
sense statements about the intrinsic character of A\ 
but the intrinsic character of A is more complex than 
that of B. 

The abstractive elements form the fundamental 
elements of space and time, and we now turn to the 
consideration of the properties involved in the formation 
of special classes of such elements. In my last lecture 
I have already investigated one class of abstractive 
elements, namely moments. Each moment is a group 
of abstractive sets, and the events which are members 
of these sets are all members of one family of durations. 
The moments of one family form a temporal series; 
and, allowing the existence of different families of 
moments, there will be alternative temporal series in 
nature. Thus the method of extensive abstraction ex- 
plains the origin of temporal series in terms of the 
inunediate facts of experience and at the same time 
allows for the existence of the alternative temporal 
series which are demanded by the modern theory of / 
electromagnetic relativity. 

We now turn to space. The first thing to do is to 
get hold of the class of abstractive elements which are 
in some sense the points of space. Such an abstractive X 
element must in some sense exhibit a convergence to 
an absolute minimum of intrinsic character. Euclid 
has expressed for all time the general idea of a point, 



Digitized by 



Google 



86 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

as being without parts and without magnitude. It is 

this character of being an absolute minimum which we 

want to get at and to express in terms of the extrinsic 

characters of the abstractive sets which make up a point. 

^ Furthermore, points which are thus arrived at repre- 

^ sent the ideal of events without any extension, though 

/ there are in fact no such entities as these ideal events. 

V These points will not be the points of an external time- 

^ less space but of instantaneous spaces. We ultimately 

want to arrive at the timeless space of physical science, 

and also of common thought which is now tinged with 

the concepts of science. It will be convenient to reserve 

the term * point' for these spaces when we get to 

them. I will therefore use the name * event-particles ' 

for the ideal minimum limits to events. Thus an 

event-particle is an abstractive element and as such is 

a group of abstractive sets ; and a point — ^namely a point 

of timeless space — ^will be a class of event-particles. 

Furthermore there is a separate timeless space corre- 
sponding to each separate temporal series, that is to 
each separate family of durations. We will come back 
to points in timeless spaces later. I merely mention 
them now that we may understand the stages of our 
investigation. The totality of event-particles will fonn a 
four-dimensional manifold, the extra dimension arising 
from time — ^in other words — arising from the points of 
a timeless space being each a class of event-particles. 
The required character of the abstractive sets which 
form event-particles would be secured if we could define 
them as having the property of being covered by any 
abstractive set which they cover. For then any other 
abstractive set which an abstractive set of an event- 
particle covered, would be equal to it, and would 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 87 

therefore be a member of the same event-particle. 
Accordmgly an event-particle could cover no other 
abstractive element- This is the definition which I 
originally proposed at a congress in Paris in 1914^. 
There is however a difficulty involved in this definition 
if adopted without some further addition, and I am now 
not satisfied with the way in which I attempted to get 
over that difliculty in the paper referred to. 

The difliculty is this : When event-particles have once 
been defined it is easy to define the aggregate of event- 
particles forming the boundary of an event ; and thence 
to define the point-contact at their boundaries possible 
for a pair of events of which one is part of the other. 
We can then conceive all the intricacies of tangency. 
In particular we can conceive an abstractive set of 
which all the members have point-contact at the same 
event-particle. It is then easy to prove that there will 
be no abstractive set with the property of being 
covered by every abstractive set which it covers. I state 
this difliculty at some length because its existence guides 
the development of our line of argument. We have got 
to annex some condition to the root property of being 
covered by any abstractive set which it covers. When 
we look into this question of suitable conditions we find 
that in addition to event-particles all the other relevant 
spatial and spatio-temporal abstractive elements can 
be defined in the same way by suitably varying the 
conditions. Accordingly we proceed in a general way 
suitable for employment beyond event-particles. 

Let a be the name of any condition which some 
abstractive sets fulfil. I say that an abstractive set is 

1 Cf. 'La Th&rie Relationniste de TEspace/ Rev. de Mita- 
physique et de Morale, vol. xxiii, 1916. 



Digitized by 



Google 



88 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

^or-prime* when it has the two properties, (i) that it 
satisfies the condition a and (ii) that it is covered by 
every abstractive set which both is covered by it and 
satisfies the condition a. 

In other words you cannot get any abstractive set 
satisfying the condition a which exhibits intrinsic 
character more simple than that of a a-prime. 

There are also the correlative abstractive sets which 
I call the sets of a-antiprimes. An abstractive set is a ' 
or-antiprime when it has the two properties, (i) that it 
satisfies the condition a and (ii) that it covers every 
abstractive set which both covers it and satisfies the 
condition a. In other words you cannot get any ab- ^ 
stractive set satisfying the condition a which exhibits 
an intrinsic character more complex than ^hat of a 
a-antiprime. 

The intrinsic character of a a-prime has a certain 
minimum of fullness among those abstractive sets which 
are subject to the condition of satisfying a\ whereas 
the intrinsic character of a (r-antiprime has a corre- 
sponding maximum of fullness, and includes all it can 
in the circumstances. 

Let us first consider what help the notion of anti- 
primes could give us in the definition of moments 
which we gave in the last lecture. Let the condition 
or be the property of being a class whose members are 
all durations. An abstractive set which satisfies this 
condition is thus an abstractive set composed wholly 
of durations. It is convenient then to define a moment 
as the group of abstractive sets which are equal to some 
or-antiprime, where the condition or has this special 
meaning. It will be found on consideration (i) that 
each abstractive set forming a moment is a a-antiprime, 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 89 

where a has this $pecial meaning, and (ii) that we have 
excluded from membership of moments abstractive 
sets of durations which ail have one common boundary, 
either the initial boundary or the final boundary. We 
thus exclude special cases which are apt to confuse 
general reasoning. The new definition of a moment, 
which supersedes our previous definition, is (by the aid 
pi the notion of antiprimes) the more precisely drawn 
orthe two, and the more useful. 

The particular condition which *or* stood for in the 
definition of moments included something additional 
to anything which can be derived from the bare notioh 
of extension. A duration exhibits for thought a totality. 
The notion of totality is something beyond that of 
extension, though the two are interwoven in the notion 
of a duration. 

In the same way the particular condition *(t * required 
for the definition of an event-particle must be looked for 
beyond the mere notion of extension. The same remark 
is also true of the particular conditions requisite for the 
other spatial elements. This additional notion is ob- 
tained by distinguishing between the notion of * posi- 
tion* and the notion of convergence to an ideal zero of 
extension as exhibited by an abstractive set of events. 

In order to understand this distinction consider a 
point of the instantaneous space which we conceive 
as apparent to us in an almost instantaneous glance. 
This point is an event-particle. It has two aspects. In 
one aspect it is there, where it is. This is its position in 
the space. In another aspect it is got at by ignoring the 
circumambient space, and by concentrating attention on 
the smaller and smaller set of events which approximate 
to it. This is its extrinsic character. Thus a point has 



Digitized by 



Google 



90 



THE CONCEPT OF NATURE 



[CH, 



'^^J three characters, namely, its position in the whole 
instantaneous space, its extrinsic character, and its 
intrinsic character. The same is true of any other spatial 
element. For example an instantaneous volume in 
instantaneous space has three characters, namely, its 
position, its extrinsic character as a group of abstractive 
sets, and its intrinsic character which is the limit of 
, natural properties which is indicated by any one of 
these abstractive sets. 

Before we can talk about position in instantaneous 
space, we must evidently be quite clear as to what we 
mean by instantaneous space in itself. Instantaneous 
space must be looked for as a character of a moment. 
For a moment is all nature at an instant. It cannot be 
the intrinsic character of the moment. For the intrinsic 
character tells us the limiting character of nature in 
space at that instant. Instantaneous space must be 
an assemblage of abstractive elements considered in 
their mutual relations. Thus an instantaneous space is 

\ the assemblage of abstractive elements covered by some 
one moment, and it is the instantaneous space of that 
moment. 

We have now to ask what character we have found in 
nature which is capable of according to the elements of 
an instantaneous space different qualities of position. 
This question at once brings us to the intersection of 
moments, which is a topic not as yet considered in 
these lectures. 

The locus of intersection of two moments is the 
assemblage of abstractive elements covered by both of 
them. Now two moments of the same temporal series 
cannot intersect. Two moments respectively of different 
families necessarily intersect. Accordingly in the in- 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 91 

stantaneous space of a moment we should expect the 
fundamental properties to be marked by the inter- 
sections with moments of other families. If M be a 
given moment, the intersection of M with another 
moment A is an instantaneous plane in the instan- 
taneous space of M; and if £ be a third moment 
intersecting both M and Ay the intersection of M and B 
is another plane in the space M. Also the common 
intersection of A^ 5, and M is the intersection of the 
two planes in the space M, namely it is a straight line 
in the space M. An exceptional case arises if B and M 
intersect in the same plane as A and M. Furthermore 
if C be a fourth moment, then apart from special cases 
which we need not consider, it intersects M in a plane 
which the straight line (.4, J5, M) meets. Thus there 
is in general a conmion intersection of four moments 
of different families. This common intersection is an 
assemblage of abstractive elements which are each 
covered (or *lie in') all four moments. The three- 
dimensional property of instantaneous space comes to 
this, that (apart from special relations between the four 
moments) any fifth moment either contains the whole 
of their common intersection or none of it. No further 
subdivision of the common intersection is possible by 
means of moments. The *all or none* principle holds. 
This is not an a priori truth but an empirical fact of 
nature. 

It will be convenient to reserve the ordinary spatial 
terms * plane,' 'straight line,' * point' for the elements 
of the timeless space of a time-system. Accordingly an 
instantaneous plane in the instantaneous space of a 
moment will be called a * level,' an instantaneous straight 
line v^U be called a 'rect,' and an instantaneous point 



Digitized by 



Google 



92 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

will be called a * punct.' Thus a punct is the assemblage 
of abstractive elements which lie in each of four moments 
whose families have no special relations to each other. 
Also if P be any moment, either every abstractive 
element belonging to a given punct lies in P, or no 
abstractive element of that punct lies in P. 
N Position is the quality which an abstractive element 
possesses in virtue of the moments in which it lies. The 
abstractive elements which lie in the instantaneous 
space of a given moment M are differentiated from each 
other by the various other moments which intersect M 
so as to contain various selections of these abstractive 
elements. It is this differentiation of the elements which 
constitutes their differentiation of position. An ab- 
stractive element which belongs to a pimct has the 
simplest type of position in M, an abstractive element 
which belongs to a rect but not to a punct has a more 
complex quality of position, an abstractive element 
which belongs to a level and not to a rect has a still 
more complex quality of position, and finally the most 
complex quality of position belongs to an abstractive 
element which belongs to a volume and not to a level. 
A volume however has not yet been defined. This 
definition will be given in the next lecture. 

Evidently levels, rects, and puncts in their capacity 
as infinite aggregates cannot be the termini of sense- 
awareness, nor can they be limits which are approxi- 
mated to in sense-awareness. Any one member of a 
level has a certain quality arising from its character as 
also belonging to a certain set of moments, but the level 
as a whole is a mere logical notion without any route of 
approximation along entities posited in sense-awareness. 

On the other hand an event-particle is defined so as 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 93 

to exhibit this character of being a route of approxi- 
mation marked out by entities posited in sense-aware- 
ness. A definite event-particle is defined in reference 
to a definite punct in the following manner: Let the 
condition a mean the property of covering all the 
abstractive elements which are members of that punct; 
so that an abstractive set which satisfies the condition a 
is an abstractive set which covers every abstractive 
element belonging to the punct. Then the definition 
of the event-particle associated with the punct is that 
it is the group of all the a-primes, where a has this 
particular meaning. 

It is evident that — ^with this meaning of o — every 
abstractive set equal to a a-prime is itself a a-prime. 
Accordingly an event-particle as thus defined is an 
abstractive element, namely it is the group of those 
abstractive sets which are each equal to some given 
abstractive set. If we write out the definition of the 
event-particle associated with some given punct, which 
we will call tt, it is as follows: The event-particle as- 
sociated with IT is the group of abstractive classes each 
of which has the two properties (i) that it covers every 
abstractive set in tt and (ii) that all the abstractive sets 
which also satisfy the former condition as to it and which 
it covers, also cover it. 

An event-particle has position by reason of its 
association with a punct, and conversely the punct 
gains its derived character as a route of approximation 
from its association with the event-particle. These two 
characters of a point are always recurring in any treat- 
ment of the derivation of a point from the observed 
facts of nature, but in general there is no clear recogni- 
tion of their distinction. 



Digitized by 



Google 



94 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 



j The peculiar simplicity of an instantaneous point has 
! a twofold origin, one connected with ppgitipn, that is 
J to say with its character as a piuict, and the other con- 
nected with its character as an event^jarticle. The 
simplicity of the punct arises from its indivisibility by 
a moment. 

The simplicity of an event-particle arises from the 
indivisibility of its intrinsic character. The intrinsic 
character of an event-particle is indivisible in the sense 
that every abstractive set covered by it exhibits the 
same intrinsic character. It follows that, though there 
are diverse abstractive elements covered by event- 
particles, there is no advantage to be gained by con- 
sidering them since we gain no additional simplicity 
in the expression of natural properties. 

These two characters of simplicity enjoyed respec- 
tively by event-particles and puncts define a meaning for 
Euclid's phrase, * without parts and without magnitude.' 
It is obviously convenient to sweep away out of our 
thoughts all these stray abstractive sets which are 
covered by event-particles without themselves being 
members of them. They give us nothing new in the 
way of intrinsic character. Accordingly we can think 
of rects and levels as merely loci of event-particles. 
In so doing we are also cutting out those abstractive 
elements which cover sets of event-particles, without 
these elements being event-particles themselves. There 
are classes of these abstractive elements which are of 
great importance. I will consider them later on in this 
and in other lectures. Meanwhile we will ignore them. 
Also I will always speak of * event-particles ' in pre- 
ference to *p\mcts,' the latter being an artificial word 
for which I have no great affection. 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 95 

Parallelism among rects and levels is now explicable. 

Consider the instantaneous space belonging to a 
moment A^ and let A belong to the temporal series of 
moments which I Mill call a. Consider any other 
temporal series of moments which I will call jS. The 
moments of j8 do not intersect each other and they 
intersect the moment -^4 in a family of levels. None of 
these levels can intersect, and they form a family of 
parallel instantaneous planes in the instantaneous space 
of moment A. Thus the parallelism of moments in a 
temporal series begets the parallelism of levels in an 
instantaneous space, and thence — as it is easy to see — 
the parallelism of rects. Accordingly the Euclidean 
property of space arises from the parabolic property of 
time. It may be that there is reason to adopt a hyper- 
bolic theory of time and a corresponding hyperbolic 
theory of space. Such a theory has not been worked out, 
so it is not possible to judge as to the character of the 
evidence which could be brought forw^d in its favour. 

The theory of order in an instantaneous space is 
immediately derived from time-order. For consider the 
space of a moment M. Let a be the name of a time- 
system to which M does not belong. Let A^^ A^y A^y etc. 
be moments of a in the order of their occurrences. Then 
A^y A^y A^y etc. intersect M in parallel levels /j, /g, /s, etc. 
Then the relative order of the parallel levels in the 
space of M is the same as the relative order of the corre- 
sponding moments in the time-system a. Any rect in 
M which intersects all these levels in its set of puncts, 
thereby receives for its puncts an order of position on it. 
So spatial order is derivative from temporal order. 
Furthermore there are alternative time-systems, but 
there is only one definite spatial order in each instan- 



Digitized by 



Google 



96 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

taneous space. According the various modes of 
deriving spatial order from diverse time-systems must 
harmonise with one spatial order in each instantaneous 
space. In this way also diverse time-orders are com- 
parable. 

We have two great questions still on hand to be 
settled before our theory of space is fiilly adjusted. 
One of these is the question of the determination of the 
methods of measurement within the space, in other 
words, the congruence-theory of the space. The 
measurement of space will be found to be closely 
connected with the measurement of time, with respect 
to which no principles have as yet been determined. 
Thus our congruence-theory will be a theory both for 
space and for time. Secondly there is the determination 
of the timeless space which corresponds to any particular 
time-system with its infinite set of instantaneous spaces 
in its successive moments. This is the space — or rather, 
these are the spaces — of physical science. It is very 
usual to dismiss this space by saying that this is con- 
ceptual. I do not imderstand the virtue of these phrases. 
I suppose that it is meant that the space is the concep- 
tion of something in nature. Accordingly if the space 
of physical science is to be called conceptual, I ask, 
What in nature is it the conception of? For example, 
when we speak of a point in the timeless space of 
physical science, I suppose that we are speaking of 
something in nature. If we are not so speaking, our 
scientists are exercising their wits in the realms of 
pure fantasy, and this is palpably not the case. This 
demand for a definite Habeas Corpus Act for the pro- 
duction of the relevant entities in nature applies whether 
space be relative or absolute. On the theory of relative 



Digitized by 



Google 



IV] METHOD OF EXTENSIVE ABSTRACTION 97 

space y it may perhaps be argued that there is no timeless 
space for physical science, and that there is only the 
momentary series of instantaneous spaces. 

An explanation must then be asked for the meaning 
of the very common statement that such and such a 
man walked foiir miles in some definite hour. How can 
you measure distance from one space into another 
space? I understand walking out of the sheet of an 
ordnance map. But the meaning of saying that Cam- 
bridge at 10 o'clock this morning in the appropriate 
instantaneous space for that instant is 52 miles from 
London at 11 o'clock this morning in the appropriate 
instantaneous space for that instant beats me entirely. 
I think that, by the time a meaning has been produced 
for this statement, you will find that you have constructed 
what is in fact a timeless space. What I cannot under- 
stand is how to produce an explanation of meaning 
without in effect making some such construction. Also 
I may add that I do not know how the instantaneous 
spaces are thus correlated into one space by any method 
which is available on the current theories of space. 

You will have noticed that by the aid of the assump- 
tion of alternative time-systems, we are arriving at an 
explanation of the character of space. In natural science 
* to explain ' means merely to discover * interconnexions.' 
For example, in one sense there is no explanation of the 
red which you see. It is red, and there is nothing else 
to be said about it. Either it is posited before you in 
sense-awareness or you are ignorant of the entity red. 
But science has explained red. Namely it has dis- 
covered interconnexions between red as a factor in 
nature and other factors in nature, for example waves of 
light which are waves of electromagnetic disturbances. 

W.N. 7 



Digitized by 



Google 



98 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch.iv 

There are also various pathological states of the body 
which lead to the seeing of red without the occurrence 
of light waves. Thus connexions have been discovered 
between red as posited in sense-awareness and various 
other factors in nature. The discovery of these con- 
nexions constitutes the scientific explanation of our 
vision of colour. In like manner the dependence of 
the character of space on the character of time con- 
stitutes an explanation in the sense in which science 
seeks to explain. The systematising intellect abhors 
bare facts. The character of space has hitherto been 
presented as a collection of bare facts, ultimate and 
disconnected. The theory which I am expoimding 
sweeps away this disconnexion of the facts of space. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CHAPTER V 

SPACE AND MOTION 

The topic for this lecture is the continuation of the 
task of explaining the construction of spaces as ab- 
stracts from the facts of nature. It was noted at the 
close of the previous lecture that the question of 
congruence had not been considered, nor had the con- 
struction of a timeless space which should correlate 
the successive momentary spaces of a given time-system. 
Furthermore it was also noted that there were many 
spatial abstractive elements which we had not yet 
defined. We will first consider the definition of some 
of these abstractive elements, namely the definitions 
of solids, of areas, and of routes. By a * route* I mean 
a linear segment, whether straight or curved. The ex- 
position of these definitions and the preliminary ex- 
planations necessary will, I hope, serve as 'a general 
explanation of the function of event-particles in the 
analysis of nature. 

We note that event-particles have ^position ' in respect 
to each other. In the last lectiu'e I explained that 
* position* was quality gained by a spatial element in 
virtue of the intersecting moments which covered it. 
Thus each event-particle has position in this sense. 
The simplest mode of expressing the position in nature 
of an event-particle is by first fixing on any definite 
time-system. Call it a. There will be one moment of 
the temporal series of a which covers the given event- 
particle. Thus the position of the event-particle in the 
temporal series a is defined by this moment, which we 

7—2 



Digitized by 



Google 



loo THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

will call M. The position of the particle in the space 
of Af is then fixed in the ordinary way by three levels 
which intersect in it and in it only. This procedure of 
fixing the position of an event-particle shows that the 
aggregate of event-particles forms a four-dimensional 
manifold. A finite event occupies a limited chunk of 
this manifold in a sense which I now proceed to explain. 
Let e be any given event. The manifold of event- 
particles falls into three sets in reference to e. Each 
event-particle is a group of equal abstractive sets and 
each abstractive set towards its small-end is composed 
of smaller and smaller finite events. When we select 
from these finite events which enter into the make-up 
of a given event-particle those which are small enough, 
one of three cases must occur. Either (i) all of these 
small events are entirely separate from the given event e, 
or (ii) all of these small events are parts of the event e, 
or (iii) all of these small events overlap the event e but 
are not parts of it. In the first case the event-particle 
will be said to * lie outside * the event e^ in the second 
case the event-particle will be said to *lie inside* the 
event e^ and in the third case the event-particle will be 
said to be a ^boundary-particle' of the event e. Thus there 
are three sets of particles, namely the set of those which 
he outside the event e, the set of those which lie inside 
the event e, and the boxmdary of the event e which is 
the set of boxmdary-particles of e. Since an event is 
four-dimensional, the boundary of an event is a three- 
dimensional manifold. For a finite event there is a 
continuity of boundary; for a duration the boundary 
consists of those event-particles which are covered by 
\ j either of the two boimding moments. Thus the boundary 
f of a duration consists of two momentary three-dimen- 



Digitized by 



Google 



V] SPACE AND MOTION loi 

sional spaces. An event will be said to * occupy' the 
aggregate of event-particles which lie within it. 
• Two events which have * junction* in the sense in 
which junction was described in my last lecture, and 
yet are separated so that neither event either overlaps 
or is part of the other event, are said to be * adjoined.* 

This relation of adjunction issues in a peculiar relation 
between the boundaries of the two events. The two 
boundaries must have a common portion which is in 
fact a continuous three-dimensional locus of event- 
particles in the four-dimensional manifold. 

A three-dimensional locus of event-particles which 
is the conunon portion of the boundary of two adjoined i 
events will be called a ^ solid .* A solid may or may not 
lie completely in one moment. A solid which does not 
lie in one moment will be called * vagrant.* A solid 
which does lie in one moment will be called a volume. 
A volume may be defined as the locus of the event- i 
particles in which a moment intersects an event, pro- 
vided that the two do intersect. The intersection of a 
moment and an event will evidently consist of those 
event-particles which are covered by the moment and 
lie in the event. The identity of the two definitions of a 
volume is evident when we remember that an intersect- 
ing moment divides the event into two adjoined events. 

A solid as thus defined, whether it be vagrant or be 
a volume, is a mere aggregate of event-particles illus- 
trating a certain quality of position. We can also define 
a solid as an abstractive element. In order to do so we 
recur to the theory of primes explained in the preceding 
lecture. Let the condition named a stand for the fact 
that each of the events of any abstractive set satisfying it 
has all the event-particles of some particular solid lying 



Digitized by 



Google 



102 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

in it. Then the group of all the a-primes is the abstractive 
element which is associated with the given solid. I will 
call this abstractive element the solid as an abstractive 
element, and I will call the aggregate of event-particles 
the solid as a locus. The instantaneous volumes in 
instantaneous space which are the ideals of our sense- 
perception are volumes as abstractive elements. What 
we really perceive with all our efforts after exactness 
are small events far enough down some abstractive 
set belonging to the volume as an abstractive element. 

It is difficult to know how far we approximate to any 
perception of vagrant solids. We certainly do not think 
that we make any such approximation. But then our 
thoughts — ^in the case of people who do think about 
such topics — ^are so much under the control of the 
materialistic theory of nature that they hardly count 
for evidence. If Einstein^s theory of gravitation has any 
truth in it, vagrant solids are of great importance in 
science. The whole boundary of a finite event may be 
looked on as a particular example of a vagrant solid 
as a locus. Its particular property of being closed pre- 
vents it from being definable as an abstractive element. 

When a moment intersects an event, it also intersects 
the boxmdary of that event. This locus, which is the 
portion of the boundary contained in the moment, is 
the bounding surface of the corresponding volume of 
that event contained in the moment. It is a two- 
dimensional locus. 

The fact that every volume has a bounding surface is 
the origin of the Dedekindian continuity of space. 

Another event may be cut by the same moment in 
another volume and this volume will also have its 
boundary. These two volumes in the instantaneous 



Digitized by 



Google 



V] SPACE AND MOTION 103 

space of one moment may mutually overlap in the ^ 
familiar way which I need not describe in detail and thus 
cut off portions from each other's surfaces. These por- 
tions of surfaces are * momental areas/ 

It is unnecessary at this stage to enter into the com- 
plexity of a definition of vagrant areas. Their definition 
iis simple enough when the four-dimensional manifold 
of event-particles has been more fully explored as to 
its properties. 

Momental are§s can evidently be defined as abstrac- 
tive elements by exactly the same method as applied 
to solids. We have merely to substitute *area' for a 
'solid* in the words of the definition already given. 
Also, exactly as in the analogous case of a solid, what 
we perceive as an approximation to our ideal of an area 
is a small event far enough down towards the small end 
of one of the equal abstractive sets which belongs to 
the area as an abstractive element. 

Two momental areas lying in the same moment can 
cut each other in a momental segment which is not 
necessarily rectilinear. Such a segment can also be 
defined as an abstractive element. It is then called a 
* momental route.* We will not delay over any general 
consideration of these momental routes, nor is it 
important for us to proceed to the still wider investiga- 
tion of vagrant routes in general. There are however two 
simple sets of routes which are of vital importance. One 
is a set of momental routes and the other of vagrant 
routes. Both sets can be classed together as straight 
routes. We proceed to define them without any re- 
ference to the definitions of volumes and surfaces. 

The two types of straight routes will be called ^ 
rectilinear routes and stations. Rectilinear routes are 



Digitized by 



Google 



104 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

momental routes and stations are vagrant routes. 
Rectilinear routes are routes which in a sense lie in 
rects. Any two event-particles on a rect define the set 
of event-particles which lie between them on that rect. 
Let the satisfaction of the condition a by an abstractive 
set mean that the two given event-particles and the 
event-particles lying between them on the rect all lie 
in every event belonging to the abstractive set. The 
group of (T-primes, where a has this meaning, form an 
abstractive element. Such abstractive elements are recti- 
linear routes. They are the segments of instantaneous 
straight lines which are the ideals of exact perception. 
Our actual perception, however .exact, will be the per- 
ception of a small event sufficiently far down one of 
the abstractive sets of the abstractive element. 

A statio £ is a vagrant route and no moment can inter- 
sect any station in more than one event-particle. Thus 
a station carries with it a comparison of the positions 
in their respective moments of the event-particles 
covered by it. Rects arise from the intersection of 
moments* But as yet no properties of events have been 
mentioned by which any analogous vagrant loci can 
be found out. 

The general problem for our investigation is to 
determine a method of comparison of position in one 
instantaneous space with positions in other instantaneous 
spaces. We may limit ourselves to the spaces of the 
parallel moments of one time-system. How are positions 
in these various spaces to be compared ? In other words. 
What do we mean by motion? It is the fundamental 
question to be asked of any theory of relative space, 
and like many other fundamental questions it is apt to 
be left unanswered. It is not an answer to reply, that 



Digitized by 



Google 



V] SPACE AND MOTION 105 

we all know what we mean by motion. Of course we 
do, so far as sense-awareness is concerned. I am asking 
that your theory of space should provide natxu-e with 
something to be observed. You have not settled the 
question by bringing forward a theory according to 
which there is nothing to be observed, and by then 
reiterating that nevertheless we do observe this non- 
existent fact. Unless motion is something as a fact in 
nature, kinetic energy and momentum and all that 
depends on these physical concepts evaporate from our 
list of physical realities. Even in this revolutionary age 
my conservatism resolutely opposes the identification 
of momentum and moonshine. 

Accordingly I assume it as an axiom, that motion 
is a physical fact. It is something that we perceive as 
innatiu-e. Motion presupposes rest. Until theory arose 
to vitiate inunediate intuition, that is to say to vitiate 
the uncriticised judgments which immediately arise 
from sense-awareness, no one doubted that in motion 
you leave behind that which is at rest. Abraham in his 
wanderings left his birthplace where it had ever been. 
A theory of motion and a theory of rest are the same 
thing viewed from different aspects with altered em- 
phasis. 

Now you cannot have a theory of rest without in some I 
sense admitting a theory of absolute position. It is - 
usually assumed that relative space implies that there is 
no absolute position. This is, according to my creed, a 
mistake. The assiunption arises from the failure to 
make another distinction; namely, that there may be 
alternative definitions of absolute position. This possi- 
bility enters Mrith the admission of alternative time- 
systems. Thus the series of spaces in the parallel 



Digitized by 



Google 



io6 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

moments of one temporal series may have their own 
definition of absolute position correlating sets of event- 
particles in these successive spaces, so that each set 
consists of event-particles, one from each space, all 
with the property of possessing the same absolute 
position in that series of spaces. Such a set of event- 
particles will form a point in the timeless space of that 
time-system. Thus a point is really an absolute position 
in the timeless space of a given time-system. 

But th^e are alternative time-systems, and each 
time-system has its own peculiar group of points — that 
is to say, its own peculiar definition of absolute position. 
This is exactly the theory which I will elaborate. 

In looking to nature for evidence of absolute position 
it is of no use to recur to the four-dimensional manifold 
of event-particles. This manifold has been obtained by 
the extension of thought beyond the immediacy of 
observation. We shall find nothing in it except what we 
have put th^e to represent the ideas in thou^t which 
arise from our direct sense-^awareness of nature. To 
find evidence of the properties which are to be found 
in the manifold of event-particles we must always 
recur to the observation of relations between events. 
Our problem is to determine those relations between 
events which issue in the property of absolute position 
in a timeless space. This is in fact the problem of the 
determination of the very meaning of the timeless 
spaces of physical science. 

In reviewing the factors of natxu-e as immediately 
disclosed in sense-awareness, we should note the 
fundamental character of the pCTcept of * being here.' 
We discern an event merely as a factor in a determinate 
complex in which each factor has its own peculiar share. 



Digitized by 



Google 



V] SPACE AND MOTION 107 

There are two factors which are always ingredient in 
this complex, one is the duration which is represented ' 
in thought by the concept of all nature that is present 
now, and the other is the peculiar locus standi for mind \ 
involved in the sense-awareness. This locus standi in 
nature is what is represented in thought by the concept 
of * here/ namely of an * event here/ 

This is the concept of a definite factor in nature. This 
factor is an event in nature which is thc/ltKus in natiire 
for that act of awareness, and the other events are 
perceived as referred to it. This event is part of the 
associated diuation. I call it the 'percipient event.* 
This event is not the mind, that is to say, not the per- 
cipient. It is that in nature from which the mind 
perceives. The complete foothold of the mind in nature 
is represented by the pair of events, namely, the present 
duration which marks the * when* of awareness and the 
percipient event which marks the * where* of awareness 
and the *how* of awareness. This percipient event is 
roughly speaking the bodily life of the incarnate mind. 
But this identification is only a rough one. For the 
functions of the body shade off into those of other events 
in nature ; so that for some purposes the percipient event 
is to be reckoned as merely part of the bodily life and 
for other purposes it may even be reckoned as more than 
the bodily life. In many respects the demarcation is 
purely arbitrary, depending upon where in a sliding 
scale you choose to draw the line. 

I have already in my previous lecture on Time dis- 
cussed the association of mind with nature. The difficulty 
of the discussion lies in the liability of constant factors 
to be overlooked. We never note them by contrast 
with their absences. The purpose of a discussion of such 



Digitized by 



Google 



io8 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

factors may be described as being to make obvious 
things look odd. We cannot envisage them unless we 
manage to invest them Mrith some of the freshness which 
is due to strangeness. 

It is because of this habit of letting constant factors 
slip from consciousness that we constantly fall into the 
error of thinking of the sense-awareness of a particular 
factor in nature as being a two-termed relation between 
the mind and the factor. For example, I perceive a 
green leaf. Language in this statement suppresses all 
reference to any factors other than the percipient mind 
and the green leaf and the relation of sense-awareness* 
It discards the obvious inevitable factors which are 
essential elements in the perception. I am here, the 
leaf is there ; and the event here and the event which is 
the life of the leaf there are both embedded in a totality 
of nature which is now, and Mrithin this totality there 
are other discriminated factors which it is irrelevant to 
mention. Thus language habitually sets before the mind 
a misleading abstract of the indefinite complexity of 
the fact of sense-awareness. 

What I now want to discuss is the special relation of 
the percipient event which is *here* to the duration 
which is * now.' This relation is a fact in natxu-e, namely 
the mind is aware of nature as being with these two 
factors in this relation. 

Within the short present duration the *here' of the 
percipient event has a definite meaning of some sort. 
This meaning of * here ' is the content of the* special 
relation of the percipient event to its associated duration* 
I will call this relation * cogredience.' Accordingly I ask 
for a description of the character of the relation of 
cogredience. The present snaps into a past and a present 



Digitized by 



Google 



V] SPACE AND MOTION 109 

when the *here' of cogredience loses its single deter- 
minate meaning. There has been a passage of nature 
from the *here' of perception within the past duration 
to the different * here * of perception within the present 
duration. But the two *heres' of sense-awareness 
within neighbouring durations may be indistinguishable. 
In this case there has been a passage from the past to 
the present, but a more retentive perceptive force might 
have retained the passing nature as one complete present 
instead of letting the earlier duration slip into the past. 
Namely, the sense of rest helps the integration of dura- 
tions into a prolonged present, and the sense of motion 
diflFerentiates nature into a succession of shortened 
durations. As we look out of a railway carriage in an 
express train, the present is past before reflexion can 
seize it. We live in snippits too quick for thought. On 
the other hand the immediate present is prolonged 
according as nature presents itself to us in an aspect of 
unbroken rest. Any change in nature provides ground 
for a differentiation among durations so as to shorten 
the present. But there is a great distinction between 
self-change in nature and change in external nature. 
Self-change in nature is change in the quality of the 
standpoint of the percipient event. It is the break up 
of the *here' which necessitates the break up of the 
present duration. Change in external nature is com- 
patible with a prolongation of the present of contem- 
plation rooted in a given standpoint. What I want to 
bring out is that the preservation of a peculiar relation 
to a duration is a necessary condition for the function 
of that duration as a present duration for sense-aware- 
ness. This peculiar relation is the relation of cogredi- 
ence between the percipient event and the duration. 



Digitized by 



Google 



no THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

Cogredience is the preservation of unbrc^en quality of 
standpoint within the duration. It is the continuance 
of identity of station within the whole of nature which 
is the terminus of sense-awareness. The duration may 
comprise change within itself, but cannot — so far as it 
is one present duration — comprise change in the^uality 
of its peculiar relation to the contained percipient event. 

In other words, perception is always 'here/ and a 
duration can only be posited as present for sense-aware- 
ness on condition that it affords one unbroken meaning 
of *here' in its relation to the percipient event. It is 
only in the past that you can have been 'there* with a 
standpoint distinct from your present 'here.' 

Events th^e and events here are facts of nature, and 
the qualities of being 'there* and 'here' are not merely 
qualities of awareness as a relation between nature and 
mind. The quality of determinate station in the duration 
which belongs to an event which is ' here ' in one deto*- 
minate sense of 'here' is the same kind of quality of 
station which belongs to an event which is 'there' in 
one determinate sense of 'there.' Thus cogredience has 
nothing to do Mrith any biological character of the event 
which is related by it to the associated duration. This 
biological character is apparently a further condition 
for the peculiar connexion of a percipient event with 
the percipience of mind ; but it has nothing to do with 
the relation of the percipient event to the duration 
which is the present whole of nature posited as the 
disclosure of the percipience. 

Given the requisite biological character, the event in 
its character of a percipient event selects that duration 
with which the operative past of the event is practi- 
cally cogredient within the limits of the exactitude of 



Digitized by 



Google 



V] SPACE AND MOTION iii 

observation. Namely, amid the alternative time-systems 
which nature offers th«-e will be one with a duration 
giving the best average of cogredience for all the sub- 
ordinate parts of the percipient event. This duration 
wiilbe the whole of nature which is the terminus posited 
by sense-awareness. Thus the character of the percipient 
\svent determines the time-system immediately evident 
in nature. As the character of the percipient event 
changes Mdth the passage of nature — or, in other words, 
as the percipient mind in its passage correlates itself 
with the passage of the percipient event into another 
percipient event — ^the time-system correlated with the 
percipience of that mind may change. When the bulk 
of the events perceived are cogredient in a duration 
other than that of the percipient event, the percipience 
may include a double consciousness of cogredience, 
namely the consciousness of the whole within which the 
observer in the train is *here,* and the consciousness of 
the whole within which the trees and bridges and 
telegraph posts are definitely * there.' Thus in per- 
ceptions under certain circumstances the events dis- 
criminated assert their own relations of cogredience. 
This assertion of cogredience is peculiarly evident when 
the duration to which the perceived event is cogredient 
is the same as the duration which is the present whole 
of nature — ^in other words, when the event and the per- 
cipient event are both cogredient to the same duration. 

We are now prepared to consider the meaning of 
stations in a duration, where stations are a peculiar 
kind of routes, which define absolute position in the 
associated timeless space. 

There are however some preliminary explanations. 
A finite event will be said to extend throughout a 



Digitized by 



Google 



112 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

duration when it is part of the duration and is inter- 
sected by any moment which lies in the duration. Such 
an event begins Mdth the duration and ends with it. 
Furthermore every event which begins Mdth the diua- 
tion and ends with it, extends throughout the duration. 
This is an axiom based on the continuity of events. By 
beginning Mrith a duration and ending with it, I mean 
(i) that the event is part of the diu-ation, and (ii) that 
both the initial and final boundary moments of the 
duration cover some event-particles on the boundary of 
the event. 

Every event which is cogredient Mrith a duration 
extends throughout that duration. 

It is not true that all the parts of an event cogredient 
with a duration are also cogredient with the duration. 
The relation of cogredience may fail in either of two " 
ways. One reason for failure may be that the part does 
not extend throughout the duration. In this case the 
part may be cogredient Mrith another duration which is 
part of the given duration, though it is not cogredient 
with the given duration itself. Such a part would be 
cogredient if its existence were sufficiently prolonged 
in that time-system. The other reason for failure arises 
from the four-dimensional .extension of events so that 
there is no determinate route of transition of events in 
linear series. For example, the timnel of a tube railway 
is an event at rest in a certain time-system, that is to say, 
it is cogredient Mrith a certain duration. A train travel- 
ling in it is part of that tunnel, but is not itself at rest. 

If an event e be cogredient Mrith a duration dy and 
d' be any duration which is part of d. Then d' belongs 
to the same time-system as d. Also d' intersects e in 
an event e' which is part of e and is cogredient with d' . 



Digitized by 



Google 



v] SPACE AND MOTION 113 

Let P be any event-particle lying in a given duration 
d. Consider the aggregate of events in which P lies 
and which are also cogredient Mrith d. Each of these 
events occupies its own aggregate of event-particles. 
These aggregates will have a common portion, namely 
the class of event-particle lying in all of them. This class 
of event-particles is what I call the * station' of the 
event-particle P in the duration d. This is the station in 
the character of a locus. A station can also be defined in 
the character of an abstractive element. Let the pro- 
perty a be the name of the property which an abstractive 
set possesses when (i) each of its events is cogredient 
with the duration d and (ii) the event-particle P lies 
in each of its events. Then the group of a-primes, where 
(T has this meaning, is an abstractive element and is the 
station of P in 1/ as an abstractive element. The locus 
of event-particles covered by the station oi P in d as 
an abstractive element is the station of P in rf as a 
locus. A station has accordingly the usual three 
characters, namely, its character of position, its ex- 
trinsic character as an abstractive element, and its 
intrinsic character. 

It follows from the peculiar properties of rest that 
two stations belonging to the same duration cannot 
intersect. Accordingly every event-particle on a station 
of a duration has that station as its station in the duration. 
Also every duration which is part of a given duration 
intersects the stations of the given duration in loci which 
are its own stations. By means of these properties we can 
utilise the overlappings of the durations of one family — 
that is, of one time-system — ^to prolong stations in- 
definitely backwards and forwards. Such a prolonged 
station will be called a poj^^feagk . A point-.track is a 

W.N. 8 



Digitized by 



Google 



114 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

locus of event-particles. It is defined by reference to 
one particular time-system, a say. Corresponding to 
any other time-system these vnU be a different group 
of point-tracks. Every event-particle will lie on one 
and only one point-track of the group belonging to any 
one time-system. The group of point-tracks of the time- 
system a is the group of points of the timeless space of a. 
Each such point indicates a certain quality of absolute 
position in reference to the durations of the family 
associated Mrith a, and thence in reference to the suc- 
cessive instantaneous spaces lying in the successive 
moments of a. Each moment of a vnll intersect a 
point-track in one and only one event-particle. 

This property of the unique intersection of a moment 
and a point-track is not confined to the case when the 
moment and the point-track belong to the same time- 
system. Any two event-particles on a point-track are 
sequential, so that they cannot lie in the same moment. 
Accordingly no moment can intersect a point-track 
more than once, and every moment intersects a point- 
track in one event-particle. 

Anyone who at the successive moments of a should 
be at the event-particles where those moments intersect 
a given point of a vnll be at rest in the timeless space 
of time-system a. But in any other timeless space 
belonging to another time-system he Mrill be at a 
different point at each succeeding moment of that time- 
system. In other words he will be moving. He will be 
moving in a straight line Mrith uniform velocity. We 
might take this as the definition of a straight line. 
Namely, a straight line in the space of time-system p is 
the locus of those points of jS which all intersect some 
one point-track which is a point in the space of some 



Digitized by 



Google 



V] SPACE AND MOTION .115 

other time-system. Thus each point in the space of a 
time-system a is associated with one and only one 
straight line of the space of any other time-system p. 
Furthermore the set of straight lines in space jS which 
are thus associated Mrith points in space a form a com- 
plete family of parallel straight lines in space p. Thus 
there is a one-to-one correlation of points in space a 
with the straight lines of a certain definite family of 
parallel straight lines in space jS. Conversely there is 
an analogous one-to-one correlation of the points in 
space jS with the straight lines of a certain family of 
parallel straight lines in space a. These families will be 
called respectively the family of parallels in j8 associated 
with a, and the family of parallels in a associated with p. 
The direction in the space of jS indicated by the family 
of parallels in jS will be called the direction of a in space 
jS, and the family of parallels in a is the direction of jS 
in space a. Thus a being at rest at a point of space a 
will be moving imiformly along a line in space p which 
is in the direction of a in space jS, and a being at rest 
at a point of space p vnll be moving uniformly along a 
line in space a which is in the direction of jS in space a. 
I have been speaking of the timeless spaces which are 
associated with time-systems. These are the spaces of 
physical science and of any concept of space as eternal 
and unchanging. But what we actually perceive is an 
approximation to the instantaneous space indicated by 
event-particles which lie Mrithin some moment of the 
time-system associated Mrith our awareness. The points 
of such an instantaneous space are event-particles and 
the straight lines are rects. Let the time-system be 
named a, and let the moment of time-system a to 
which our quick perception of nature approximates be 

8—2 



Digitized by 



Google 



ii6 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

called Af . Any straight line r in space a is a locus of 
points and each point is a point-track which is a locus 
of event-particles. Thus in the four-dimensional geo- 
metry of all event-particles there is a two-dimensional 
locus which is the locus of all event-particles on points 
lying on the straight line r. I will call this locus of 
event-particles the matrix of the straight line r. A 
]i^^ti;bc intersects any moment in a rect. Thus the matrix 
of r intersects the moment Af in a rect /> . Thus /> is the 
instantaneous rect in Af which occupies at the moment 
Af the straight line r in the space of a. Accordingly 
when one sees instantaneously a moving being and its 
path ahead of it, what one really sees is the being at 
some event-particle A lying in the rect /> which is the 
apparent path on the assimiption of uniform motion. 
But the actual rect /> which is a locus of event-particles 
is never traversed by the being. These event-parti- 
cles are the instantaneous facts which pass with the 
instantaneous moment. What is really traversed are 
other event-particles which at succeeding instants 
occupy the same points of space a as those occupied by 
the event-particles of the rect />. For example, we see a 
stretch of road and a lorry moving along it. The in- 
stantaneously seen road is a portion of the rect /> — of 
course only an approximation to it. The lorry is the 
moving object. But the road as seen is never traversed. 
It is thought of as being traversed because the intrinsic 
characters of the later events are in general so similar 
to those of the instantaneous road that we do not 
trouble to discriminate. But suppose a land mine under 
the road has been exploded before the lorry gets there. 
Then it is fairly obvious that the lorry does not traverse 
what we saw at first. Suppose the lorry is at rest in 



Digitized by 



Google 



V] SPACE AND MOTION 117 

space jS. Then the straight line r of space a is in the 
direction of jS in space a, and the rect /> is the repre- 
sentative in the moment M of the line r of space a. 
The direction of /> in the instantaneous space of the 
moment M is the direction of j8 in Af , where Af is a 
moment of time-system a. Again the matrix of the 
line r of space a will also be the matrix of some line s 
of space j8 which will be in the direction of a in space /5. 
Thus if the lorry halts at some point P of space a which 
lies on the line r, it is now moving along the line s of 
space j8. This is the. theory of relative motion; the 
common matrix is the bond which Connects the motion 
of jS in space a with the motions of a in space /5. 

Motion is essentially a relation between some object 
of nature and the one timeless space of a time-system. 
An instantaneous space is static, being related to the 
static nature at an instant. In perception when we see 
things moving in an approximation to an instantaneous 
space, the future lines of motion as immediately per- 
ceived are rects which are never traversed^ These 
approximate rects are composed of small events, namely 
approximate routes and event-particles, which are 
passed away before the moving objects reach them. 
Assuming that our forecasts of rectilinear motion are 
correct, these rects occupy the straight lines in timeless 
space which are traversed. Thus the rects are symbols 
in inmiediate sense-awareness of a future which can 
only be expressed in terms of timeless space. 

We are now in a position to explore the fundamental 
character of perpendicularity. Consider the two time- 
systems a and j3, each Mrith its own timeless space and 
its own family of instantaneous moments with their 
instantaneous spaces. Let M and N be respectively a 



Digitized by 



Google 



ii8 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

moment of a and a moment of p. In M there is the 
direction of p and in N there is the direction of a. 
But M and N^ being moments of different time-systems, 
intersect in a level. Call this level A. Then A is an 
instantaneous plane in the instantaneous space of M 
and also in the instantaneous space ofN. It is the locus 
of all the event-particles which lie both in M and in N. 

In the instantaneous space of M the level A is per- 
pendicular to the direction of jS in M , and in the 
instantaneous space of N the level A is perpendicular 
to the direction of a in iV. This is the fundamental 
property which forms the definition of perpendicularity. 
The symmetry of perpendicularity is a particular in- 
stance of the symmetry of the mutual relations between 
two time-systems. We shall find in the next lecture 
that it is from this symmetry that the theory of con- 
gruence is deduced. 

The theory of perpendicularity in the timeless space 
of any time-system a follows immediately from this 
theory of perpendicularity in each of its instantaneous 
spaces. Let /> be any rect in the moment M of a and 
let A be a level in M which is perpendicular to p. The 
locus of those points of the space of a which intersect 
M in event-particles on /> is the straight line r of space c, 
and the locus of those points of the space of a which 
intersect M in event-particles on A is the plane / of 
space a. Then the plane / is perpendicular to the line r. 

In this way we have pointed out unique and definite 
properties in nature which correspond to perpen- 
dicularity. We shall find that this discovery of definite 
unique properties defining perpendicularity is of 
critical importance in the theory of congruence which 
is the topic for the next lecture. 



Digitized by 



Google 



V] SPACE AND MOTION 119 

I regret that it has been necessary for me in this 
lecture to administer such a large dose of four-dimen- 
sional geometry. I do not apologise, because I am really 
not responsible for the fact that nature in its most 
fundamental aspect is four-dimensional. Things are 
what they are; and it is useless to disguise the fact that 
* what things are ' is often very difficult for our intellects 
to follow. It is a mere evasion of the ultimate problems 
to shirk such obstacles. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CHAPTER VI 

CONGRUENCE 

The aim of this lecture is to establish a theory of con- 
gruence. You must understand at once that congruence 
is a controversial question. It is the theory of measure- 
ment in space and in time. The question seems simple. 
In fact it is simple enough for a standard procedure to 
have been settled by act of parliament ; and devotion to 
metaphysical subtleties is almost the only crime which 
has never been imputed to any English parliament. 
But the procedure is one thing and its meaning is 
another. 

First let us fix attention on the purely mathematical 
question. When the segment between two points A 
and B is congruent to that between the two points C 
and Dj the quantitative measurements of the two seg- 
ments are equal. The equality of the numerical measures 
and the congruence of the two segments are not always 
clearly discriminated^ and are lumped together under 
the term equality. But the procedure of measurement 
presupposes congruence. For example, a yard measure 
is applied successively to measure two distances between 
two pairs of points on the floor of a room. It is of the 
essence of the procedure of measurement that the 
yard measure remains unaltered as it is transferred from 
one position to another. Some objects can palpably 
alter as they move — ^for example, an elastic thread; 
but a yard measure does not alter if made of the proper 
material. What is this but a judgment of congruence 
applied to the train of successive positions of the yard 



Digitized by 



Google 



CH.vi] CONGRUENCE izi 

measure? We know that it does not alter because we 
judge it to be congruent to itself in various positions. 
In the case of the thread we can observe the loss of 
• self-congruence. Thus immediate judgments of con- 
gruence are presupposed in measurement, and the 
process of measurement is merely a procedure to extend 
the recognition of congruence to cases where these 
inmiediate judgments are not available. Thus we cannot 
define congruence by measurement. 

In modem expositions of the axioms of geometry 
certain conditions are laid down which the relation of 
congruence between segments is to satisfy. It is 
supposed that we have a complete theory of points, 
straight lines, planes, and the order of points on planes — 
in fact, a complete theory of non-metrical geometry. 
We then enquire about congruence and lay down the 
set of conditions — or axioms as they are called — ^which 
this relation satisfies. It has then been proved that 
there are alternative relations which satisfy these con- 
ditions equally well and that there is nothing intrinsic 
in the theory of space to lead us to adopt any one of these 
relations in preference to any other as the relation 
of congruence which we adopt. In other words there 
are alternative metrical geometries which all exist by 
an equal right so far as the intrinsic theory of space is 
concerned. 

Poincar6, the great French mathematician, held that 
' our ^ctual choice among these geometries is guided 
pui?6ly by convention, and that the effect of a change of 
choice would be simply to alter our expression of the 
physical laws of nature. By * convention' I understand 
Poincar^ to mean that there is nothing inherent in 
nature itself giving any peculiar r6le to one of these 



Digitized by 



Google 



122 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

congruence relations, and that the choice of one par- 
ticular relation is guided by the volitions of the mind at 
the other end of the sense-awareness. The principle of 
guidance is intellectual convenience and not natural 
ifact. 

This position has been misunderstood by many of 
Poincar^'s expositors. They have muddled it up with 
another question, namely that owing to the inexactitude 
of observation it is impossible to make an exact state- 
ment in the comparison of measures. It follows that a 
certain subset of closely allied congruence relations can 
be assigned of which each member equally well agrees 
with that statement of observed congruence when the 
statement is properly qualified with its limits of 
error. 

This is an entirely different question and it pre- 
supposes a rejection of Poincar^'s position. The absolute 
indetermination of nature in respect of all the relations 
of congruence is replaced by the indetermination of 
observation with respect to a small subgroup of these 
relations. 

Poincar^'s position is a strong one. He in eflFect 
challenges anyone to point out any factor in natiu-e 
which gives a preeminent status to the congruence 
relation which mankind has actually adopted. But un- 
deniably the position is very paradoxical. Bertrand 
Russell had a controversy with him on this question, 
and pointed out that on Poincar^'s principles there was 
nothing in nature to determine whether the earth is 
larger or smaller than some assigned billiard ball. 
Poincar^ replied that the attempt to find reasons in 
nature for the selection of a definite congruence relation 
in space is like trying to determine the position of a 



Digitized by 



Google 



VI] CONGRUENCE 123 

ship in the ocean by counting the crew and observing 
the colour of the captain's eyes. 

In my opinion both disputants were right, assuming 
the grounds on which the discussion was based. 
Russell in effect pointed out that apart from minor 
inexactitudes a determinate congruence relation is 
among the factors in nature which our sense-awareness 
posits for us. Poincar^ asks for information as to the 
factor in nature which might lead any particular con- 
gruence relation to play a preeminent r6le among the ' 
factors posited in sense-awareness. I cannot see the 
answer to either of these contentions provided that you 
admit the materialistic theory of nature. With this 
' heory nature at an instant in space is an independent 
fact. Thus we have to look for our preeminent con- 
gruence relation amid nature in instantaneous space; 
and Poincar6 is undoubtedly right in saying that nature 
on this hypothesis gives us no help in finding it. 

On the other hand Russell is in an equally strong 
position when he asserts that, as a fact of observation, 
we do find it, and what is more agree in finding the same 
congruence relation. On this basis it is one of the most 
extraordinary facts of human experience that all man- 
kind without any assignable reason should agree in 
fixing attention on just one congruence relation amid 
the indefinite number of indistinguishable competitors 
for notice. One would have expected disagreement on 
this fundamental choice to have divided nations and to 
have rent families. But the difficulty was not even dis- 
covered till the close of the nineteenth century by a 
few mathematical philosophers and philosophic mathe- 
maticians. The case is not like that of our agreement 
on some fundamental fact of nature such as the three 



Digitized by 



Google 



124 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

dimensions of space. If space has only three dimensions 
we should expect all mankind to be aware of the fact, 
as they are aware of it. But in the case of congruence, 
mankind agree in an arbitrary interpretation of sense- 
awareness when there is nothing in nature to guide it. 

I look on it as no slight recommendation of the theory 
of nature which I am expounding to you that it gives 
a solution of this difficulty by pointing out the factor 
in nature which issues in the preeminence of one 
congruence relation over the indefinite herd of other 
such relations. 

The reason for this result is that nature is no longer 
confined within space at an instant. Space and time 
are now interconnected ; and this peculiar factor of time 
which is so inunediately distinguished among the 
deliverances of our sense-awareness, relates itself to 
one particular congruence relation in space. 

Congruence is a particular example of the fundamental 
fact of jr^cQgnition. In perception we recognise. This 
recognition does not merely concern the comparison of 
a factor of nature posited by memory with a factor 
posited by immediate sense-awareness. Recognition 
takes place within the present without any intervention 
of pure memory. For the present fact is a duration with 
its antecedent and consequent durations which are 
parts of itself. The discrimination in sense-awareness 
of a finite event with its quality of passage is also* 
accompanied by the discrimination of other factors of 
nature which do not share in the passage of events. 
Whatever passes is an event. But we find entities in 
nature which do not pass ; namely we recognise same- 
nesses in nature. Recognition is not primarily an 
intellectual act of comparison ; it is in its essence merely 



Digitized by 



Google 



yi] CONGRUENCE 125 

sense-awareness in its capacity of positing before us 
factors in nature which do not pass. For example, 
green is perceived as situated in a certain finite event 
within the present duration. This green preserves its 
self-identity throughout, whereas the event passes and 
thereby obtains the property of breaking into parts. 
The green patch has parts. But in talking of the green 
patch we are speaking of the event in its sole capacity of 
being for us the situation of green. The green itself is 
numerically one self-identical entity, without parts 
because it is without passage. 

Factors^in jiature which are without passage will be I 
called objects. There are radically different kinds of ob-/ 
jects which will be considered in the succeeding lecture. 

Recognition is reflected into the intellect as comparison. 
The recognised objects of one event are compared with 
the recognised objects of another event. The com- 
parison may be between two events in the present, or 
it may be between two events of which one is posited 
by memory-awareness and the other by immediate 
sense-awareness. But it is not the events which arev 
compared. For each event is essentially unique and*^ 
incomparable. What are compared are the objects and 
relations of objects situated in events. The event con-^. 
sidered as a relation between objects has lost its passage 
and in this aspect is itself an object. This object is not 
the event but only an intellectual abstraction. The same 
object can be situated in many events ; and in this sense 
even the whole event, viewed as an object, can recur, 
though not the very event itself with its passage and its 
relations to other events. 

Objects which are not posited by sense-awareness 
may be known to the intellect. For example, relations 



Vy' 



Digitized by 



Google 



126 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [cif. 

between objects and relations between relations may 
be factors in nature not disclosed in sense-awareness 
but known by logical inference as necessarily in being. 
^ Thus objects for our knowledge may be merely logical 
abstractions. For example^ a complete event is never 
disclosed in sense-awareness, and thus the object which 
is the sum total of objects situated in an event as thus 
inter-related is a mere abstract concept. Again a right- 
angle is a perceived object which can be situated in 
many events; but, though rectangularity is posited by 
sense-awareness, the majority of geometrical relations 
are not so posited. Also rectangularity is in fact often 
not perceived when it can be proved to have been there 
for perception. Thus an object is often known merely 
as an abstract relation not directly posited in sense- 
awareness although it is there in nature. 

The identity of quality between congruent segments 
is generally of this character. In certain special cases 
this identity of quality can be directly perceived. But 
in general it is inferred by a process of measurement 
depending on our direct sense-awareness of selected 
cases and a logical inference from the transitive character 
of congruence. 

Con^^uence depends on motion, and thereby is 
generated the connexion between spatial congruence 
and temporal congruence. Motion along a straight line 
has a symmetry round that line. This symmetry is ex- 
pressed by the symmetrical geometrical relations of the 
line to the family of planes normal to it. 

Also another symmetry in the theory of motion arises 
from the fact that rest in the points of jS corresponds to 
uniform motion along a definite family of parallel 
straight lines in the space of a. We must note the three 



Digitized by 



Google 



VI] CONGRUENCE i27 

characteristics^ (i) of the uniformity of the motion 
corresponding to any point of jS along its correlated 
straight line in a, and (ii) of the equality in magnitude 
of the velocities along the various lines of a correlated 
to rest in the various points of jS, and (iii) of the 
parallelism of the lines of this family. 

We are now in possession of a theory of parallels and 
a theory of perpendiculars and a theory of motion, and 
from these theories the theory of congruence can be 
constructed. It will be remembered that a family of 
parallel levels in any moment is the family of levels in 
which that moment is intersected by the family of 
moments of some other time-system. Also a family of 
parallel moments is the family of moments of some one 
time-system. Thus we can enlarge our concept of a 
family of parallel levels so as to include levels in diffe- 
rent moments of one time-system. With this enlarged 
concept we say that a complete family of parallel levels 
in a time-system a is the complete family of levels in 
which the moments of a intersect the moments of jS. 
This complete family of parallel levels is also evidently 
a family lying in the moments of the time-system j3. 
By introducing a third time-system y, parallel rects are 
obtained. Also all the points of any one time-system 
form a family of parallel point-tracks. Thus there are 
three types of parallelograms in the four-dimensional 
manifold of event-particles. 

In parallelograms of the first type the two pairs of 
parallel sides are both of them pairs of rects. In parallelo- 
grams of the second type one pair of parallel sides 
is a pair of rects and the other pair is a pair of point- 
tracks. In parallelograms of the third type the two pairs 
of parallel sides are both of them pairs of point-tracks. 



Digitized by 



Google 



128 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

I \i The first f^xio^ of congruence is that the opposite 
I sides of any parallelogram are congruent. This axiom 
enables us to compare the lengths of any two segments 
either respectively on parallel rects or on the same rect. 
Also it enables us to compare the lengths of any two seg- 
ments eitherrespectivelyonparallelpoint-tracksor on the 
same point-track. It follows from this axiom that two 
objects at rest in any two points of a time-system p are 
moving with equal velocities in any other time-system a 
along parallel lines. Thus we can speak of the velocity 
in a due to the time-system jS without specifying any 
particular point in p. The axiom also enables us to 
measure time in any time-system; but does not enable 
us to compare times in different time-systems. 

The second axiom of congruence concerns parallelo- 
grams on congruent bases and between the same 
parallels » which have also their other pairs of sides 
^ parallel. The axiom asserts that the^rect, joinin^^ the 
^ two event-particles of intersection of the diagonals is 
parallel to the rect on which the bases lie. By the aid 
of this axiom it easily follows that the diagonals of a 
parallelogram bisect each other. 

Congruence is extended in any space beyond parallel 
rects to all rects by two axioms depending on perpen- 
dicularity. The first of these axioms, which is the third 
^ , axiom of congruence, is that if ABC is a triangle of rects 
in any moment and D is the middle event-particle of the 
base BCy then the level through D perpendicular to EC 
contains A when and only when AB is congruent to 
AC. This axiom evidently expresses the symmetry of 
perpendicularity, and is the essence of the famous 
pons asinorum expressed as an axiom. 

The second axiom depending on perpendicularity, 



Digitized by 



Google 



VI] CONGRUENCE 129 

and the fourth axiom of congruence, is that if r and A \^ 
be a rect and an event-particle in the same moment and 
AB and AC be a pair of rectangular rects intersecting 
r in B and C, and AD and AE be another pair of rect- 
angular rects intersecting r in D and jB, then either D 
or E lies in the segment BC and the other one of the 
two does not lie in this segment. Also as a particular 
case of this axiom, if AB be perpendicular to r and in 
consequence AC be parallel to r, then D and E lie on 
opposite sides of B respectively. By the aid of these 
two axioms the theory of congruence can be extended 
so as to compare lengths of segments on any two rects. 
Accordingly Euclidean metrical geometry in space is 
completely established and lengths in the spaces of 
different time-systems are comparable as the result of 
definite properties of nature which indicate just that 
particular method of comparison. 

The comparison of tjmf^-mea<^jir ements in diverse 
time-systems requires two other axioms. The first of 
these axioms, forming the fifth axiom of congruence, ^ 
vdll be called the axiom of * kinetic sy mmetry .' It 
expresses the symmetry of the quantitative relations 
between two time-systems when the times and lengths 
in the two systems are measured in congruent units. 

The axiom can be explained as follows : Let a and jS 
be the names of two time-systems. The directions of 
motion in the space of a due to rest in a point of jS is 
called the * jS-direction in a ' and the direction of motion 
in the space of jS due to rest in a point of a is called the 
* a -direction in jS.* Consider a motion in the space of 
a consisting of a certain velocity in the jS-direction of a 
and a certain velocity at right-angles to it. This motion 
represents rest in the space of another time-system — 

W.N. 9 



Digitized by 



Google 



I30 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

call it ir. Rest in n will also be represented in the space 
of jS by a certain velocity in the a-direction in jS and a 
certain velocity at right-angles to this a-direction. Thus 
a certain motion in the space of a is correlated to a 
C€;rtain motion in the space of jS, as both representing 
the same fact which can also be represented by rest in 
IT. Now another time-system, which I will name a, 
can be found which is such that rest in its space is 
represented by the same magnitudes of velocities 
along and perpendicular to the a-direction in j3 as those 
velocities in a, along and perpendicular to the jS-direc- 
tion, which represent rest in it. The required axiom of 
kinetic symmetry is that rest in a will be represented in 
a by the same velocities along and perpendicular to 
the jS-direction in a as those velocities in jS along and 
perpendicular to the a-direction which represent rest 
in TT. 

A particular case of this axiom is that relative velocities 
are equal and opposite. Namely rest in a is represented 
in jS by a velocity along the a-direction which is equal 
to the velocity along the jS-direction in a which rq>re- 
sents rest in jS. 

Finally the sixth axiom of congruence is that the 
relation of congruence is transitive. So far as this 
axiom applies to space, it is superfluous. For the 
property follows from our previous axioms. It is 
however necessary for time as a supplement to the axiom 
of kinetic symmetry. The meaning of the axiom is that 
if the time-unit of system a is congruent to the time- 
unit of system jS, and the time-unit of system JS is 
congruent to the time-unit of system y , then the time- 
units of a and y are also congruent. 

By means of these axioms formulae for the trans- 



Digitized by 



Google 



VI] CONGRUENCE 131 

formation of measurements made in one time-system 
to measurements of the same facts of nature made in 
another time-system can be deduced. These formulae 
will be found to involve one arbitrary constant which 
I will call k. 

It is of the dimensions of the square of a velocity. 
Accordingly four cases arise. In the first case k is 
zero. This case produces nonsensical results in opposi- 
tion to the elementary deliverances of experience. We 
put this case aside. 

In the second case k is infinite. This case yields the 
ordinary formulae for transformation in relative motion^ * 
namely those formulae which are to be found in every 
elementary book on dynamics. 

In the third case, k is negative. Let us call it — c^, 
where c will be of the dimensions of a velocity. This 
case yields the formulae of transformation which 
Larmor discovered for the transformation of MaxwelPs 
equations of the electromagnetic field. These formulae 
were extended by H. A. Lorentz, and used by Einstein 
and Minkowski as the basis of their novel theory of 
relativity. I am not now speaking of Einstein *s more 
recent theory of general relativity by which he deduces 
his modification of the law of gravitation. If this be the 
case which applies to nature, then c must be a close 
approximation to the velocity of light in vacuo. Perhaps 
it is this actual velocity. In this connexion Hn vacuo* 
must not mean an absence of events, namely the absence 
of the all-pervading ether of events. It must mean the 
absence of certain types of objects. 

In the fourth case, k is positive. Let us call it A^, 
where /twill be of the dimensions of avelocity. This gives 
a perfectly possible type of transformation formulae, 

9—2 



Digitized by 



Google 



132 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

but not one which explains any facts of experience. 
It has also another disadvantage. With the assumption 
of this fourth case the distinction between space and 
time becomes unduly blurred. The whole object of 
these lectures has been to enforce the doctrine that 
space and time spring from a common root» and that 
the ultimate fact of experience is a space-time fact. But 
after all mankind does distinguish very sharply between 
space and time, and it is owing to this sharpness of 
distinction that the doctrine of these lectures is some- 
what of a paradox. Now in the third assumption this 
sharpness of distinction is adequately preserved. There 
is a fundamental distinction between the metrical pro- 
perties of point-tracks and rects. But in the fourth 
assumption this fundamental distinction vanishes. 

Neither the third nor the fourth assumption can 
agree with experience unless we assume that the 
velocity c of the third assumption, and the velocity h 
of the fourth assumption, are extremely large compared 
to the velocities of ordinary experience. If this be the 
case the formulae of both assumptions will obviously 
reduce to a close approximation to the formulae of the 
second assumption which are the ordinary formulae of 
dynamical textbooks. For the sake of a name, I will 
call these textbook formulae the * orthodox* formulae. 

There can be no question as to the general approxi- 
mate correctness of the orthodox formulae. It would be 
merely silly to raise doubts on this point. But the 
determination of the status of these formulae is by no 
means settled by this admission. The independence 
of time and space is an unquestioned presupposition 
of the orthodox thought which has produced the ortho- 
dox formulae. With this presupposition and given the 



Digitized by 



Google 



VI] CONGRUENCE 133 

absolute points of one absolute space, the orthodox 
formulae are immediate deductions. Accordingly, 
these formulae are presented to our imaginations as 
facts which cannot be otherwise, time and space being 
what they are. The orthodox formulae have, therefore 
attained to the status of necessities which cannot be 
questioned in science. Any attempt to replace these 
formulae by others was to abandon the rdle of physical 
explanation and to have recourse to mere mathematical 
formulae. 

But even in physical science difficulties have accumu- 
lated round the orthodox formulae. In the first place 
Maxwell's equations of the electromagnetic field are 
not invariant for the transformations of the orthodox 
formulae; whereas they are invariant for the trans- 
formations of the formulae arising from the third of the 
four cases mentioned above, provided that the velocity c 
is identified with a famous electromagnetic constant 
quantity. 

Again the null results of the delicate experiments 
to detect the earth's variations of motion through the 
ether in its orbital path are explained immediately by 
the formulae of the third case. But if we assume the 
orthodox formulae we have to make a special and ar- 
bitrary assumption as to the contraction of matter during 
motion. I mean the Fitzgerald-Lorentz assumption. 

Lastly Fresnel's coefficient of drag which represents 
the variation of the velocity of light in a moving medium 
is explained by the formulae of the third case, and 
requires another arbitrary assumption if we use the 
orthodox formulae. 

It appears therefore that on the mere basis of 
physical explanation there are advantages in the formulae 



Digitized by 



Google 



134 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [cH. 

of the third case as compared with the orthodox for- 
mulae. But the way is blocked by the ingrained belief 
that these latter formulae possess a character of necessity. 
It is therefore an urgent requisite for physical science 
and for philosophy to examine critically the grounds 
for this supposed necessity. The only satisfactory 
method of scrutiny is to recur to the first principles of 
our knowledge of natiu-e. This is exactly what I am 
endeavouring to do in these lectures. I ask what it is 
that we are aware of in our sense-perception of natiu-e. 
I then proceed to examine those factors in nature which 
lead us to conceive nature as occupying space and 
persisting through time. This procedure has led us to 
an investigation of the characters of space and time. It 
results from these investigations that the formulae of 
the third case and the orthodox formulae are on a level 
as possible formulae resulting from the basic character 
of our knowledge of nature. The orthodox formulae 
have thus lost any advantage as to necessity which they 
enjoyed over the serial group. The way is thus open to 
adopt whichever of the two groups best accords with 
observation. 

I take this opportunity of pausing for a moment from 
the course of my argument, and of reflecting on the 
general character which my doctrine ascribes to some 
familiar concepts of science. I have no doubt that some 
of you have felt that in certain aspects this character 
is very paradoxical. 

This vein of paradox is partly due to the fact that 
educated language has been made to conform to the 
prevalent orthodox theory. We are thus, in expounding 
an alternative doctrine, driven to the use of either strange 
terms or of familiar words with unusual meanings. This 



Digitized by 



Google 



VI] CONGRUENCE 135 

victory of the orthodox theory over language is very 
natural. Events are named after the prominent objects 
situated in them, and thus both in language and in 
thought the event sinks behind the object, and becomes 
the mere play of its relations. The theory of space is 
then converted into a theory of the relations of objects 
instead of a theory of the relations of events. But objects 
have not the passage of events. Accordingly space as a 
relation between objects is devoid of any connexion 
with time. It is space at an instant without any deter- 
minate relations between the spaces at successive in- 
stants. It cannot be one timeless space because the 
relations between objects change. 

A few minutes ago in speaking of the deduction of 
the orthodox formulae for relative motion I said that 
they followed as an immediate deduction from the 
assumption of absolute points in absolute space. This 
reference to absolute space was not an oversight. I know 
that the doctrine of the relativity of space at present 
holds the field both in science and philosophy. But 
I do not think that its inevitable consequences are 
imderstood. When we really face them the paradox of 
the presentation of the character of space which I have 
elaborated is greatly mitigated. If there is no absolute 
position, a point must cease to be a simple entity. What 
is a point to one man in a balloon with his eyes fixed on 7 
an instrumeiit is a track of points to an observer on the » 
earth who is watching the balloon through a telescope, 
and is another track of points to an observer in the sun 
who is watching the balloon through some instrument 
suited to such a being. Accordingly if I am reproached^ 
with the paradox of my theory of points as classes of 
event-particles, and of my theory of event-particles as 



Digitized by 



Google 



136 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

groups of abstractive sets, I ask my critic to explain 
exactly what he means by a point. While you explain 
your meaning about anything, however simple, it is 
always apt to look subtle and fine spun. I have at least 
explained exactly what I do mean by a point, what 
relations it involves and what entities are the relata. 
If you admit the relativity of space, you also must 
admit that points are complex entities, logical constructs 
involving other entities and their relations. Produce 
your theory, not in a few vague phrases of indefinite 
meaning, but explain it step by step in definite terms 
referring to assigned relations and assigned relata. Also 
show that your theory of points issues in a theory of 
space. Furthermore note that the example of the man 
in the balloon, the observer on earth, and the observer 
in the sim, shows that every assumption of relative rest 
requires a timeless space with radically different points 
from those which issue from every other such assump- 
tion. The theory of the relativity of space is incon- 
sistent with any doctrine of one unique set of points of 
one timeless space. 

The fact is that there is no paradox in my doctrine 
of the natiu-e of space which is not in essence inherent 
in the theory of the relativity of space. But this doctrine 
has never really been accepted in science, whatever 
people say. What appears in our dynamical treatises is 
Newton^s doctrine of relative motion based on the 
doctrine of differential motion in absolute space. When 
you once admit that the points are radically different 
entities for differing assumptions of rest, then the 
orthodox formulae lose all their obviousness. They 
were only obvious because you were really thinking of 
something else. When discussing this topic you can 



Digitized by 



Google 



VI] CONGRUENCE 137 

only avoid paradox by taking refuge from the flood of 
criticism in the comfortable ark of no meaning. 

The new theory provides a definition of the con- 
gruence of periods of time. The prevalent view pro- 
vides no such definition. Its position is that if we 
take such time-measurements so that certain familiar 
velocities which seem to us to be uniform are uniform, 
then the laws of motion are true. Now in the first place 
no change could appear either as uniform or non- 
uniform without involving a definite determination of 
the congruence for time-periods. So in appealing to 
familiar phenomena it allows that there is some 
factor in nature which we can intellectually construct 
as a congruence theory. It does not however say any- 
thing about it except that the laws of motion are then 
true. Suppose that with some expositors we cut out 
the reference to familiar velocities such as the rate of 
rotation of the earth. We are then driven to admit that 
there is no meaning in temporal congruence except 
that certain assumptions make the laws of motion true. 
Such a statement is historically false. King Alfred the 
Great was ignorant of the laws of motion, but knew 
very well what he meant by the measurement of time, 
and achieved his purpose by means of burning candles. 
Also no one in past ages justified the use of sand in 
hour-glasses by saying that some centuries later in- 
teresting laws of motion would be discovered which 
would give a meaning to the statement that the sand 
was emptied from the bulbs in equal times. Uniformity 
in change is jlirectly perceived, and it follows that 
mankind perceives in nature factors from which a theory 
of temporal congruence can be formed. The prevalent 
theory entirely fails to produce such factors. 



Digitized by 



Google 



138 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

The mention of the laws of motion raises another 
point where the prevalent theory has nothing to say 
and the new theory gives a complete explanation. It is 
well known that the laws of motion are not valid for 
any axes of reference which you may choose to take 
fixed in any rigid body. You must choose a body which 
is not rotating and has no acceleration. For example 
they do not really apply to axes fixed in the earth 
because of the diurnal rotation of that body. The law 
which fails when you assiune the wrong axes as at rest 
is the third law, that action and reaction are equal and 
opposite. With the wrong axes uncompensated centri- 
fugal forces and uncompensated composite centrifugal 
forces appear, due to rotation. The influence of these 
forces can be demonstrated by many facts on the earth^s 
surface, Foucault^s pendulum, the shape of the earth, 
the fixed directions of the rotations of cyclones and 
anticyclones. It is diflicult to take seriously the sug- 
gestion that these domestic phenomena on the earth 
are due to the influence of the fixed stars. I cannot 
persuade myself to believe that a little star in its 
twinkling turned roimd Foucault^s pendulum in the 
Paris Exhibition of 1861. Of course anything is beUev- 
able when a definite physical connexion has been 
demonstrated, for example the influence of simspots. 
Here all demonstration is lacking in the form of any 
coherent theory. According to the theory of these 
lectures the axes to which motion is to be referred are 
axes at rest in the space of some time-system. For 
example, consider the space of a time-system a. There 
are sets of axes at rest in the space of a . These are suitable 
dynamical axes. Also a set of axes in this space which, 
is moving with uniform velocity without rotation is 



Digitized by 



Google 



VI] CONGRUENCE 139 

another suitable set. All the moving points fixed in 
these moving axes are really tracing out parallel lines 
with one imiform velocity. In other words they are 
the reflections in the space of a of a set of fixed axes in 
the space of some other time-system p. Accordingly 
the group of dynamical axes required for Newton's 
Laws of Motion is the outcome of the necessity of 1/ 
referring motion to a body at rest in the space of some 
one time-system in order to obtain a coherent accoimt 
of physical properties. If we do not do so the meaning 
of the motion of one portion of our physical configuration 
is different from the meaning of the motion of another 
portion of the same configuration. Thus the meaning 
of motion being what it is, in^rder to describe the motion 
of any system of objects without changing the meaning 
of your terms as you proceed with your description, 
you are bound to take one of these sets of axes as axes 
of reference; though you may choose their reflections 
into the space of any time-system which you wish to 
adopt. A definite physical reason is thereby assigned for 
the peculiar property of the dynamical group of axes. 

On the orthodox theory the position of the equations 
of motion is most ambiguous. The space to which they 
refer is completely undetermined and so is the measure- 
ment of the lapse of time. Science is simply setting out 
on a fishing expedition to see whether it cannot find 
some procedure which it can call the measurement of 
space and some procedure which it can call the measure- 
ment of time, and something which it can call a system 
of forces, and something which it can call masses, so 
that these formulae may be satisfied. The only reason — 
on this theory — ^why anyone should want to satisfy 
these formulae is a sentimental regard for Galileo, 



Digitized by 



Google 



I40 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

Newton, Euler and Lagrange. The theory, so far frona 
founding science on a sound observational basis; forces 
everything to conform to a mere mathematical pre- 
ference for certain simple formulae. 

I do not for a moment believe that this is a true ac- 
count of the real status of the Laws of Motion. These 
equations want some slight adjustment for the new 
formulae of relativity. But with these adjustments, 
imperceptible in ordinary use, the laws deal with funda- 
mental physical quantities which we know very well 
and wish to correlate. 

The measurement of time was known to all civilised 
nations long before the laws were thought of. It is this 
time as thus measured that the laws are concerned with. 
Also they deal with the space of our daily life. When we 
approach to an acciuacy of measurement beyond that 
of observation, adjustment is allowable. But within the 
limits of observation we know what we mean when we 
speak of measurements of space and measurements of 
time and imiformity of change. It is for science to give an 
intellectual account of what is so evident in sense-aware- 
ness. It is to me thoroughly incredible that the ultimate 
fact beyond which there is no deeper explanation is that 
mankind has really been swayed by an unconscious 
desire to satisfy the mathematical formulae which we 
call the Laws of Motion, formulae completely imknown 
till the seventeenth century of our epoch. 

The correlation of the facts of sense-experience 
effected by the alternative account of nature extends 
beyond the physical properties of motion and the 
properties of congruence. It gives an account of the 
meaning of the geometrical entities such as points, 
straight lines, and voliunes, and connects the kindred 



Digitized by 



Google 



VI] CONGRUENCE 141 

ideas of extension in time and extension in space. The 
theory satisfies the true purpose of an intellectual 
explanation in the sphere of natural philosophy. This 
purpose is to exhibit the interconnexions of nature, and 
ta show that one set of ingredients in nature requires 
for the exhibition of its character the presence of the 
other sets of ingredients. 

The false idea which we have to get rid of is that of/ 
nature as a mere aggregate of independent entities, each 
capable of isolation. According to this conception these 
entities, whose characters are capable of isolated defini- 
tion, come together and by their accidental relations 
form the systeni of natur e. This system is thus thoroughly 
accidental; and, even if it be subject to a mechanical 
fate, it is only accidentally so subject. 

With this theory space might be without time, and 
time might be without space. The theory admittedly 
breaks down when we come to the relations of matter 
and space. The relational theory of space is an admission 
that we cannot know space without matter or matter 
without space. But the seclusion of both from time is 
still jealously guarded. The relations between portions 
of matter in space are accidental facts owing to the 
absence of any coherent account of how space springs 
from matter or how matter springs from space. Also 
what we really observe in nature, its colours and its 
sounds and its touches are secondary qualities; ini 
other words, they are not in nature at all but are acci-l 
dental products of the relations between nature and^ 
mind. 

The explanation of nature which I urge as an alter- 
native ideal to this accidental view of nature, is that 
nothing in nature could be what it is except as an ^ 



Digitized by 



Google 



142 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [CH. vi 

ingredient in nature as it is. The whole which is present 
for discrimination is posited in sense-awareness as 
necessary for the discriminated parts. Anjsolatfid-exent 
is Qfit an event y because every event is a factor in a 
larger whole and is significant of that whole. There can 
be no time apart from space; and no space apart from 
time ; and no space and no time apart from the passage 
of the events of nature. The isolation of an entity in 
thought, when we think of it as a bare ^it/ has no 
coimterpart in any corresponding isolation in nature. 
Such isolation is merely part of the procedure of intel- 
lectual knowledge. 

The laws of nature are the outcome of the characters 
of the entities which we find in nature. The entities 
being what they are, the laws must be what they are; 
and conversely the entities follow from the laws. We 
are a long way from the attainment of such an ideal ; 
but it remains as the abiding goal of theoretical science. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CHAPTER VII 

OBJECTS 

The ensuing lecture is concerned with the theory of 
objects. Objects are elements in nature which do not 
pass. ^ The awareness of an object as some factor not 
sharing in the passage of nature is what I call(* recogni- 
tion.*) It is impossible to recognise an event, because 
an event is essentially distinct from every other event. 
^Recognition is an awareness of sameness.^ But to call 
recognition an awareness of sameness (implies an in- 
tellectual act of comparison accompanied with judgment} 
I use recognition for the non-intellectual relation of 
sense-awareness which connects the mind with a factor 
of nature without passage. On the intellectual side of 
the mind^s experience there are comparisons of things 
recognised and consequent judgments of sameness or 
diversity. Probably 'sense-recognition* would be a 
better term for what I mean by 'recognition.* I have 
chosen the simpler term because I think that I shall be 
able to avoid the use of * recognition * in any other 
meaning than that of * sense-recognition.* I am quite 
willing to believe that recognition, in my sense of the 
term, is merely an ideal limit, and that there is in fact 
no recognition without intellectual accompaniments of 
comparison and judgment. But recognition is that 
relation of the mind to nature which provides the 
material for the intellectual activity. 

An object is an ingredient in the character of some 
event. In fact the character of an event is nothing but 
the objects which are ingredient in it and the ways in 



Digitized by 



Google 



144 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

which those objects make their ingression into the 
event. Thus the theory of objects is the theory of the 
comparison of events. Events are only comparable 
because they body forth permanences. We are com- 
paring objects in events whenever we can say, * There 
it is again.' Objects are the elements in nature which 
can ^be again.' 

Sometimes permanences can be proved to exist 
which evade recognition in the sense in which I am 
, using that term. The/permanences which evade recogni- 
' tion appear to us as abstract properties either of events 
or of objects.) All the same they are there for recognition 
although undiscriminated in our sense-awareness. The 
demarcation of events, the splitting of nature up into 
parts is effected by the objects which we recognise as 
their ingredients. The discrimination of mature is the 
recognition of objects amid passing events. It is a 
compoimd of the awareness of the passage of nature, 
of the consequent partition of nature, and of the defini- 
tion of certain parts of nature by the modes of the 
ingression of objects into them. 

You may have noticed that I am using the term 
V ingression' to denote the general relation of objects 
to events. The ingression of an object into an event is 
the way the character of the event shapes itself in virtue 
of the being of the object. Namely the event is what it 
is, because the object is what it is ; and when I am thinking 
of this modification of the event by the object, I call 
the relation between the two *the ingression of the 
object into the event.' It is equally true to say that 
objects are what they are because events are what they 
are. Nature is such that there can be no events and no 
objects without the ingression of objects into events. 



Digitized by 



Google 



VII] OBJECTS 145 

Although /there are events such that the ingredient 
objects evade our recognition; These are the events in 
empty space. Such events are only analysed for us by 
the intellectual probing of science. 

Ingression is a relation which has various modes. 
There are obviously very various kinds of objects; 
and no one kind of object can have the same sort of 
relations to events as objects of another kind can have. 
We shall have to analyse out some of the different 
modes of ingression which different kinds of objects 
have into events. 

But even if we stick to one and the same kind of 
objects, an object of that kind has different modes of 
ingression into different events. Science and philo- 
sophy have been apt to entangle themselves in a simple- 
minded theory that an object is at one placeat any definite 
time, and is in no sen^e anywhere else. This is in fact 
the attitude of common sense thought, though it is not 
the attitude of language which is naively expressing the 
facts of experience. Every other sentence in a work of 
literature which is endeavouring truly to interpret the 
facts of experience expresses differences in surrounding 
events due to the presence of some object. An object 
is ingredient throughout its neighbourhood, and its 
neighbourhood is indefinite. Also the modification of 
events by ingression is susceptible of quantitative 
differences. Finally therefore we are driven to admit 
that -each object is in some sense ingredient throughout 
nature ;j though its ingression may be quantitatively 
irrelevant in the expression of our individual experi- 
ences. 

This admission is not new either in philosophy or 
science. It is obviously a necessary axiom for those 



Digitized by 



Google 



146 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

philosophers who insist that reality is a system. In 
these lectures we are keeping off the profound and 
I vexed question as to what we mean by 'reality/ I am 
; maintaining the humbler thesis that nature is a system. 
But I suppose that in this case the less follows from 
the greater, and that I may claim the support of these 
philosophers. The same doctrine is essentially interwoven 
in all modem physical speculation. As long ago as 1847 
Faraday in a paper in the Philosophical Magazine 
remarked that his theory of tubes of force implies that 
in a sense an electric charge is everywhere. The modi- 
fication of the electromagnetic field at every point of 
space at each instant owing to the past history of each 
electron is another way of stating the same fact. We 
can however illustrate the doctrine by the more familiar 
facts of life without recourse to the abstruse speculations 
of theoretical physics. 

The waves as they roll on to the Cornish coast tell 
of a gale in mid-Atlantic; and our dinner witnesses to 
the ingression of the cook into the dining room. It is 
evident that (the ingression of objects into events in- 
cludes the theory of causation) I prefer to neglect this 
aspect of ingression, because causation raises the 
memory of discussions based upon theories of nature 
which are alien to my own. Also I think that some new 
light may be thrown on the subject by viewing it in 
this fresh aspect. 

The examples which I have given of the ingression 
of objects into events remind us that ingression takes 
a peculiar form in the case of some events; in a sense, 
it is a more concentrated form. For example, the electron 
has a certain position iij space and a certain shape. 
Perhaps it is an extremely small sphere in a certain 



Digitized by 



Google 



VII] OBJECTS 147 

test-tube. The storm is a gale situated in mid- Atlantic 
with a certain latitude and longitude, and the cook is in 
the kitchen. I will call this special form of ingression 
the 'relation of situation*; also, by a double use of the 
word * situation,' I will call the event in which an object 
is situated * the situation of the object.' Thus a situation 
is an event which is a relatum in the relation of situation. 
Now our first impression is that at last we have come to 
the simple plain fact of where the object really is ; and 
that the vaguer relation which I call ingression should 
not be muddled up with the relation of situation, as if 
including it as a particular case. It seems so obvious 
that any object is in such and such a position, and that 
it is influencing other events in a totally different sense. 
Namely, in a sense an object is the character of the 
event which is its situation, but it only influences the 
character of other events. Accordingly the relations of 
situation and influencing are not generally the same sort 
of relation, and should not be subsumed under the same 
term * ingression.' I believe that this notion is a mistake, 
and that it is impossible to draw a clear distinction 
between the two relations. 

For example, Where was your toothache? You went 
to a dentist and pointed out the tooth to him. He pro- 
nounced it perfectly sound, and cured you by stopping 
another tooth. Which tooth was the situation of the 
toothache? Again, a man has an arm amputated, and 
experiences sensations in the hand which he has lost. 
The situation of the imaginary hand is in fact merely 
thin air. You look into a mirror and see a fire. The flames 
that you see are situated behind the mirror. Again at. 
night you watch the sky ; if some of the stars had vanished 
from existence hours ago, you would not be any the 



Digitized by 



Google 



148 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

wiser. Even the situations of the planets differ from 
those which science would assign to them. 

Anyhow you are tempted to exclaim, the cook is in 
the kitchen. If you mean her mind, I will not agree 
with you on the point ; for I am only talking of nature. 
Let us think only of her bodily presence. What do you 
mean by this notion? We confine ourselves to typical 
manifestations of it. You can see her, touch her, and 
hear her. But the examples which I have given you 
show that the notions of the situations of what you see, 
what you touch, and what you hear are not so sharply 
separated out as to defy further questioning. You 
cannot cling to the idea that we have two sets of ex- 
periences of nature, one of primary qualities which 
belong to the objects perceived, and one of secondary 
qualities which are the products of our mental excite- 
ments. All we know of nature is in the same boat, to 
sink or swim together. The constructions of science 
are merely expositions of the characters of things per- 
ceived. Accordingly to affirm that the cook is a certain 
dance of molecules and electrons is merely to affinn 
that the things about her which are perceivable have 
certain characters. The situations of the perceived 
manifestations of her bodily presence have only a very 
general relation to the situations of the molecules, to 
be determined by discussion of the circumstances of 
perception. 

In discussing the relations of situation in particular 
and of ingression in general, the first requisite is to note 
that objects are of radically different types. For each 
type * situation ' and * ingression ^ have their own special 
meanings which are different from their meanings for 
other types, though connexions can be pointed out* 



Digitized by 



Google 



vii] OBJECTS 149 

It is necessary therefore in discussing them to deter- 
mine what type of objects are under consideration. 
There are, I think, an indefinite number of types of 
objects. Happily we need not think of them all. The^ 
idea of situation has its peculiar importance in reference 
to three types of objects which I call sense-objects, 
perceptual objects and scientific objects. The suitability 
of these names for the three types is of minor import- 
ance, so long as I can succeed in explaining what I mean 
by them. 

These three types form an ascending hierarchy, of 
which each member presupposes the type below. The 
base of the hierarchy is formed by the sense-objects. 
These objects do not presuppose any other type of 
objects. 'A sense-object is a factor of nature posited 
by sense-awareness which (i), in that it is an object, does 
not share in the passage of nature and (ii) is not a 
relation between other factors of nature.^ It will of 
course be a relatum in relations which also implicate 
other factors of nature. But it is always a relatum' and 
never the relation itselfl Examples of sense-objects are 
a particular sort of colour, say Cambridge blue, or a 
particular sort of sound, or a particular sort of sriiell, 
or a particular sort of feeling. I am not talking of a 
particular patch of blue as seen during a particular 
second of time at a definite date. Such a patch is an 
event where Cambridge blue is situated. Similarly I am 
not talking of any particular concert-room as filled with 
the note. I mean the note itself and not the patch of 
volume filled by the sound for a tenth of a second. It is 
natural for us to think of the note in itself, but in the 
case of colour we are apt to think of it merely as a 
property of the patch. No one thinks of the note as a 



, ] 



Digitized by 



Google 



ISO THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

property of the concert-room. We see the blue and we 
hear the note. Both the blue and the note are im- 
mediately posited by the discrimination of sense-aware- 
ness which relates the mind to nature. The blue is 
posited as in nature related to other factors in nature. 
In particular it is posited as in the relation of being 
situated in the event which is its situation. 

The difficulties which cluster around the relation of 
situation arise from the obstinate refusal of philosophers 
to take seriously' the ultimate fact of multiple relations.^ 
By a multiple relation I mean a relation which in any 
concrete instance of its occurrence necessarily involves 
more than two relata. For example, when John likes 
Thomas there are only two relata, John and Thomas. 
But when John gives that book to Thomas there are 
three relata, John, that book, and Thomas. 

Some schools of philosophy, imder the influence of 
the Aristotelian logic and the Aristotelian philosophy, 
endeavour to get on without admitting any relations at 
all except that of substance and attribute. Namely all 
apparent relations are to be resolvable into the con- 
current existence of substances with contrasted at- 
tributes. It is fairly obvious that the Leibnizian monad- 
ology is the necessary outcome of any such philosophy. 
If you dislike pluralism, there will be only one monad. 

Other schools of philosophy admit relations but 
obstinately refuse to contemplate relations with more 
than two relata. I do not think that this limitation is 
based on any set purpose or theory. It merely arises 
from the fact that more complicated relations are a 
bother to people without adequate mathematical training, 
when they are admitted into the reasoning. 

I must repeat that we have nothing to do in these 



Digitized by 



Google 



VII] OBJECTS 151 

lectures with the ultimate character of reality. It is 
quite possible that in the true philosophy of reality 
there are only individual substances with attributes, 
or that there are only relations with pairs of relata. I do 
not believe that such is the case ; but I am not concerned 
to argue about it now. Our theme is Nature. So long 
as we confine ourselves to the factors posited in the 
sense-awareness of nature, it seems to me that there 
certainly are instances of multiple relations between 
these factors, and that the relation of situation for sense- 
objects is one example of such multiple relatibns. 

Consider a blue coat, a flannel coat of Cambridge 
blue belonging to some athlete. The coat itself is a 
perceptual object and its situation is not what I am 
talking about. We are talking of someone's definite 
sense-awareness of Cambridge blue as situated in some 
event of nature. He may be looking at the coat directly. 
He then sees Cambridge blue as situated practically in the 
same event as the coat at that instant. It is true that the 
blue which he sees is due to light which left the coat 
some inconceiviably small fraction of a second before. 
This difference would be important if he were looking at 
a starwhosecolourwas Cambridge blue. The star might 
have ceased to exist days ago, or even years ago. The 
situation of the blue vnll not then be very intimately 
connected with the situation (in another sense of 
* situation *) of any perceptual object. This disconnexion 
of the situation of the blue and the situation of some 
associated perceptual object does not require a star for 
its exemplification. Any looking glass will suffice. Look 
at the coat through a looking glass. Then blue is seen 
as situated behind the mirror. The event which is its 
situation depends upon the position of the observer. 



Digitized by 



Google 



iS2 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

The sense-awareness of the blue as situated in a 
certain event which I call the situation, is thus ex- 
hibited as the sense-awareness of a relation between the 
blue, the percipient event of the observer, the situation, 
and intervening events. All nature is in fact required, 
though only certain intervening events require their 
characters to be of certain definite sorts. The ingression 
of blue into the events of nature is thus exhibited as 
systematically correlated. The awareness of the observer 
depends on the position of the percipient event in this 
systematic correlation. I will use the term 'ingression 
into nature' for this systematic correlation of the blue 
with nature. Thus the in^ession of blue into any definite 
event is a part statement of the fact of the ingression 
of blue into nature. 

In respect to the ingression of blue into nature events 
may be roughly put into four classes which overlap and 
are not very clearly separated. These classes are (i) the 
percipient events, (ii) the situations, (iii) the active 
conditioning events, (iv) the passive conditioning events. 
To imderstand this classification of events in the general 
fact of the ingression of blue into nature, let us confine 
attention to one situation for one percipient event and 
to the consequent rdles of the conditioning events for 
the ingression as thus limited. The percipient event is 
the relevant bodily state of the observer. The situation 
is where he sees the blue, say, behind the mirror. The 
active conditioning events are the events whose charac- 
ters are particularly relevant for the event (which is the 
situation) to be the situation for that percipient event, 
namely the coat, the mirror, and the state of the room 
as to light and atmosphere. The passive conditioning 
events are the events of the rest of nature. 



Digitized by 



Google 



VII] OBJECTS 153 

In general the situation is an active conditioning ( 
event; namely the coat itself, when there is no mirror 
or other such contrivance to produce abnormal effects. 
But the example of the mirror shows us that the situation 
may be one of the passive conditioning events. We are 
then apt to say that our senses have been cheated, 
because we demand as a right that the situation should 
be an active condition in the ingression. 

This demand is not so baseless as it may seem when 
presented as I have put it. All we know of the characters 
of the events of nature is based on the analysis of the 
relations of situations to percipient events. If situations 
were not in general active conditions, this analysis 
would tell us nothing. Nature would be an unfathom- 
able enigma to us and there could be no science. Ac- 
cordingly the incipient discontent when a situation is 
foimd to be a passive condition is in a sense justifiable; 
because if that sort of thing went on too often, the r6le 
6i the intellect would be ended. 

Furthermore the mirror is itself the situation of other 
sense-objects either for the same observer with the 
same percipient event, or for other observers with 
other percipient events. Thus the fact that an event is a 
situation in the ingression of one set of sense-objects 
into nature is presumptive evidence that that event is 
an active condition in the ingression of other sense- j 
objects into nature which may have other situations. 

This is a fundamental principle of science which it has 
derived from common sense. 

I now turn to perceptual objects. When we look at 
the coat, we do not in general say, There is a patch of 
Cambridge blue; what naturally occurs to us is. There 
is a coat. Also the judgment that what we have seen is 



Digitized by 



Google 



154 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch 

a garment of man's attire is a detail. What we perceive 
is an object other than a mere sense-object. It is not a 
mere patch of colour, but something more; and it is 
that something more which we judge to be a coat. I 
will use the word *coat' as the name for that crude 
object which is more than a patch of colour, and without 
any allusion to the judgments as to its usefulness as an 
article of attire either in the past or the future. The coat 
which is perceived — ^in this sense of the word *coat' — 
is what I call a perceptual object. We have to investigate 
the general character of these perceptual objects. 

It is a law of nature that in general the situation of a 
sense-object is not only the situation of that sense- 
object for one definite percipient event, but is the 
situation of a variety of sense-objects for a variety of 
percipient events. For example, for any one percipient 
event, the situation of a sense-object of sight is apt also 
to be the situations of sense-objects of sight, of touch, 
of smell, and of sound. Furthermore this concurrence 
in the situations of sense-objects has led to the body — 
t.e. the percipient event^— so adapting itself that the 
perception of one sense-object in a certain situation 
leads to a subconscious sense-awareness of other sense- 
objects in the same situation. This interplay is especially 
the case between touch and sight. There is a certain 
correlation between the ingressions of sense-objects 
of touch and sense-objects of sight into nature, and in a 
slighter degree between the ingressions of other pairs 
of sense-objects. I call this sort of correlation the * con- 
veyance' of one sense-object by another. When you 
see the blue flannel coat you subconsciously feel yoiuBclf 
wearing it or otherwise touching it. If you are a 
smoker, you may also subconsciously be aware of the 



Digitized by 



Google 



VII] OBJECTS ISS 

faint aroma of tobacco. The peculiar fact, posited by 
this sense-awareness of the concurrence of subconscious 
sense-objects along with one or more dominating sense- 
objects in the same situation, is the sense-awareness of 
the perceptual object. I The p erceptual object is not 
primarily the issue of a judgment) It is a factor of nature 
directly posited in sense-awareness. The element of 
judgment comes in when we proceed to classify the 
particular perceptual object. For example, we say. 
That i^ flannel, and we think of the properties of flannel 
and the uses of athletes* coats. But that all takes place 
after we have got hold of the perceptual object. Anti- 
cipatory judgments affect the perceptual object per- 
ceived by focussing aiid diverting attention. 

CThe perceptual object is the outcome of the habit of 
experienced Anything which conflicts v^dth this habit . 
hinders the sense-awareness of such an object. A tense* \r ^'^ 
obj w t is not the product of the association of intellectual 
ideas ; it is the product of the association of sense-objects 
in the same situation. This outcome is not intellectual; 
it is an object of peculiar type with its own particular 
ingression into nature. 

There are two kinds of perceptual objects, namely, 
* delusive perceptual objects' and * physical objects.* 
The situation of a delusive perceptual object is a 
passive condition in the ingression of that object into 
nature. Also the event which is the situation will have 
the relation of situation to the object only for one 
particular percipient event. For example, an observer 
sees the image of the blue coat in a mirror. It is a blue 
coat that he sees and not a mere patch of colour. This 
shows tha^/me active conditions for the conveyance 
of a group of subconscious sense-objects by a dominating 



Digitized by 



Google 



iS6 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

sense-object are to be found in the percipient event. 
Namely we are to look for them in the investigations 
of medical psychologists. The ingression into nature of 
the delusive sense-object is conditioned by the adapta- 
tion of bodily events to the more normal occurrence, 
which is the ingression of the physical object. 

A perceptual object is a physical object when (i) its 
situation is an active conditioning event for the in- 
gression of any of its component sense-objects, and 
(ii) the same event can be the situation of the penceptual 
object for an indefinite nimiber of possible percipient 
events. Physical objects are the ordinary objects which 
we perceive when our senses are not cheated, such as 
chairs, tables and trees. In a way physical objects have 
more insistent perceptive power than sense-objects. 
Attention to the fact of their occurrence in nature is the 
first condition for the survival of complex living or- 
ganisms. The result of this high perceptive power of 
physical objects is the scholastic philosophy of nature 
which looks on the sense-objects ,as mere attributes of 
the physical objects. This scholastic point of view is 
directly contradicted by the wealth of sense-objects 
which enter into our experience as situated in events 
without any connexion with physical objects. For 
example, stray smells, sounds, colours and more subtle 
nameless sense-objects. There is no perception of 
physical objects without perception of sense-objects. 
But the converse does not hold: namely, there is 
abundant perception of sense-objects unaccompanied 
by any perception of physical objects. This lack of 
reciprocity in the relations between sense-objects and 
physical objects is fatal to the scholastic natural philo- 
sophy. 



Digitized by 



Google 



viij OBJECTS 157 

There is a great difference in the rdles of the situa- * 
tions of sense-objects and physical objects. The situa- 
tions of a physical object are conditioned by uniqueness 
and continuity. The uniqueness is an ideal limit to 
which we approximate as we proceed in thought along 
an abstractive set of durations, considering smaller 
and smaller durations in the approach to the ideal limit 
of the moment of time. In other words, when the 
duration is small enough, the situation of the physical 
object within that duration is practically unique. 

The identification of the same physical object as 
being situated in distinct events in distinct durations is 
eflFected by the condition of continuity. This condition 
of continuity is the condition that a continuity of passage 
of events, each event being a situation of the object in 
its corresponding duration, can be found from the earlier 
to the later of the two given events. So far as the two 
events are practically adjacent in one specious present, 
this continuity of passage may be directly perceived. 
Otherwise it is a matter of judgment and inference. 

Thq situations of a sense-object are not conditioned 
by any such conditions either of imiqueness or of con- 
tinuity. In any durations however small a sense-object 
may have any mmiber of situations separated from each 
other. Thus two situations of a sense-object, either in 
the same duration or in different durations, are not 
necessarily connected by any continuous passage of 
events which are also situations of that sense-object. 

The characters of the conditioning events involved in. 
the ingression of a sense-object into nature can be 
largely expressed in terms of the physical objects which 
are situated in those events. In one respect this is also 
a tautology. For the physical object is nothing else than 



1 



Digitized by 



Google 



IS8 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

\ Ithe habitual concurrence of a certain set of sense-objects 
in one situation.! Accordingly when we know all about 
the physical object, we thereby know its component 
sense-objects. But a physical object is a condition for 
the occurrence of sense-objects other than those which 
are its components. For example, the atmosphere causes 
the events which are its situations to be active con- 
ditioning events in the transmission of soimd. A mirror 
which is itself a physical object is an active condition for 
the situation of a patch of colour behind it, due to the 
reflection of light in it. 

Thus the origin of scientific knowledge is the en- 
deavour to express in terms of physical objects the 
various rSles of events as active conditions in the in- 
gression of sense-objects into nature. It is in the progress 
of this investigation that scientific objects emerge. They 
embody those aspects of the character of the situations 
of the physical objects which are most permanent and 
are expressible without reference to a multiple relation 
including a percipient event. Their relations to each 
other are also characterised by a certain simplicity and 
uniformity. Finally the characters of the observed 
physical objects and sense-objects ban be expressed in 
terms of these scientific objects. In fact the whole 
point of the search for scientific objects is the endeavour 
to obtain this simple expression of the characters of 
events. These scientific objects are not themselves 
merely formulae for calculation ; because formulae must 
refer to things in nature, and the scientific objects are 
the things in nature to which the formulae refer. 

A scientific object such as a definite electron is a 
systematic correlation of the characters of all events 
throughout all nature. It is an aspect of the systematic 



Digitized by 



Google 



VII] OBJECTS 159 

character of nature. The electron is not merely where 
its charge is. The charge is the quantitative character 
of certain events due to the ingression of the electron 
into nature. The electron is its whole field of force)| 
Namely the electron is the systematic way in which all 
events are modified as the expression of its ingression. 
The situation of an electron in any small duration may 
be defined as that event which has the quantitative 
character which is the charge of the electron. We may 
if we please term the mere charge the electron. But 
then another name is required for the scientific object 
which is the full entity which concerns science, and 
which I have c|Ped the electron. 

According to this conception of scientific objects, the 
rival theories of action at a distance and action by 
transmission through a mediiun are both incomplete 
expressions of the true process of nature. The stream 
of events which form the continuous series of situations 
of the electron is entirely self-determined, both as 
regards having the intrinsic character of being the series 
of situations <5f that electron and as regards the time- 
systems with which its various members are cogredient, 
and the flux of their positions in their corresponding 
durations. This is the foundation of the denial of action 
at a distance ; namely the progress of the stream of the 
situations of a scientific object can be determined by an 
analysis of the stream itself. 

On the other hand the ingression of every electron 
into nature modifies to some extent the character of 
every event. Thus the character of the stream of events 
which we are considering bears marks of the existence 
of every other electron throughout the universe. If we 
like to think of the electrons as being merely what I call 



Digitized by 



Google 



i6o THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

their charges, then the charges act at a distance. But 
this action consists in the modification of the situation 
of the other electron under consideration. This con- 
ception of a charge acting at a distance is a wholly 
artificial one. The conception which most fully expresses 
the character of nature is that of each event as modified 
by the ingression of each electron into nature. The ether 
is the expression of this systematic modification of events 
throughout space and throughout time. The best expres- 
sion of the character of this modification is for physicists 
to find out. My theory has nothing to do with that and 
is ready to accept any outcome of physical research. 

The connexion of objects with space^equires eluci- 
dation. Objects are situated in events. The relation of 
situation is a different relation for each type of object, 
and in the case of sense-objects it cannot be expressed 
as a two-termed relation. It would perhaps be better 

* to use a different word for these different types of the 
relation of situation. It has not however been necessary 
to do so for our purposes in these lectures. It must be 
understood however that, when situation is spoken of, 
some one definite type is imder discussion, and it may 
happen that the argument may not apply to situation of 

. another type. In all cases however I use situation to 
/ express a relation between objects and events and not 
between objects and abstractive elements. There is a 
derivative relation between objects and spatial elements 
which I call the relation of location; and when this 
relation holds, i say that the object is located in the 
abstractive element. In this sense, an object may be 
located in a moment of time, in a volume of space, an 
area, a line, or a point. There will be a peculiar type of 
location corresponding to each type of situation; and 



Digitized by 



Google 



VII] OBJECTS i6i 

location is in each case derivative from the corresponding 
relation of situation in a way which I will proceed to 
explain. 

Also location in the timeless space of some time-system 
is a relation derivative from location in instantaneous 
spaces of the same time-system. Accordingly location 
in an instantaneous space is the primary idea which we 
have to explain. Great confusion has been occasioned 
in natural philosophy by the neglect to distinguish be- 
tween the different types of objects, the different types 
of situation, the different types of location, and the 
difference between location and situation. It is im- 
possible to reason accurately in the vague concerning 
objects and their positions without keeping these dis- 
tinctions in view. An object is located in an abstractive 
element, when an abstractive set belonging to that ele- 
ment can be found such that each event belonging to 
that set is a situation of the object. It will be remem- 
bered that an abstractive element is a certain group of 
abstractive sets, and that each abstractive set is a set 
of events. This definition defines the location of an 
element in any type of abstractive element. In this 
sense we can talk of the existence of an object at an 
instant, meaning thereby its location in some definite 
moment. It may also be located in some spatial element 
of the instantaneous space of that moment. 

A quantity can be said to be located in an abstractive 
element when an abstractive set belonging to the element 
can be found such that the quantitative expressions of 
the corresponding characters of its events converge to 
the measure of the given quantity as a limit when we 
pass along the abstractive set towards its converging 
end. 

W.N. II 



Digitized by 



Google 



i6z THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

By these definitions location in elements of instanta- 
neous spaces is defined. These elements occupy corre- 
sponding elements of timeless spaces. An object located 
in an element of an instantaneous space will also be said 
to be located at that moment in the timeless element of 
the timeless space whichis occupied by that instantaneous 
element. 

It is not every object which can be located in a moment. 
An object which can be located in every moment of some 
duration will be called a ^uniform' object throughout 
that duration. Ordinary physical objects appear to us 
to be uniform objects, and we habitually assiune that 
scientific objects such as electrons are imiform. But 
some sense-objects certainly are not uniform. A tune 
is an example of a non-uniform object. We have per- 
ceived it as a whole in a certain duration ; but the tune 
as a tune is not at any moment of that duration though 
one of the individual notes may be located there. 

It is possible therefore that for the existence of 
certain sorts of objects, e.g. electrons, minimimi quanta 
of time are requisite. Some such postulate is apparently 
indicated by the modem quantimi theory and it is per- 
fectly consistent with the doctrine of objects maintained 
in these lectures. 

Also the instance of the distinction between the 
electron as the mere quantitative electric charge of its 
situation and the electron as standing for the ingression 
of an object throughout nature illustrates the indefinite 
nimiber of types of objects which exist in nature. We 
can intellectually distinguish even subtler and subtler 
types of objects. Here I reckon subtlety as meaning 
seclusion from the inunediate apprehension of sense- 
awareness. Evolution in the complexity of life means an 



Digitized by 



Google 



VII] OBJECTS 163 

increase in the types of objects directly sensed. Deli- 
cacy of sense-apprehension means perceptions of objects 
as distinct entities which are mere subtle ideas to cruder 
sensibilities. The phrasing of music is a mere abstract 
subtlety to the unmusical; it is a direct sense-appre- 
hension to the initiated. For example, if we could 
imagine some lowly type of organic being thinking and 
aware of our thoughts, it would wonder at the abstract 
subtleties in which we indulge as we think of stones 
and bricks and drops of water and plants. It only knows 
of vague undifferentiated feelings in nature. It would 
consider us as given over to the play of excessively 
abstract intellects. But then if it could think, it would 
anticipate; and if it anticipated, it would soon per- 
ceive for itself. 

In these lectures we have been scrutinising the 
foundations of natural philosophy. We are stopping at 
the very point where a boundless ocean of enquiries 
opens out for our questioning. 

I agree that the view of Nature which I have main- 
tained in these lectures is not a simple one. Nature 
appears as a complex system whose factors are dimly 
discerned by us. But, as I ask you. Is not this the very 
truth ? Should we not distrust the jaunty assurance with 
which every age prides itself that it at last has hit upon 
the ultimate concepts in which all that happens can be 
formulated ? The aim of science is to seek the simplest 
explanations of complex facts. We are apt to fall into 
the error of thinking that the facts are simple because 
simplicity is the goal of our quest. The guiding motto 
in the life of every natural philosopher should be, 
Seek simplicity and distrust it. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CHAPTER VIII 
SUMMARY 

There is a general agreement that Einstein's investiga- 
tions have one fundamental merit irrespective of any 
criticisms which we may feel inclined to pass on them. 
They have made us think. But when we have admitted 
so far, we are most of us faced with a distressing per- 
plexity. What is it that we ought to think about? The 
purport of my lecture this afternoon will be to meet this 
difficulty and, so far as I am able, to set in a clear light 
thgjdiangesjn the backgroundjof our jci^^ 
which are necessitated by any acceptance, however 
qualified^, ofEinsteln's main positions. 1 remember that 
I am lecturing to the members of a chemical society 
who are not for the most part versed in advanced 
mathematics. The first point that I would urge upon you 
is that what immediately concerns you is not so much 
the detailed deductions of the new theory as this general 
change in the background of scientific conceptions 
which will follow from its acceptance. Of course, the 
detailed deductions are important, because unless our 
colleagues the astronomers and the physicists find these 
predictions to be verified we can neglect the theory 
altogether. But we may now take it as granted that in 
many striking particulars these deductions have been 
foimd to be in agreement with observation. Accord- 
ingly the theory has to be taken seriously and, we are 
anxious to know what will be the consequences of its 
final acceptance. Furthermore during the last few weeks 



Digitized by 



Google 



CH. VIII] SUMMARY 165 

the scientific journals and the lay press have been filled 
with articles as to the nature of the crucial experiments 
which have been made and as to some of the more 
striking expressions of the outcome of the new theory. 

* Space caught bending' appeared on the news-sheet 
of a well-known evening paper. This rendering is a 
terse but not inapt translation of Einstein's own way of 
interpreting his results. I should say at once that^I am 
a heretic as to this explanation and that I shall expound 
to you another explanation based upon some work of 
my own, an explanation which seems to me to be more 
in accordance with our scientific ideas and with the 
whole body of facts which have to be explained.} We 
have to remember that a new theory must take accoimt 
of the old well-attested facts of science just as much as 
of the very latest experimental results which have led 
to its production. 

To put ourselves in the position to assimilate and to 
criticise any change in ultimate scientific conceptions we 
must begin at the beginning. So you must bear with me 
if I commence by making some simple and obvious 
reflections. Let us consider three statements, (i) * Yes- 
terday a man was run over on the Chelsea Embankment/ 
(ii) * Cleopatra's Needle is on the Charing Cross Em- 
bankment/ and (iii) * There are dark lines in the Solar 
Spectrum.' The first statement about the accident to 
the man is about what we may term an * occurrence,' 
a * happening,' or an * event.' I will useHthe term 

* event ' because it is the shortest: In order to specify an 
observed event, the place, the time, and character of the 
event are necessary. In specifying the place and the time 
you are really stating the relation of the assigned event 
to the general structure of other observed events. For 



Digitized by 



Google 



i66 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

example, the man was nm over between your tea and 
your dinner and adjacently to a passing barge in the 
river and the traffic in the Strand. The point which I 
want to make is this: Nature is known to us in our 
experience as a complex of passing events. In this 
complex [we discern definite mutual relations between 
component events, which we may call their relative 
positions, and these positions we express partly in terms 
of space and partly in terms of time.'i Also in addition 
to its mere relative position to other events, each par- 
ticular event has its own peculiar character. In other 
words, nature is a structure of events and each event 
has its position in this structure and its own peculiar 
character or quality. 

Let us now examine the other two statements in the 
light of this general principle as to the meaning of 
nature. Take the second statement, * Cleopatra's 
Needle is on the Charing Cross Embankment.' At 
first sight we should hardly call this an event. It seems 
to lack the element of time or transitoriness. But does 
it? If an angel had made the remark some hundreds of 
millions of years ago, the earth was not in existence, 
twenty millions of years ago there was no Thames, 
eighty years ago there was no Thames Embankment, 
and when I was a small boy Cleopatra's Needle was 
not there. And now that it is there, we none of us expect 
it to be eternal. The static timeless element in the rela- 
tion of Cleopatra's Needle to the Embankment is a 
pure illusion generated by the fact that for purposes of 
daily intercourse its emphasis is ^needless. What it 
comes to is this : Amidst the structure of events which 
form the medium within which the daily life of Lon- 
doners is passed we know how to identify a certain 



Digitized by 



Google 



viii] SUMMARY 167 

stream of events which maintain permanence of charac- 
ter, namely the character of being the situations of 
Cleopatra's Needle. Day by day and hour by hour we 
can find a certain chunk in the transitory life of nature 
and of that chunk we say, ' There is Cleopatra's Needle/ 
If we define the Needle in a sufficiently abstract manner 
we can say that it never changes. But a physicist who 
looks on that part of the life of nature as a dance of 
electrons, will tell you that daily it has lost some mole- 
cules and gained others, and even the plain man can 
see that it gets dirtier and is occasionally washed. Thus 
the question of change in the Needle is a mere matter of 
definition. The more abstract your definition, the more 
permanent the Needle. But whether your Needle change 
or be permanent, all you mean by^ stating that it is 
situated on the Charing Cross Embankment, is that 
amid the structure of events you know of a certain con- 
tinuous limited stream of events, such that any chunk 
of that stream, during any hour, or any day, or any 
second, has the character of being the situation of 
Cleopatra's Needle. 

Finally, we come to the third statement, ' There are 
dark lines in the Solar Spectrum.' This is a law of nature. 
But what does that mean? It means merely this. If any 
event has the character of being an exhibition of the 
solar spectrum imder certain assigned circumstances, it 
will also have the character of exhibiting dark lines in 
that spectrum. 
\/ This long discussion brings us to the final conclusion 
that ^ the concrete facts of nature are events exhibiting 
a certain structure in their mutual relations and certain 
characters of their own. The aim ofs dence is tjL fixprcss 
the relations between their characters in terms of the 



Digitized by 



Google 



/ 



i68 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

nillUial fttniAtiirQl rg lations between the e vents jthus 
\ characterised. The mutual structural relations between 
f events are both spatial and temporal . If you think of 
them as merely spatial you are omitting the temporal 
element, and if you think of them as merely temporal 
you are omitting the spatial element. Thus when you 
think of space alone, or of time alone, you are dealing 
in abstractions, namely, you are leaving out an essential 
element in the life of nature as known to you in the 
experience of your senses. Furthermore there are 
different ways of making these abstractions which we 
think of as space and as time; and imder some circimi- 
stances we adopt one way and under other circumstances 
we adopt another way. Thus there is no paradox in 
holding that what we mean by space under one set of 
circumstances is not what we mean by space imder 
another set of circiunstances. And equally what we 
mean by time under one set of circimistances is not 
what we mean by time imder another set of circum- 
stances. \By saying that space and time are abstractions, 
I do not mean that they do not express for us real facts 
about nature.^ What I mean is that there are no spatial 
facts or temporal facts apart from physical nature, 
namely that space and time are merely ways of expressing 
certain truths about the relations between events. Also 
that under different circumstances there are different 
sets of truths about the imiverse which are naturally 
presented to us as statements about space. In such a 
case what a being imder the one set of circumstances 
means by space will be different from that meant by a 
being under the other set of circumstances. Accord- 
ingly when we are comparing two observations made 
under different circumstances we have to ask *Do the 



Digitized by 



Google 



\ 



viii] SUMMARY 169 

two observers mean the same thing by space and the \ 
same thing by time? ' The modem theory of relativity 
has arisen because certain perplexities as to the con- 
cordance of certain delicate observations such as the 
motion of the earth through the ether, the perihelion 
of mercury, and the positions of the stars in the neigh- 
bourhood of the Sim, have been solved by reference to 
this purely relative significance of space and time. 

I want now to recall your attention to Cleopatra's 
Needle, which I have not yet done with. As you are 
walking along the Embankment you suddenly look up 
arid say, ^ Hullo, there's the Needle/ In other words, 
you recognise it. You cannot recognise an event; 
because when it is gone, it is gone. You may observe 
another event of analogous character, but the actual 
chunk of the life of nature is inseparable from its unique 
occurrence.) But a character of an event can be recog- 
nised. We all know that if we go to the Embankment 
near Charing Cross we shall observe an event having the 
character which we recognise as Cleopatra's Needle, 
(Things which we thus recognise I call objects.^ An 
object is situated in those events or in that stream of 
events of which it expresses the character. There are 
many sorts of objects. For example, the colour green 
is an object according to the above definition. It is the 
purpose of science to trace the laws which govern the 
appearance of objects in the various events in which they 
are found to be situated. For this purpose we can 
mainly concentrate on two types of objects, which I will 
call t material physical objects and scientific objects. 
A material physical object is an ordinary bit of matter, 
Cleopatra's Needle for example. This is a much more 
complicated type of object than a mere colour, such as 



Digitized by 



Google 



lyo THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

the colour of the Needle. I call these single objects, 
such as coloiu^ or sounds; |^sense-objects:i An artist 
will train himself to attend more particularly to sense- 
objects where the ordinary person attends normally to 
material objects. Thus if you were walking with an 
artist, when you said * There's Cleopatra's Needle/ 
perhaps he simultaneously exclaimed ^There's a nice 
bit of colour.' Yet you were both expressing your 
recognition of different component characters of the 
same event. But in science we have found out that 
when we know all about the adventures amid events of 
material physical objects and of scientific objects ^e 
have most of the relevant information which will enable 
us to predict the conditions under which we shall 
perceive sense-objects in specific situations. For ex- 
ample, when we know that there is a blazing fire {i.e. 
material and scientific objects imdergoing various 
exciting adventures amid events) and opposite to it a 
mirror (which is another material object) and the 
positions of a man's face and eyes gazing into the mirror, 
we know that he can perceive the redness of the flame 
situated in an event behind the mirror — ^thus, to a large 
extent, (the appearance of sense-objects is conditioned 
by the adventures of material objects.' The analysis of 
these adventures makes us aware of another character 
of events, namely their characters as fields of activity 
which determine the subsequent events to which they 
. will pass on the objects situated in them. We express 
these fields of activity in terms of gravitational, electro- 
magnetic, or chemical forces and attractions. But the 
exact expression of the nature of these fields of activity 
forces us intellectually to acknowledge a less obvious 
type of objects as situated in events. I mean molecules 



Digitized by 



Google 



viii] SUMMARY 171 

and electrons. These objects are not recognised in 
isolation. We cannot well miss Cleopatra's Needle, if 
we are in its neighbourhood ; but no one has seen a single 
molecule or a single electron, yet the characters of 
events are only explicable to us by expressing them in 
terms of these scientific objects . Undoubtedly molecules 
and electrons are abstractions. But then so is Cleo- 
patra's Needle. The concrete facts are the events them-^ 
selves — I have already explained to you that to be an 
abstraction does not mean that an entity is nothing. It 
merely means that its existence is only one factor of a 
more concrete element of natiu-e. So an electron is 
abstract because you cannot wipe out the whole structure 
of events and yet retain the electron in existence. In 
the same way the grin on the cat is abstract; and the 
molecule is really in the event in the same sense as the 
grin is really on the cat's face. Now the more ultimate 
sciences such as Chemistry or Physics cannot express 
their ultimate laws in terms of such vague objects as 
the Sim, the earth, Cleopatra's Needle, or a human 
body. Sudi objects more properly belong to Astro- 
nomy, to Geology, to Engineering, to Archaeology, 
or to Biology. Chemistry and Physics only deal with 
them as exhibiting statistical complexes of the effects 
of their more intimate laws. In a certain sense, they 
only enter into Physics and Chemistry as technological 
applications. The reason is that they are too vague. 
Where does Cleopatra's Needle begin and where does 
it end? Is the soot part of it? Is it a different 
object when it sheds a molecule or when its surface 
enters into chemical combination with the acid of a 
London fog? The definiteness and permanence of the 
Needle is nothing to the possible permanent definiteness 



Digitized by 



Google 



172 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

of a molecule as conceived by science, and the per- 
manent definiteness of a molecule in its turn yields to 
that of an electron. Thus science in its most ultimate 
formulation of law seeks objects with the most per- 
manent definite simplicity of character and expresses 
its final laws in terms of them. 

Again when we seek definitely to express the relations 
of events which arise from their spatio-temporal 
structure, we approximate to simplicity by progressively 
diminishing the extent (both temporal and spatial) of 
the events considered. For example, the event which 
is the life of the chunk of nature which is the Needle 
during one minute has to the life of natiu-e within a 
passing barge during the same minute a very complex 
spatio-temporal relation. But suppose we progressively 
diminish the time considered to a second, to a hun- 
dredth of a second, to a thousandth of a second, and 
so on. As we pass along such a series we approximate 
to an ideal simplicity of structural relations of the pairs 
of events successively considered, which ideal we call 
the spatial relations of the Needle to the barge at some 
instant. Even these relations are too complicated for us, 
and we consider smaller and smaller bits of the Needle 
and of the barge. Thus we finally reach the ideal of an 
event so restricted in its extension as to be without ex- 
tension in space or extension in time. Such an event is 
a mere spatial point-flash of instantaneous duration, 
I call such an ideal event an * event-particle.' You must 
not think of the world as ultimately built up of event- 
particles. That is to put the cart before the horse. The 
world we know is a continuous stream of occurrence 
which we can discriminate into finite events forming by 
their overlappings and containings of each other and 



Digitized by 



Google 



VIII] SUMMARY 173 

separations a spatio-temporal stnictiire. We can express 
the properties of this structure in terms of the ideal 
limits to routes of approximation, which I have termed 
event-particles. Accordingly event-particles are abstrac- 
tions in their relations to the more concrete events. But 
then by this time you will have comprehended that you 
cannot analyse concrete nature without abstracting. 
Also I repeat, \the abstractions of science are entities 
which are truly in nature, though they have no meaning 
in isolation from nature^ 

The character of the spatio-temporal structure of 
events can be fully expressed in terms of relations 
between these more abstract event-particles. The ad- 
vantage of dealing with event-particles is that though 
they are abstract and complex in respect to the finite 
events which we directly observe, they are simpler 
than finite events in respect to their mutual relations. 
Accordingly they express for us the demands of an ideal 
accuracy, and of an ideal simplicity in the exposition of 
relations. These event-particles are the ultimate elements 
of the four-dimensional space-time manifold which the 
theory of relativity presupposes. You will have observed 
that each event-particle is as much an instant of time as 
it is a point of space. I have called it an instantaneous 
point-flash. Thus in the structure of this space-time 1 
manifold space is not finally discriminated from time, 
and the possibility remains open for diverse modes of 
discrimination according to the diverse circumstances 
of observers. It is this possibility which makes the 
fundamental distinction between the new way of con- 
ceiving the universe and the old way. The secret of 
understanding relativity is to imderstand this. It is of 
no use rushing in with picturesque paradoxes, such as 



Digitized by 



Google 



174 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

* Space caught bending/ if you have not mastered this 
fundamental conception which imderlies the whole 
theory. When I say that it underlies the whole theory, 
I mean that in my opinion it ought to underlie it, though 
I may confess some doubts as to how far all expositions 
of the theory have really imderstood its implications and 
its premises. 

Our measurements when they are expressed in terms 
of an ideal accuracy are measurements which express 
properties of the space-time manifold. Now there are 
measurements of diflFerent sorts. You can measure 
lengths, or angles, or areas, or volumes, or times. There 
are also other sorts of measures such as measurements 
of intensity of illumination, but I will disregard these 
for the moment and will confine attention to those 
measurements which particularly interest us as being 
measurements of space or of time. It is easy to see that 
four such measurements of the proper characters are 
necessary to determine the position of an event-particle 
in the space-time manifold in its relation to the rest of 
the manifold. For example, in a rectangular field you 
start from one corner at a given time, you measure a 
definite distance along one side, you then strike out 
into the field at right angles, and then measure a definite 
distance parallel to the other pair of sides, you then rise 
vertically a definite height and take the time. At the 
point and at the time which you thus reach there is 
occurring a definite instantaneous point-flash of nature. 
In other words, your four measurements have deter- 
mined a definite event-particle belonging to the four- 
dimension space-time manifold. These measurements 
have appeared to be very simple to the land-surveyor 
and raise in his mind no philosophic difliculties. But 



Digitized by 



Google 



viii] SUMMARY 175 

suppose there are beings on Mars sufficiently advanced 
in scientific invention to be able to watch in detail the 
operations of this survey on earth. Suppose that they 
construe the operations of the English land-surveyors 
in reference to the space natural to a being on Mars, 
namely a Martio-centric space in which that planet is 
fixed. The earth is moving relatively to Mars and is 
rotating. To the beings on Mars the operations, con- 
strued in this fashion, effect measurements of the greatest 
complication. Furthermore, according to the relati- 
vistic doctrine, the operation of time-measurement on 
earth will not correspond quite exactly to any time- 
measurement on Mars. 

I have discussed this example in order to make you 
realise that in thinking of the possibilities of measure- 
ment in the space-time manifold, we must not confine 
ourselves merely to those minor variations which might 
seem natural to human beings on the earth. Let us 
ntiake therefore the general statement that four measure- 
ments, respectively of independent types (such as mea- 
surements of lengths in three directions and a time), 
can be foimd such that a definite event-particle is 
determined by them in its relations to other parts of 
the manifold. 

I^ (Pi> p2y Psy Pd ^^ ^ s^t ^^ measurements of this 
system, then the event-particle which is thus deter- 
mined will be said to have p^j p^^ p^y p^ as its co-ordi- 
nates in this system of measurement. Suppose that we 
name it the/>-system of measurement. Then in the same 
/^-system by properly varying (pi, p^, />3, p^ every 
event-particle that has been, or will be, or instantane- 
ously is now, can be indicated. Furthermore, according 
to any system of measurement that is natural to us, 



\ 



^ '' j Digitized by VjOOQIC 



176 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch, 

three of the co-ordinates will be measurements of space 
and one will be a measurement of time. Let us always 
take the last co-ordinate to represent the time-measure- 
ment. Then we should naturally say that (p^ p^^ p^) 
determined a point in space and that the event-particle 
happened at that point at the timep^. But we must not 
make the mistake of thinking that there is a space in 
addition to the space-time manifold. That manifold is 
all that there is for the determination of the meaning of 
space and time. We have got to determine the meaning 
of a space-point in terms of the event-particles of the 
four-dimensional manifold. There is only one way to 
do this. Note that if we vary the time and take times 
with the same three space co-ordinates, then the event- 
particles, thus indicated, are all at the same point. But 
seeing that there is nothing else except the event- 
particles, this can only mean that the point {p^ p^^ ps) 
of the space in the /^-system is merely the Collection of 
event-particles (p^, p^^ p^j [p4])> where p^ is varied and 
{pij />2> Pb) is kept fixed. It is rather disconcerting to 
find that a point in space is not a simple entity; but it 
is a conclusion which follows immediately from the 
relative theory of space. 

Furthermore the inhabitant of Mars determines 
event-particles by another system of measurements. 
Call his system the ^-system. According to him 
(?i> ?2J fe> ^4) determines an event-particle, and 
(^1,^2, J3) determines a point and ^4 a time. But the 
collection of event-particles which he thinks of as a 
point is entirely different from any such collection 
which the man on earth thinks of as a point. Thus the 
j-space for the man on Mars is quite different from the 
/>-space for the land-siureyoc on earth. 



Digitized by 



Google 



viii] SUMMARY 177 

So far in speaking of space we have been talking of 
the timeless space of physical science, namely, of our 
concept of eternal space in which the world adventures. 
But the space which we see as we look about is instan* 
taneous space, llius if our natiu-al perceptions are 
adjustable to the /^-system of measurements we see 
instantaneously all the event-particles at some definite 
time/>4, and observe a succession of such spaces as time 
moves on. The timeless space is achieved by stringing 
together all these instantaneous spaces. The points of 
an instantaneous . space are event-particles, and the 
points of an eternal space are strings of event-particles 
occurring in succession. But the man on Mars will 
never perceive the same instantaneous spaces as the 
man on the earth. This system of instantaneous spaces 
will cut across the earth-man*s system. For the earth- 
man there is one instantaneous space which is the 
instantaneous present, there are the past spaces and the ^ \ 
fiitiu-e spaces. But the present space of the man on / 
Mars cuts across the present space of the man on the "^^ 
earth. "So tHat of the event-particles which the earth- 1 ' 
man thinks of as happening now in the present, the 
man on Mars thinks that some are already past and are 
ancient history, that others are in the futiu-e, and others 
are in the immediate present. This break-down in the 
neat conception of a past, a present, and a futiu-e is a 
serious paradox. I call two event-particles which on 
some or other system of measurement are in the same 
instantaneous space * co-present* event-particles. Then 
it is possible that A and B may be co-present, and that 
A and C may be co-present, but that B and C may not 
be co-present. For example, at some inconceivable 
distance from us there are events co-present with us 



Digitized by 



Google 



178 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

now and also co-present with the birth of Queen 
Victoria. If A and B are co-present there will be some 
systems in which A precedes B and some in which B 
precedes A. Also there can be no velocity quick enough 
to carry a material particle from -4 to -B or from BtoA. 
These different measure-systems with their divergences 
of time-reckoning are puzzling, and to some extent 
affront our common sense. It is not the usual way in 
which we think of the Universe. We think of one 
necessary time-system and one necessary space. Ac- 
i cording to the new theory, there are an indefinite 
number of discordant time-series and an indefinite 
nimiber of distinct spaces. Any correlated pair, a 
time-system and a space-system, will do in which to fit 
our description of the Universe. We find that under 
given conditions our measurements are necessarily made 
in some one pair which together form our natural 
measure-system. The difficulty as to discordant time- 
systems is partly solved by distinguishing between what 
I call the creative advance of nature, which is not 
properly serial at all, and any one time series. We 
habitually muddle together this creative advance, which 
we experience and know as the perpetual transition of 
nature into novelty, with the single-time series which 
we naturally employ for measurement. The various 
time-series each measure some aspect of the creative 
advance, and the whole bundle of them express all the 
properties of this advance which are measurable. The 
reason why we have not previously noted this difference 
of time-series is the very small difference of properties 
between any two such series. Any observable pheno- 
mena due to this cause depend on the square of the 
ratio of any velocity entering into the observation to 



Digitized by 



Google 



VIII] SUMMARY 179 

the velocity of light. Now light takes about fifty minutes 
to get round the earth's orbit; and the earth takes 
rather more than 17,531 half-hoiu^ to do the same. 
Hence all the effects due to this motion are of the order 
of the ratio of one to the square of 10,000. Accordingly 
an earth-man and a sun-man have only neglected 
effects whose quantitative magnitudes all contain the 
factor i/io®. Evidently such effects can only be noted 
by means of the most refined observations. They have 
been observed however. Suppose we compare two 
observations on the velocity of light made with the 
same apparatus as we turn it through a right angle. 
The velodty of the earth relatively to the sim is in one 
direction, the velocity of light relatively *to the ether 
should be the same in all directions. Hence if space 
when we take the ether as at rest means the same thing 
as space when we take the earth as at rest, we ought to 
find that the velocity of light relatively to the earth 
varies according to the direction from which it comes. 

These observations on earth constitute the basic 
principle of the famous experiments designed to detect 
the motion of the earth through the ether. You all 
know that, quite imexpectedly, they gave a null result. 
This is completely explained by the fact that, the space- 
system and the time-system which we are using are 
in certain minute ways different from the space and the 
time relatively to the sun or relatively to any other body 
with respect to which it is moving. 

All this discussion as to the nature of time and space 
has lifted above our horizon a great difficulty which 
affects the formulation of all the ultimate laws of physics 
— ^for example, the laws of the electromagnetic field, 
and the law of gravitation. Let us take the law of 

12 — 2 



Digitized by. 



Google 



i8o THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

^ gravitation as an example. Its formulation is as follows: 
viTwo material bodies attract each other with a force 
proportional to the product of their masses and ueisr 

f n versely proportional to the square of their distances. In 
this statement the bodies are supposed to be small 
enough to be treated as material particles in relation to 
their distances; and we need not bother further about 
that minor point. The difficulty to which I want to 
draw your attention is this: In the formulation of the 
law one definite time and one definite space are pre- 
supposed. The two masses are assumed to be in simul- 
taneous positions. 

But what is simultaneous in one time-system may not 
be simultaneous in another time-system. So according 
to our new views the law is in this respect not formulated 
so as to have any exact meaning. Furthermore an 
analogous difficulty arises over the question of distance. 
The distance between two instantaneous positions, 
t.e. between two event-particles, is different in different 
space-systems. What space is to be chosen ? Thus again 
the law lacks precise formulation, if relativity is accepted. 
Our problem is to seek a fresh interpretation of the 
law of gravity in which these difficulties are evaded. In 
the first place we must avoid the abstractions of space 
and time in the formulation of our fundamental ideas 
and must recur to the ultimate facts of nature, namely 
to events. Also in order to find the ideal simplicity of 
expressions of the relations between events, we restrict 
ourselves to event-particles. Thus the life of a material 
particle is its adventure amid a track of event-particles 
strung out as a continuous series or path in the four- 
dimensional space-time manifold. These event-particles 
are the various situations of the material particle. We 



Digitized by 



Google 



viiij SUMMARY i8i 

usually express this fact by adopting our natural space- 
time system and by talking of the path in space of the 
material particle as it exists at successive instants of time. 

We have to ask ourselves what are the laws of nature 
which lead the material particle to adopt just this path 
among event-particles and no other. Think of the path 
as a whole. What characteristic has that path got which 
would not be shared by any other slightly varied path? 
We are asking for more than a law of gravity. We want 
laws of motion and a general idea of the way to formulate 
the effects of physical forces. 

In order to answer our question we put the idea of the 
attracting masses in the backgroimd and concentrate 
attention on the field of activity of the events in the 
neighbourhood of the path. In so doing we are acting 
in conformity with the whole trend of scientific thought - 
during the last himdred years, which has more and more 
concentrated attention on the field of force as the im- 
mediate agent in directing motion, to the exclusion of 
the consideration of the immediate mutual influence 
between two distant bodies. We have got to find the 
way of expressing the field of activity of events in the 
neighbourhood of some definite event-particle E of the 
four-dimensional manifold. I bring in a fimdamental 
physical idea which I call the 'impetus' to express this 
physical field. The event-particle E is related to any 
neighbouring event-particle P by an element of impetus. 
The assemblage of all the elements of impetus relating 
E to the assemblage of event-particles in the neighbour- 
hood of E expresses the character of the field of activity 
in the neighbourhood of E. Where I differ from Einstein y 
is that he conceives this quantity which I call the impetus 
as merely expressing the characters of the space and 



Digitized by 



Google 






182 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

time to be adopted and thus ends by talking of the 
gravitational field expressing a curvature in the space- 
time manifold. I cannot attach any clear conception to 
his interpretation of space and time. My formtdae 
differ slightly from his, though they agree in those 
ii^tances where his results have been verified. I need 
hardly say that in this particular of the formulation of the 
law of gravitation I have drawn on the general method 
of procedure which constitutes his great discovery. 

Einstein showed how to express the characters of the 
assemblage of elements of impetus of the field sur- 
rpimding an event-particle E in terms of ten quantities 
which I will caU J^n, J^^ (= J^^), J^, J^ (= J^^, etc. 
It win be noted that there are four spatio-temporal 
measurements relating E to its neighbour P, and that 
there are ten pairs of such measurements if we are 
allowed to take any one measurement twice over to 
make one such pair. The ten J*s depend merely on the 
position of £ in the four-dimensional manifold, and the 
element of impetus between E and P can be expressed 
in terms of the ten J*s and the ten pairs of the four 
spatio-temporal measurements relating E and P. The 
numerical values of the J*s will depend on the sjrstem 
of measurement adopted, but are so adjusted to each 
particular system that the same value is obtained for 
the element of impetus between E and P, whatever be 
the system of measurement adopted. This fact is ex- 
pressed by saying that the ten J*s form a * tensor.' It is 
not going too far to say that the announcement that 
physicists would have in future to study the theory 
of tensors created a veritable panic among them when 
the verification of Einstein's predictions was first 
announced. 



Digitized by 



Google 



VIII] SUMMARY 183 

The ten J*s at any event-particle E can be expressed in 
terms of two functions which I call the potential and the 
'associate-potential' at E. The potential is practically 
what is meant by the ordinary gravitation potential, 
when we express ourselves in terms of the Euclidean 
space in reference to which the attracting mass is at 
rest. The associate-potential is defined by the modifi- 
cation of substituting the direct distance for the inverse 
distance in the definition of the potential, and its calcu- 
lation can easily be made to depend on that of the old- 
fashioned potential. Thus the calculation of the J*s — ^the 
coefiicients of impetus, as I will call them — does not 
involve anything very revolutionary in the mathematical 
knowledge of physicists. We now return to the path of 
the attracted particle. We add up all the elements of 
impetus in the whole path, and obtain thereby what I 
call the 'integral impetus.* The characteristic of the 
actual path as compared with neighbouring alternative 
paths is that in the actual paths the integral impetus 
would neither gain nor lose, if the particle wobbled out 
of it into a small extremely near alternative path. Mathe- 
maticians would express this by saying, that the integral 
impetus is stationary for an infinitesimal displacement. 
In this statement of the law of motion I have neglected 
the existence of other forces. But that would lead me 
too far afield. 

The electromagnetic theory has to be modified to 
allow for the presence of a gravitational field. Thus 
Einstein's investigations lead to the first discovery of 
any relation between gravity and other physical pheno- 
mena. In the form in which I have put this modification, 
we deduce Einstein's fundamental principle, as to the 
motion of light along its rays, as a first approximation 



Digitized by 



Google 



i84 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. viii 

which is absolutely true for infinitely short waves* 
Einstein's principle, thus partially verified, stated in my 
language is that a ray of light always follows a path such 
that the integral impetus along it is zero. This involves 
that every element of impetus along it is zero. 

In conclusion, I must apologise. In the first place 
I have considerably toned down the various exciting 
peculiarities of the original theory and have reduced it 
to a greater conformity with the older physics. I do not 
allow that physical phenomena are due to oddities of 
space. Also I have added to the dullness of the lecture 
by my respect for the audience. You would have enjoyed 
a more popular lecture with illustrations of delightful 
paradoxes. But I know also that you are serious 
students who are here because you really want to know 
how the new theories may affect your scientific re- 
searches. 



Digitized by 



Google 



CHAPTER IX 
THE ULTIMATE PHYSICAL CONCEPTS 

The second chapter of this book lays down the first 
principle to be guarded in framing our physical concept. 
We must avoid vicious bifurcation Nature is nothing^ 
else than the deliverance of sense-awareness. We have 
no principles whatever to tell us what could stimulate 
mind towards sense-awareness. Our sole task is to 
exhibit in one system the characters and inter-relations 
of all that is observed. Our attitude towards nature is 
^purely * behaviouristic/ so far as concerns the formulation 
of physical concepts. 

Our knowledge of nature is an experience of activity 
(or passage). The things previously observed are active 
entities, the * events.' They are chunks in the life of 
nature. These events have to each other rel^ons which 
in our knowledge differentiate themselves into space- 
relations and time-relations. But this differentiation 
between space and time, though inherent in nature, is 
comparatively superficial; and space and time are each 
partial expressions of one fundamental relation between 
events which is neither spatial nor temporal. This 
relation I call ^ extension.' The relation of * extending 
over ' is the relation of ^ including,' either in a spatial or 
in a temporal sense, or in both. But the mere ^ inclu- 
sion' is more fundamental than either alternative and 
does not require any spatio-temporal differentiation. 
In respect to extension two events arc mutually related 
so that either (i) one includes the other, or (ii) one over- 
laps the other without complete inclusion, or (iii) they 



Digitized by 



Google 



i86 THE CONCEPT OP NATURE [ch. 

are entirely separate. But great care is required in the 
definition of spatial and temporal elements from this 
basis in order to avoid tacit limitations really depend- 
ing on undefined relations and properties. 

Such fallacies can be avoided by taking accoimt of 
two elements in our experience, namely, (i) our ob- 
servational * present/ and (ii) our ^ percipient event.' 

Our obseiyatioaallpi^^ is what I call a ^ djuatjjfilL' 
It is the whole of nature apprehended in our immediate 
observation. It has therefore the nature of an event, 
but possesses a peculiar completeness which marks out 
such durations as a special type of events inherent in 
nature. A duration is not instantaneous. It is all that 
there is of nature with certain temporal limitations. In 
contradistinction to other events a duration will be 
called infinite and the other events are finite^. In our 
knowledge of a duration we distinguish (i) certain 
included events which are particularly discriminated 
as to their pecuUar individualities, and (ii) the remaining 
included events which are only known as necessarily in 
being by reason of their relations to the discriminated 
events and to the whole duration. The duration as a 
whole is signified^ by that quality of relatedness (in 
respect to extension) possessed by the part which is 
immediately under observation; namely, by the fact 
that there is essentially a beyond to whatever is observed. 
I mean by this that every event is known as being related 
to other events which it does not include. This fact, 
that every event is known as possessing the quality of 
exclusion, shows that(exclusion is as positive a relation 
as inclusion.) There are of course no merely negative 

^ Of. note on 'significance,* pp. 197, 198. 
2 Of. Ch. m, pp. 51 et seq. 



Digitized by 



Google 



IX] THE ULTIMATE PHYSICAL CONCEPTS 187 

relations in nature, and exclusion is not the mere 
negative of inclusion, though the /two relations are 
contraries.^ Both relations are concerned solely with 
events, and exclusion is capable of logical definition in 
terms of inclusion. 

Perhaps the most obvious exhibition of significance 
is to be found in our knowledge of the geometrical 
character of events inside an opaque material object. 
For example we know that an opaque sphere has a 
centre. This knowledge has nothing to do with the 
material; the sphere may be a solid uniform billiard 
ball or a hollow lawn-tennis ball. Such knowledge is 
essentially the product of significance, since the general 
character of the external discriminated events has in- 
formed us that there are events within the sphere and 
has also informed us of their geometrical structure. 

Some criticisms on 'The Principles of Natural 
Kjiowledge' show that difficulty has been foimd in 
apprehending (durations as real stratifications of nature.' 
J think that this hesitation arises from the unconscious 
influence of the vicious principle of bifurcation, so 
deeply embedded in modem philosophical thought. 
We observe nature as extended in an immediate present 
which is simultaneous but not instantaneous, and there- 
fore the whole which is immediately discerned or 
signified as an inter-related sjrstem forms a stratification 
of nature which is a physical fact. This conclusion 
inmiediately follows unless we admit bifurcation in the 
form of the principle of psychic additions, here rejected. 

Our 'percipient event' is that event included in our 
observational present which we distinguish as being in 
some peculiar way our standpoint for perception. It is 
roughly speaking that event which is our bodily life 



Digitized by 



Google 



i88 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

within the present duration. The theory of perception 
as evolved by medical psychology is based on signifi- 
cance. The distant situation of a perceived object is 
merely known to us as signified by our bodily state, 
i.e. by our percipient event. In fact perception requires 
sense-awareness of the significations of our percipient 
event together with sense-awareness of a peculiar re- 
lation (situation) between certain objects and the events 
thus signified. Our percipient event is saved by being 
the whole of nature by this fact of its significations. 
This is the meaning of calling the percipient event 
our standpoint for perception. The course of a ray of 
light is only derivatively connected with perception. 
What we do perceive are objects as related to events 
signified by the bodily states excited by the ray. 
These signified events (as is the case of images seen 
behind a mirror) may have very little to do with the 
actual course of the ray. In the course of evolution those 
animals have survived whose sense-awareness is con- 
centrated on those significations of their bodily states 
which are on the average important for their welfare. 
The whole world of events is signified, but there are 
some which exact the death penalty for inattention. 

The percipient event is always here and now in the 
associated present duration. It has, what may be called, 
an absolute position in that duration. Thus one definite 
duration is associated with a definite percipient event, 
*/' Z*^ "and we are thus aware of a peculiar relation which 
finite events can bear to durations. I call this relation 
* cogredience.*' The notion of rest is derivative from that 
of cogredience, and the notion of motion is derivative 
from that of inclusion within a duration without cogre- 
I ^ dience with it/ In fact motion is a relation (of varying 



Digitized by 



Google 



IX] THE ULTIMATE PHYSICAL CONCEPTS 189 

character) between an observed event and an observed 
duration, and cogredience is the most simple character 
or subspecies of motion^ To sum up, a fjuration^a nd a 
pCOTpiVnt rvcnt nrjCLrajrntinlly involved in the general 
character of each observation oiF nature, and the per- 
cipient event is cogredient with the duration. 

Our knowledge of the peculiar characters of different 
events depends upon our power of comparison. I call 
the exercise of this factor in our knowledge * recognition/ 
and the requisite sense-awareness of the comparable 
characters I call * sense-recognition.' Recognition and 
abstraction essentially involve each other. Each of them 
exhibits an entity for knowledge which is less than the 
concrete fact, but is a real factor in that fact. The most ^ 
concrete fact capable of separate discrimination is the { 
event. We caimot abstract without recognition, and 
we cannot recognise without abstraction. Perception 
involves apprehension of the event and recognition of 
the factors of its character. 

The things recognised are what I call ^objects.* In QC,(^^ 
this general sense of the term the relation of extension ^ 
is itself an object. In practice however I restrict the 
term to those objects which can in some sense or other 
be said to have a situation in an event ; namely, in the 
phrase ' There it is again ' I restrict the ^ there * to be the 
indication of a special event which is the situation of the 
object. Even so, there are different types of objects, and 
statements which are true of objects of one type are not 
in general true of objects of other types. The objects 
with which we are here concerned in the formulation 
of physical laws are material objects, such as bits of 
matter, molecules and electrons. An object of one of 
these types has relations to events other than those 



Digitized by 



Google 



I90 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

belonging to the stream of its situations. The fact of its 
situations within this stream has impressed on all other 
events certain modifications of their characters. In 
truth the object in its completeness may be conceived 
as a specific set of correlated modifications of the charac- 
ters of all events, with the property that these modifica- 
tions attain to a certain focal property for those events 
which belong to the stream of its situations. The total 
assemblage of the modifications of the characters of 
events due to the existence of an object in a stream of 
situations is what I call the ^physical field' due to the 
object. But the object cannot really be separated from 
its field. The object is in fact nothing else than the 
S3rstematically adjusted set of modifications of the field. ^ 
The conventional limitation of the object to the focal 
stream of events in which it is said to be ^situated' is 
convenient for some purposes, but it obscures the 
ultimate fact of nature. From this point of view the 
antithesis between action at a distance and action by 
transmission is meaningless. The doctrine of this para- 
graph is nothing else than another way of expressing the 
unresolvable multiple relation of an object to events. 

A complete time-system is formed by any one family 
of parallel durations. Two durations are parallel if 
either (i) one includes the other, or (ii) they overlap so 
as to include a third duration common to both, or 
(iii) are entirely separate. The excluded case is that of 
two durations overlapping so as to include in common 
an aggregate of finite events but including in common 
no other complete duration. The recognition of the 
fact of an indefinite niraiber of families of parallel 
durations is what differentiates the concept of nature 
here put forward from the older orthodox concept of 



Digitized by 



Google 



IX] THE ULTIMATE PHYSICAL CONCEPTS 191 

the essentially unique time-s3rstems. Its divergence from 
Einstein's concept of nature will be briefly indicated later. 

The instantaneous spaces of a given time-system are 
the ideal (non-existent) durations of zero temporal 
thickness indicated by routes of approximation along 
series formed by durations of the associated family. 
Each such instantaneous space represents the ideal of 
nature at an instant and is also a moment of time. Each 
time-system thus possesses an aggregate of moments 
belonging to it alone. Each event-particle lies in one 
and only one moment of a given time-system. An event- 
particle has three characters^ : (i) its extrinsic character 
which is its character as a definite route of convergence 
among events, (ii) its intrinsic character which is the 
pecuUar quality of nature in its neighbourhood, namely, 
the character of the physical field in the neighbourhood, 
and (iii) its position. 

The position of an event-particle arises from the 
aggregate of moments (no two of the same family) in 
which it lies. We fix our attention on one of these 
moments which is approximated to by the short dura- 
tion of our inunediate experience, and we express 
position as the position in this moment. But the event- 
particle receives its position in moment M in virtue of 
the whole aggregate of other moments Af' , M'\ etc., 
in which it also lies. The differentiation of M into a 
geometry of event-particles (instantaneous points) ex- 
presses the differentiation of M by its intersections with 
moments of alien time-systems. In this way planes and 
straight lines and event-particles themselves find their 
being. Also the parallelism of planes and straight lines 
arises from the parallelism of the moments of one and 
* Of. pp. 82 et acq. 



Digitized by 



Google 



192 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

the same time-system intersecting M. Similarly the 
order of parallel planes and of event-particles on straight 
lines arises from the time-order of these intemecting 
moments. The explanation is not given here^. It is 
sufficient now merely to mention the sources from which 
the whole of geometry receives its physical explanation. 

The correlation of the various momentary spaces of 
one time-system is achieved by the relation of cogre- 
dience. Evidently motion in an instantaneous space is 
immeaning. Motion expresses a comparison between 
position in one instantaneous space with positions in 
other instantaneous spaces of the same time-system. 
Cogredience yields the simplest outcome of such com- 
parison, namely, rest. 

Motion and rest are immediately observed facts. 
They are relative in the sense that they depend on the 
time-system which is fimdamental for the observation. 
A string of event-particles whose successive occupation 
means rest in the given time-system forms a timeless 
point in the timeless space of that time-system. In this 
way each time-system possesses its own permanent 
timeless space peculiar to it alone, and each such space 
is composed of timeless points which belong to that 
time-system and to no other. The paradoxes of rela- 
tivity arise from neglecting the fact that different as- 
sumptions as to rest involve the expression of the facts 
of physical science in terms of radically different spaces 
and times, in which points and moments have different 
meanings. 

The source of order has already been indicated and 
.that of congruence is now found. It depends on motion. 

^ Of. Principles of Natural Knowledge^ and previous chapters 
of the present work. 



Digitized by 



Google 



IX] THE ULTIMATE PHYSICAL CONCEPTS 193 

From cogredience, perpendicularity arises; and from 
perpendicularity in conjunction with the reciprocal 
synunetry between the relations of any two time-sy3tems 
congruence both in time and space is completely defined 
(cf. loc. cit.). 

The resulting formulae are those for the electro- 
magnetic theory of relativity, or, as it is now termed, the 
restricted theory. But there is this vital difference: the 
critical velocity c which occurs in these formulae has 
now no connexion whatever with light or with any 
other fact of the physical field (in distinction from the 
extensional structure of events), lit simply marks the 
fact that our congruence determination embraces both 
times and spaces in one universal system, and therefore 
if two arbitrary units are chosen, one for all spaces and 
one for all times, their ratio will be a velocity which is a 
fundamental property of nature expressing the fact that 
times and spaces are really comparable.^ 

The physical properties of nature are expressed in 
terms of material dbjecte (electrons, etc.). The physical 
character of an event arises from the fact that it bdongs 
to the field of the whole complex of such objects. From 
another point of view we can say that these objects are 
nothing else than our way of expressing the mutual 
correlation of the physical characters of events. 

The spatio-temporal measurdbleness of nature arises 
from (i) the relation of ext^ision between events, and 
(ii) the stratified character of nature arising from each of 
the alternative time^systans, and (iii) rest and motion, 
as exhibited in the relations of finite events to time- 
systems. None of these sources of measurement depend 
on the physical characters of finite events as exhibited 
by the situated objects. They are completely signified 

W.N. 13 



Digitized by 



Google 



194 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

for events whose physical characters are unknown. Thus 
the spatio-temporal measurements are independent of 
the objectival physical characters. Furthermore the 
character of our knowledge of a whole duration, which 
is essentially derived from the significance of the part 
within the inunediate field of discrimination, constructs 
it for us as a imiform whole independent, so far as its 
extension is concerned, of the imobserved characters 
of remote events. Namely, there is a definite whole of 
nature, simultaneously now present, whatever may be 
the character of its remote events. This consideration 
reinforces the previous conclusion. This conclusion 
leads to the assertion of the essential imiformity of the 
momentary spaces of the various time-systems, and 
thence to the imif ormity of the timeless spaces of which 
there is one to each time-system. 

The analysis of the general character of observed 
nature set forth above affords explanations of various 
fundamental observational facts: (a) It explains the 
differentiation of the one quality of extension into time 
and space. (jS) It gives a meaning to the observed facts 
of geometrical and temporal position, of geometrical 
and temporal order, and of geometrical straightness and 
planeness. (y) It selects one definite system of congruence 
embracing both space and time, and thus explains the 
concordance as to measurement which is in practice 
attained. (8) It explains (consistently with the theory of 
relativity) the observed phenomena of rotation, e.g. 
Foucault's pendulum, the equatorial bulge of the earth, 
the fixed senses of rotation of cyclones and anticyclones, 
and the gyro-compass. It does this by its admission of 
definite stratifications of nature which are disclosed by 
the very character of our knowledge of it. (e) Its ex- 



Digitized by 



Google 



IX] THE ULTIMATE PHYSICAL CONCEPTS 195 

planations of motion are more fundamental than those 
expressed in (8) ; for it explains what is meant by motion 
itself. The observed motion of an extended object is 
the relation of its various situations to the stratification 
of nature expressed by the time-system fundamental to 
the observation. This motion expresses a real relation 
of the object to the rest of nature. The quantitative 
expression of this relation will vary according to the 
time-system selected for its expression. 

This theory accords no peculiar character to light 
beyond that accorded to other physical phenomena such 
as sound. There is no ground for such a differentiation. 
Some objects we know by sight only, and other objects 
we know by sound only, and other objects we observe 
neither by light nor by sound but by touch or smell or 
otherwise. The velocity of light varies according to its 
medium and so does that of sound. Light moves in 
curved paths under certain conditions and so does 
sound. Both light and sound are waves of disturbance 
in the physical characters of events; and (as has been 
stated above, p. 188) the actual course of the light 
is of no more importance for perception than is the 
actual course of the sound. To base the whole philo^ 
sophy of nature upon light is a baseless assumption. 
The Michelson-Morley and analogous experiments 
show that within the limits of our inexactitude of 
observation the velocity of light is an approximation to 
the critical velocity *c' which expresses the relation 
between our space and time units. It is provable that 
the assumption as to light by which these experiments 
and the influence of the gravitational field on the light- 
rays are explained is deducible as an approximation 
from the equations of the electromagnetic field. This 



Digitized by 



Google 



196 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch. 

completely disposes of any necessity for differentiating 
light from other physical phenomena as possessing 
any peculiar fundamental character. 

It is to be observed that the measurement of extended 
nature by means of extended objects is meaningless 
apart from some observed fact of simultaneity inherent 
in nature and not merely a play of thought. Otherwise 
there is no meaning to the concept of one presentation 
of your extended measuring rod AB. Why not AB' 
where B' is the end B five minutes later ? Measurement 
presupposes ior its possibility nature as a simultaneity, 
and an observed object present then and present now. 
In other words, measurement of extended nature re- 
quires some inherent character in nature affording a 
rule of presentation of events. Furthermore congruence 
cannot be defined by the permanence of the measuring 
rod. The permanence is itself meaningless apart from 
some immediate judgment of self-congruence. Other- 
wise how is an elastic string differentiated from a rigid 
measuring rod? Each remains the same self-identical 
object. Why is one a possible measuring rod and the 
other not so? The meaning of congruence lies beyond 
the self-identity of the object. In other words measure- 
ment presupposes the measurable, and the theory of the 
measurable is the theory of congruence. 

Furthermore the admission of stratifications of nature 
bears on the formulation of the laws of nature. It has 
been laid down that these laws are to be expressed in 
differential equations which, as expressed in any general 
system of measurement, should bear no reference to 
any other particular measure-system. This requirement 
is purely arbitrary. For a measure-system measures 
something inherent in nature; otherwise it has no 



Digitized by 



Google 



IX] THE ULTIMATE PHYSICAL CONCEPTS 197 

connexion with nature at all. And that something which 
is measured by a particular measure-system may have a 
special relation to the phenomenon whose law is being 
formulated. For example the gravitational field due to 
a material object at rest in a certain time-system may 
be expected to exhibit in its formulation particular 
reference to spatial and temporal quantities of that 
time-system. The field can of course be expressed in 
any measure-systems, but the particular reference will 
remain as the simple physical explanation. 

NOTE: ON THE GREEK CONCEPT. OF A POINT 

The preceding pages had been passed for press before I had 
the pleasure of seeing Sir T. L. Heath's Euclid in Greek}-. 
In the original Euclid's first definition is 

<rrjfjL€i6v ioTiVy ov fjuipo^ ovOiv,. 
I have quoted it on p. 86 in the expanded form taught to me 
in childhood, * without parts and without magnitude.' I should 
have consulted Heath's English edition — a classic from the 
moment of its issue — before committing myself to a statement 
about Euclid. This is however a trivial correction not affecting 
sense and not worth a note. I wish here to draw attention to 
Heath's own note to this definition in his Euclid in Greek. He 
summarises Greek thought on the nature of a point, from the 
Pythagoreans, through Plato and Aristotle, to Euclid. My 
analysis of the requisite character of a point on pp. 89 and 
90 is in complete agreement with the outcome of the Greek 
discussion. 

NOTE: ON SIGNIFICANCE AND INFINITE EVENTS 

The theory of significance has been expanded and made more 
definite in the present volume. It had already been introduced 
in the Principles of Natural Knowledge (cf. subarticles 3-3 to 
3-8 and i6-i, 16-2, 19-4, and articles 20, 21). In reading over the 
proofs of the present volume, I come to the conclusion that in the 
* Camb. Univ. Press, 1920. 

13—3 



Digitized by 



Google 



198 THE CONCEPT OF NATURE [ch.k 

light of this development my limitation of infinite events to dura- 
tions is untenable. This limitation is stated in article 33 of the 
Principles and at the beginning of Chapter IV (p. 74) of this book. 
There is not only a significance of the discerned events embracing 
the whole present duration, but there is a significance of a cogre- 
dient event involving its extension through a whole time-system 
backwards and forwards. In other words the essential ' beyond' 
in nature is a definite beyond in time as well as in space [cf . 
pp. 53, 194]. This follows from my whole thesis as to the assimila- 
tion of time and space and their origin in extension. It also has 
the same basis in the analysis of the character of our knowledge 
of nature. It follows from this admission that it is possible to 
define point- tracks [i.e. the points of timeless spaces] as abstrac- 
tive elements. This is a great improvement as restoring the 
balance between moments and points. I still hold however to the 
statement in subarticle 35*4 of tie Principles that the intersection 
of a pair of non-parallel durations does not present itself to us as 
one event. This correction does not affect any of the subsequent 
reasoning in the two books. 

I may take this opportunity of pointing out that the * stationary 
events* of article 57 of the Principles are merely cogredient 
events got at from an abstract mathematical point of view. 



Digitized by 



Google 



INDEX 



In the case of terms of frequent occurrence, only those occurrences are 
indexed which are of peculiar importance for the elucidation of meanings 



A [or an], ii 

Abraham, 105 

Absolute position, 105, io6, 114, 

188 
Abstraction, 33, 37, 168, 171, 173; 

extensive, 65, 79, 85 
Abstractive element, 84; set, 61, 

79 
Action at a distance, 159, 190 
Action by transmission, 159, 190 
Active conditions, 158 
Activity, field of, 170, 181 
Adjunction, loi 
Aggregate, 23 
Alexander, Prof., viii 
Alexandria, 71 
Alfred the Great, 137 
Anticipation, 69 
Anti-prime, 88 
Apparent nature, 31, 39 
Area, 99; momental, 103; vagrant, 

103 
Aristotelian logic, 150 
Aristotle, 16, 17, 18, 24, 197 
Associate-potential, 183 
Atom, 17 

Attribute, 21, 26, 150 
Awareness, 3 
Axiom, 36, 121 
Axioms of congruence, 128 et seqq. 

Bacon, Francis, 78 
Behaviouristic, 185 
Bergson, 54 
Berkeley, 28 
Between, 64 
Beyond, 186, 198 
Bifurcation, vi, 30, 185, 187 
Boundary, 100; moment, 63; par- 
ticle, 100 
Broad, C. D., viii 

Calculation, formula of, 45, 158 
Cambridge, 97 
Causal nature, 31, 39 
Causation, 31, 146 
Centrifugal force, 138 
Change, uniformity of, 140 



Character, extrinsic, 82, 89, 90, 113, 
191; intrinsic, 80, 82, 90, 113, 191 

Charge, 160 

Closure of nature, 4 

Coefficient of drag, 133 

Coefficients of impetus, 183 

Cogredience, no, 188 

Coherence, 29 

Comparison, 124, 125, 143, 189 

Complex, 13 

Conceptual nature, 45 ; space, 96 

Concrete facts, 167, 171, 189 

Conditioning events, 152 

Conditions, active, 158 

Congruence, 65, 96, 118, 120, 127, 196 

Continuity, 157 j Dedekindian, 102; 
of events, 76; of nature, 59, 76 

Convention, 121 

Convergence, 62, 79; law of, 82 

Conveyance, 154, 155 

Co-present, 177 

Covering, 83 

Creative advance, 178 

Critical velocity, 193, 195 

Curvature of space-time, 182 

Cyclone, 194 

Dedekindian continuity, 102 
Definite, 53, 194, 198 
Delusions, 31, 38 
Delusive perceptual object, 153 
Demarcation of events, 144 
Demonstrative phrase, 6 
Descriptive phrase, 6, 10 
Differential equations, 196 
Discrimination, 14, 50, 144 
Diversification of nature, 15 
Duddington, Mrs, 47 
Duration, 37, 53, 55, 186 
Durations, families of, 59, 73, 190 
Dynamical axes, 138 

Einstein, vii, 102, 131, 164, 165, 

181, 182, 183, 184, 191 
Electromagnetic field, 179 
Electron, 30, 146, 158, 171 
Element, 17; abstractive, 84 
Elliptical phraseology, 7 



Digitized by 



Google 



200 



INDEX 



Empty space, 145 

Entity. 5, 13 

Equal in abstractive force. 83 

Error. 68 

Ether. 18. 78. 160; material. 78; 
of events, 78 

Euclid. 85. 94. 197 

Euler. 140 

Event. 15, 52. 75, 165; percipient, 
107, 152, 186 

Event-particle, 86, 93, 94. 172. 191 

Events, conditioning. 152; con- 
tinuity of, 76; demarcation of. 
144; ether of, 78; infinite. 197, 
198; limited. 74; passage of. 34; 
signified. 52; stationary. 198; 
stream of. 167; structure of. 52, 
166 

Exclusion. 186 

Explanation. 97. 141 

Extended nature. 196 

Extension, 22. 58. 75. 185 

Extensive abstraction. 6s, 79, 85 

Extrinsic character, 82, 89, 90. 113. 
191; properties, 62 

Fact, 12, 13 

Factors, 12, 13, 15 

Facts, concrete, 167, 171 

Family of durations, 59, 63, 73; of 

moments, 63 
Faraday. 146 
Field, gravitational, 197; of activity, 

170, 181; phjrsical, 190 
Finite truths, 12 
Fitzgerald, 133 

Formula of calculation, 45, 158 
Foucault, 138, 194 
Four-dimensional manifold. 86 
Fresnel. 133 
Future, the. 72. 177 

Galileo. 139 

Geometrical order. 194 

Geometry. 36; metrical, 129 

Gravitation. 179 et seqq. 

Gravitational neld. 197 

Greek philosophy. 16; thought. 197 

Gyro-compass. 194 

Heath. Sir T. L., 197 
Here. 107 

Idealists. 70 

Immediacy. 52; of perpeption, 72 

Impetus, 181, 182; coefficients of, 

183; integral, 183 
Inclusion, 186 
IndividuaUty. 13 



Infinite events. 197. 198 

Inge. Dr. 48 

Ingredient. 14 

Ingression. 144. 145. 148. 152 

Inherence. 83 

Inside, 106 

Instant, 33, 35, 57 

Instantaneous plane, 91 ; present, 72 ; 

spaces, 86, 90, 177 
Instantaneousness, 56, 57 
Intersection, locus of, 90 
Intrinsic character, 80, 82, 90, 113, 

191; properties. 62 
Ionian thinkers. 19 
Irrelevance, infinitude of. 12 
Irrevocableness. 35. 37 
It. 8 

JuUus Caesar. 36 
Junction. 76. loi 

Kinetic energy. 105; symmetry. 129 
Knowledge. 28, 32 

Lagrange, 140 

Larmor, 131 

Law of convergence, 82 

Laws of motion, 137, 139; of nature. 

196 
Leibnizian monadology. 150 
Level, 91, 92 
Light. 195; ray of. 188; velocity of. 

131 
Limit. 57 

Limited events. 74 
Location. 160. 161 
Locke. 27 

Locus. 102 ; of intersection. 90 
London. 97 

Lorentz, H. A., 131. 133 
Lossky. 47 

Manifold, four-dimensional, 86; 

space-time, 173 
Material ether, 78; object^ 169 
Materialism, 43, 70 
Matrix. 116 

Matter, 16, 17, 19, 20, 26 
Maxwell, 131. 133 
Measurableness. 196; of nature. 193 
Measurement, 96, 120, 174. 196; of 

time, 65. 140 
Measure-system. 196 
Memory, 68 
Metaphysics, 28, 32 
Metrical geometry, 129 
Michelson-Morley. 195 
Milton. 35 
Mind. 27. 28 



Digitized by 



Google 



INDEX 



201 



Minkowski, viii, 131 

Molecule, 32, 171 

Moment, 57, 60, 88 

Momenta! area, Z03; route, Z03 

Momentum, X05 

Motion, 105, 114, 117, 127, x88, 192 

Multiplicity, 22 

Natural philosophy, 29, 30 
Natural science, philosophy of, 46 
Nature, 3; apparent, 31, 395 causal, 

31, 39; conceptual, 45; continuity 

of, 59, 76; discrimination of, Z44; 

extended, 196; laws of, 196; 

passage of, 54; stratification of, 

194, 196; system of, 146 
Newton, 27, 136, 139, 140 

OWect, 77, 125, 143, 169, X89; 
delusive perceptual, 155 ; material, 
169; perceptual, 153; physical, 
I55» 157; scientific, 158, 169; uni- 
form, 162 

Occupation, 22, 34, 36, 100, loz 

Order, source of, 192; spatial, 95, 
194 ; temporal, 64, 95, 194 

Orgsuiisation of thought, 79 

Outside, 63, 100 

Paradox, 192 

Parallel, 63, 127; durations, 190 

Parallelism, 95, 191 

Parallelogram, 127 

Paris, 87, 138 

Parliament, 120 

Part, 14, 15, 58 

Passage of events, 34; of nature, 54 

Past, the, 72, 177 

Perception, 3 

Perceptual objects, 149, 153 

Percipience, 28 

Percipient event, 107, 152, 186, 187 

Period of time, 51 

Permanence, 144 

Perpendicularity, 117, 127, 193 

Philosophy, i; natural, 29, 30; of 

natural science, 46 ; of the sciences, 

2 
Physical field, 190; object, 155, 156, 

157 
Physics, speculative, 30 
Place, 51 

Plane, 191; instantaneous, 91 
Plato, 16, 17, x8, 24, 197 
Poincar6, Z2i, 122, 123 
Point, 35, 89,191, "4. 173, 176 
Point-fiash, 172, 173 
Point of space, 85 
Point, timeless, 192 



Point-track, 113, 198 

Pompey, 36 

Position, 89, 90, 92. 93, 99. "3, X9U 
absolute, 105, 106, X14, x88 

Potential, 1831 associate-, 183 

Predicate, 18 

Predication, t8 

Present, the, 69, 72, 177; instan- 
taneous, 72; observational, x86 

Primary qualities, 27 

Prime, 88 

Process, 53, 545 of nature, 54 

Psychic additions, 29, 187 

Punct, 92. 93, 94 

P3rthagoreans, 197 

lity, 27 

Qtum of tmie, 162 

atum theory, 162 

Ray of light, 188 

Reality, 30; of durations, 55, 187 

Recognition, 124, 143, 189 

Rect, 91, 92 

Recurrence, 35 

Relative motion, 117; velocity, 130 

Relativity, 169; restricted theory 

of, 193 
Rest, 105, 114, 188, 192 
Rotation, 138, X94 
Route, 99; momental, 103; straight, 

103 
Russell, Bertrand, zz, Z22, Z23 

Schelling, 47 

Science, 2; metaphysical, 32 
Scientific objects, Z49, Z58, Z69 
Secondary qualities, 27 
Self-congruence, Z96 
Self-containedness of nature, 4 
Sense-awareness, 3, 67 
Sense-object, Z49, Z70 
Sense-perception, 3, X4 
Sense-recognition, 143, Z89 
Series, temporal, 66, 70, 85, Z78 
Set, abstractive, 6z, 79 
Significance, 5X, z86, Z87, z88, Z94, 

197, 198 
Signified events, 52 
Simplicity, Z63, Z73 
Simultaneity, 53, 56, Z96 
Situation, Z5, 78, Z47, Z48, Z52, z6o, 

X89 
Solid, 99, zoz, Z02; vagrant, zox 
Sound, Z95 
Space. z6, Z7, 3Z, 33, 79; empty, Z45; 

timeless, 86, zo6, ZZ4; uniformity 

of, Z94 
Spaces, instantaneous, 86, 90 



Digitized by 



Google 



202 



INDEX 



Space-sjrstem, 1^9 
Space-time manifold, 173 
Spatial-order, 95 
Spatio-temporal stmctare, 173 
Speculative demonstration, 6 
Speculative physics, 30 
Standpoint for perception, 107, z88 
Station, 103, 104, 113 
Stationaiv events, 198 
Straight une, 91, 114, 191; route. 

103 
Stratification of nature, 187, 194, 

196 
Stream of events, 167 
Structure of events, 52, 166 
Structure, spatio-temporal, 173 
Subject, 18 

Substance, 16, 18, 19, 150 
Substratum, 16, 18, 21 
Sjrmmetry, 118, 126; kinetic, 129 
S3rstem of nature, 146 
System, time-, 192 

Tamer, Edward, v, i 

Temporal order, 64, 95, 194 

Temporal series, 66, 70, 85 

Tensor, 182 

Terminus, 4 

The, II 

Theory, quantum, 162 

There, no, 189 

This, II 

Thought, 3, 14 



Timaeus, the, 17, 20, 24 

Time, 16, 17. 31, 33. 49. 79; 

measurement of, 140; quantum of, 

162; transcendence of, 39 
Time-series, 178, also cf. Temporal 

series 
Time-system, see Time-series, also 

91, 97. 104, 179, 192 
Timeless point, 192; space, 86, 106, 

Totahty. 89 

Transcendence of time, 39 
Transmission, 26, 28; action by, 159. 

190 
Tubes of force, 146 

Unexhaustiveness, 50 . 
Uniform object, 162 
Uniformity of change, 140; of space, 
194 

Vagrant area, 103; solid, 101 

Veblen and Young, 36 

Velocity, critical, 193, 195; o^ ligl^t. 

131. 195; relative, 130 
Volume, 92, loi 

When, 107 
Where, 107 
Whole, 58 
Within, 63 

Young, Veblen and, 36 



CAMBRIDGB: PRINTBD by J. B. PSACB, X.A., AT THB UNIVBRSITY PRBSS. 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



A<)055Qli0SS0 

IMili 

b89055040990i 



RENEW THIS BOOK CALL 262-9500 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



Digitized by 



Google 



